FOREST LIFE.
CHAPTER I.
'Tis to create, and in creating, live
A being more intense, that we endow
With form our fancy.
Byron.
If
any body may be excused for writing a book,
it is the dweller in the wilderness; and this must, I
think, be evident to all who give the matter a
moment's
reflection. My neighbor, Mrs. Rower, says,
indeed, that there are books enough in the world,
and
one too many;
but it will never do to consult
the neighbors, since what is said of a prophet is
doubly true of an author. Indeed, it is of very
little use to consult any body. What is written
from impulse is generally the most readable, and
this fact is an encouragement to those who are
conscious
of no particular qualification beyond a desire
to write. People write because they cannot help
it. The heart longs for sympathy, and when it
cannot be found close at hand, will seek it the
world over. We never tell our thoughts but with
the hope of an echo in the thoughts of others.
We set forth in the most attractive guise the
treasures
of our fancy, because we hope to warm into
life imaginations like our own. If the desire for
sympathy could lie dormant for a time, there would
be no more new books, and we should find leisure
to read those already written.
This accounts for a second attempt to delineate
some of the very ordinary scenes, manners and
customs
of Western Life. No wild adventures,no
blood-curdling hazards,no romantic incidents,
could occur within my limited and sober sphere.
No new lights have appeared above my narrow
horizon. Common-place all, yet I must tell it.
Those who have been accustomed to live in the
midst of a wide circle of pleasant acquaintance,
and another, a dearer though narrower circle of
beloved
friends,where every taste finds its
appropriate
gratification, and every feeling of affection its
warm response,can scarcely be expected to
appreciate
the yearning with which the dweller in the
far distant wilderness looks back upon the land of
his early love; the land of society, of conversation,
of that collision of differing yet kindred minds,
without which the best of us become stupid,the
land of churches, of books, of music, of pictures,
of all that can delight the imagination as well as
all that ministers to our better nature.
Those only whom fate or a wayward choice has
removed from these advantages can describe the
aspect which they wear when viewed from an
almost
hopeless distance; or the sense of alienation,
of isolation, of loneliness, which is apt to beset the
heart or the imagination of the emigrant in moments
of depression, or long hours of ill health. I have
sometimes smiled to detect myself indulging
feelings
nearly akin to those which Cowper ascribes to
the gentle savage who was carried to England,
and then most unmercifully returned to his island.
He fancies Omai
Asking of the surge that bathes his foot
If ever it has washed those distant shores.
And we might be disposed to ask just such
questions
,
if an ocean, instead of two or three inland
seas, rolled between us and our ancient home.
Every thing that awakens associations connected
with the cherished ideagrown doubly dear by
the aid of time and distanceis hailed with a
strange pleasure. Faces that we have viewed with
indifference in the company of those we loved,
bring with them to the wilderness the impress of
those beloved looks, and win from us at once some
share of the liking which belongs of right only to
the friends whose image is called up by their
presence
.
The man whom we have passed in the
streets a thousand times, without knowing or
caring to know his name, if he enter our cot by
accident to inquire his way to the West, is
hailed as a friend, and plied with questions, as if it
were probable that, in those crowded thoroughfares,
his objects of interest should have been the same
with ours. As the earth is perfumed with the
fragrance
of the rose which has reposed on its bosom,
so the most trivial occurrence seems important
when it is entwined with a reminiscence of all we
have loved and left.
Is it surprising then that those, who are shut out
from almost every thing that taste or habit has
endeared
,
should desire to link themselves with the
absent by describing the objects around them, the
affairs which form their occupation, the people
with whom they associate, the modes of life which
contrast so oddly with the customs of the older
world? There is, to be sure, but little to be told;
but that little, being told, renews in some degree
the bond of union with those from whom we are
separated at an almost impossible distance. It
helps too to give some degree of distinctness to
the ideas that our friends have formed of our
condition
;
and if the view should frighten some to
whom certain ameliorations of existence are of the
last importance, it may console others, who are able
to perceive that humble quiet is of itself a great
good, even though much else that is desirable be
lacking.
This communication with the distant world
this viewless chainthis mental telegraph, more
rapid than electricity itself, has a value beyond all
computation or comparison. It is another vitality
a newly-explored world of inexhaustible
enjoyment
;
VOL. I. 2
within, but undisturbed by a world of
turmoil
and care. It affords a charm that can make
even society forgotten, at least at times, and which
in fact supplies in some measure its place, by a
magic as potent as that which enabled the sage to
show to Surrey
The ladye of his heart,
Albert betwixt them roared the ocean grim.
For those who write are never without a magic
mirror, within which they can discern at pleasure
the shadowy forms of those who are to read.
Here then is another tissuenot without many
a rent and many a seamof Western sketches;
more skimble-skamble stuff about woods and
wilds, and every-day, plain people,men who
would shake a king by the hand, or perhaps ask
him the price of the throne he sat on, without a
misgiving;and women, who, after conning over
the splendors of the young queen's nuptials, talk
with majestic philosophy of so much fuss about
nothing!
In describing those in whose minds this
estimate
of worldly advantages is sedulously cherished,
it is difficult to avoid awakening occasionally an
idea that we suppose the present aspect of society
in the new country is susceptible of improvement;
that we may be in favor of adding some finishing
touches to our present degree of civilization and
refinement
.
To this charge it would be in vain to
plead not guilty; and we shall attempt no disguise.
A portrait, however showily painted, is worth
nothing
,
if it be not a resemblance. A painter would
show his skill but poorly, who, in his zeal for
beautifying
his subject, should leave out a wart, even
though it grew on the tip of one's nose. Equally
unwise is he who exaggerates a wrinkle, or throws
too heavy a shade over a complexion that needs no
deepening. But he must be allowed superlatively
silly, who will quarrel with a portrait which is
sufficiently
like, merely because the outline is not
that of another whom he affects to despise, but
whom he secretly considers much handsomer than
himself.
I profess to offer only rambling impressions, not
a sober view, the result of deliberate and
discriminating
judgment. This I leave to wiser heads and
more industrious investigators. Women's wisdom is
always laughed at, so that we have no inducement
to be profound, and least of all on themes connected
with political economy, the discussion of which our
master seems to regard among his exclusive rights.
Indeed, we are fairly threatened that, if we persist
in claiming to run neck and neck with the nobler
sex on these subjects, we lose our precious privilege
of irresponsibility.
No more nonsense! no more fiddle-faddle!
There must be grain in your chaff!
I, for one, am warned. I adhere deliberately
to fiddle-faddle and its immunities. As I consider
it beyond question that a copy of this
incontrovertible
view of the aspect of things in the infancy of
our dear state, will be provided with an especial
crypt in the corner-stone of the great University
buildings, I have however judged it necessary to
be very exact in all things calculated to throw light
on our primitive manners and customs.
I acknowledge at the outset that I have no story
to tell. What follows is like Ariosto's poem in
one
respectit has neither beginning nor end, further
than any detached period may be said to possess
them. I should like to carry the resemblance
further, for
he
had the art of giving to individual
parts an interest which the work does not possess
as a whole; but it is only the defects of the great
which it is easy for the little to imitate.
My rambles will, as I foresee, carry me all over
our beautiful state. If, in the course of my
wanderings
,
I should venture occasionally to lead my
reader to the borders of one of those deep but
waveless little lakes, which abound in this land of
looking-glasses,lakes which not even the offer
of being transformed into mill-ponds, could bribe
to give a false or a flattering reflection,and if he
should chance therein to discern features which he
does not admire, I trust I may pass unvisited for
the almost unpardonable sin, when I state that I
have made all due and solicitous inquiry for a pair
of those truly American, and
never-sufficiently-to-be-extolled
glorification-spectacles, first
introduced
and recommended to the world by my
much-respected friend, Major Downing.
Numerous
are the communications I have addressed to
the major, both at his principal residence of
Downingville
,
and at his Washington lodgings; but
receiving
no answer, I conclude, knowing the
well-principled
punctuality of my friend, that he must
be absent just now, on one of those pieces of secret
service, so many of which are found requisite for
the well-being of these Statesperhaps
negotiating
with the emperor of Russia for the purchase
of a herd of polar bears, to be trained to eat Florida
Indians; which training, I should think, might be
easily managed, by supplying them for a few
months with other dark-complexioned people, who
might be had at a cheaper rate.
2*
CHAPTER II.
Visions of faery, stay! ye leave me dark!
Your magic flashes pale the healthful ray
That I must live by; your deceptive glare
Strikes out the light of the pure, holy day,
And steals the beauty of the skies away.
Tu fais une mine d'une aune.
Goethe
.
I can
realize very sensibly the power of the
patent glorifiers to which I have alluded; for I
once borrowed of a political friend the optics he
had used in travelling through the state, with a
view to qualify himself to illustrate, by apt local
allusions, a speech he intended making, preparatory
to his nomination for some highly-dignified office
in the gift of the peoplean office in which he
expected to have an opportunity to sacrifice his
private feelings to the public good, by accepting a
pecuniary compensation of considerable amount.
After his object was attained, he had of course no
further use for his magic glasses; and, by his kind
leave, I obtained their invaluable aid for a tour of
observation, certain that I should now be able to
give the most fascinating and satisfactory accounts
of all I saw and heard. But my usual ill fortune
pursued me, and all my hopes of writing travels,
with which no fault could be found, were nipped
in the bud by an accident which I shall now
proceed
to describe.
All my preparations for this journey, so fraught
with pleasurable anticipations, had been made with
unusual care. My travelling-basket (an old and
tried friend, somewhat the worse for wear) was
supplied with two or three capacious note-books
not French toys, shell of tortoise, clasped with
gold, but real, serviceable journalizers. The old
lumber-wagon, with a pair of plough-horses,
equipped in working-harness, to withstand the
corduroy
and swamp-holes, received me and my
luggage
;
and with a veil of green sarcenet closely
drawn to save my precious eyes,precious
especially
,
because without their aid the generosity
of my friend would be of no avail,I commenced
my journey. I deferred placing in their appropriate
position the instruments which were to make me
the most popular of sight-seers, until I should have
reached new localities, where the force of habit
would not be likely to diminish their power. Old
Dobbin and Dagon jogged along at their usual pace,
and I occupied myself for some time in completing
our little internal arrangements, and ascertaining, by
the most rigid ransacking of my treacherous
memory
,
that nothing essential to the success of my
undertaking
had been left behind.
These cares being disposed of, and the immediate
vicinity of our village passed, I drew forth my
treasures, and prepared a note-book for actual
service
.
The first look was cast in my lap, as charity
begins at home. There lay my simple basket and
note-book, each faded tint renewed, each
time-worn
corner reburnished; while about the edges
of both played a prismatic haloan edging of
rainbow; such (only more brilliant) as will
sometimes
be the effect of that bewitched condition of
the eyes, which is the consequence of over-dosing
with quinine. So dazzling was the whole, that I
carefully drew down my veil before I ventured to
look abroad in the sunshine.
At first the view by the road-side seemed scarcely
altered from my old habit of seeing with my own
eyes; but I soon found this was to be ascribed to
the green veil, which softened all hues to a sort of
neutral tint, leaving very little brightness to the
brightest, and adding several not very pleasing
shades to the darker ones. I could not help
wondering
whether some foreign travellers might not
thoughtlessly have equipped themselves with
sarcenet
veils for their American tourbut to my story.
No sooner was the envious shade removed, than
a scene of wonders opened upon me. We were
passing over Snake Hill,an elevation which had
always before appeared to me covered with stunted
oak bushes, relieved at intervals by a huge stump
or a girdled tree. What was my surprise to find
its gently-swelling sides planted with luxurious
sugar-maples and lofty elms, with fantastic arbors
formed here and there amid their stately trunks by
garlands of honey-suckle and eglantine, so closely
interlaced, that no ray of the fervid sun penetrated
their flowery depths, even at high noon! The only
vestige I could discover of the wild oak growth
which I had supposed to characterize this region,
was to be found in the most delicately-fancied
garden-chairs, which abounded in these shady
bowers, and of which the gnarled roots and twisted
branches of the native tree furnished the material.
As we proceeded slowly over the Macadamized
road whose broad bosom courted the tread of our
delighted steeds, I could discern youths and
maidens
habited with the simplicity of Arcadia, and the
taste of Madame Vestris, tending a few sheep,
at picturesque intervals in the grove. Such, with
little variation, was the aspect presented by what
we have always considered as oak-openings!
When we approached the more settled part of
the country, new and glorious views opened upon
us. On every side pillared palaces of painted pine
lined the thronged thoroughfares, while marble and
mosaic marked the mansions of the more wealthy.
Gorgeous peacocks unfurled their flagrant fans in
courts musical with the murmur of magnificent
fountains. Ladies lovelier than light reclined on
lawns of emerald velvet, or loitered languidly at
gilded lattices, lily-hung and lace-shaded, inhaling
delicious perfumes, and listening to lays of love,
warbled to thrilling lutes and silver-voiced lyres.
Here would be seen a benevolent being bestowing
upon a bashful beggar burdens of balmy bounty;
there a conscientious creditor calling back the
careless
calculator who had incautiously overpaid his
account. Barristers with beaming eyes were
evidently
beseeching their clients to consider before
they leaped into law; physicians prescribing to
their pleased patients delicate diet and amusing
excursions
,
rather than doleful dumps and odious
doses. Now a band of blooming children sporting,
blossom-wreathed, over the embroidered meadows;
and again, a festive dance of happy villagers,the
damsels in pink bodices, the gallants in blue shorts,
threading the green alleys, and flinging flowers
at each other in their fairy flight, at proper
intervals
in the music. In short, all seemed like the
visions that hover over the pillows of poets who
write for the opera, or like the still more
enchanting
reality of the Cashmerian Saturnalia of roses.
I was sadly loath to leave these delightful
localities
;
but the modern mode of making tours while
one is sitting stock still, staring at one set of objects,
never suited my taste, and, since observation was
my object, I felt obliged to go on.
The scene became gradually more rural as we
receded from the regions of rare splendor, which
I have been attempting to describe. Cottages now
appeared, roofed with golden thatch, and enriched
with mosses, like silk-plush; every casement was
curtained with veined ivy, satin-leaved, and every
door surrounded with its group of lovely mothers,
and children whom Sir Thomas Lawrence could
not have rendered more bewitchingly beautiful.
Odors of ineffable purity and power filled the
transparent
atmosphere; gushing streams of crystal
water
sparkled and whispered along beds of silver
sand, on whose borders the sportive infant slaked
his thirst from cups of agate and ivory.
As we stopped, for a moment, to contemplate this
scene, I felt that the heat of the day and the
excitement
of my feelings had rendered me
inconveniently
thirsty, and I made this an apology for
alighting, and entering one of these poetical
paradises
,
to ask one of its lovely inmates forI tried
in vain for a redeeming paraphrasea drink. I
had only time to cast a hasty glance around at the
exquisite symmetry and neatness with which the
few articles required by a life of Arcadian
simplicity
were arranged, when a brimming goblet
of the sparkling water was presented, with a deep
reverence, by a girl of seraphic beauty. After this
refreshment, I had no decent excuse for remaining
longer, and I was preparing to remount the
vehicle
,
which I then, for the first time, observed to
have been fresh painted and resplendently
varnished
,
and in short made to correspond in some
degree with the scenery through which it was
passing
,
while old Dobbin and Dagon had new coats
well brushed, and harness which gave back, at every
point, with interest, the rays of the burning sun.
But ere I had placed my foot on the step, no longer
mud-incrusted, but glowing with Brussels carpet,
a voice from one of those charming mothers
arrested
my course.
Lovely lady! she began,and my ears were
too sweetly enchanted to allow of disputing the
propriety of the expression,lovely lady, will
you let my Coralie look for one moment at your
glasses?
Who could hesitate? In an instant the precious
loan of my friend was intrusted to the dimpled
fingers of an infant cherub; in another,lay
scattered in a million of fragments on the ground!
Well! I swan! exclaimed the mamma, giving
a round box on the ear to a dirty little urchin;
what made you let the little hussy have your
specs?
I raised my aching eyes to her face, and stood
speechless. Why should I describe the dingy
locks,the check-apron,the shoeless feet of
the object of my admiration! Why picture anew
a tumble-down log-house, with its appropriate
perfumes
of milk-emptins, bread, and fried onions?
Why speak of Dobbin and Dagon, shorn of their
beams, and lopping down their heads, to crop the
scrub-oaks, which surrounded them, or of the old
wagon, patched and mended more than enough, yet
requiring more patching and mending?
It is needless to dwell on these particulars. It
is painful to tell of log-causeways, now seeming far
rougher than of old, or of rustic maidens, looking
coarse only by contrast with the illusions of the
past. Homeward I took my melancholy way,
resolutely closing my eyes upon prospects of merely
ordinary beauty, which I knew would be, for the
present, divested even of their real charms, and
concluding in my own mind it would be better to
content myself with seeing with my own eyes.
And after all, where would be the use of giving a
very flowery description, unless I could be sure that
such of my readers as might be attracted to see for
themselves could be furnished with patent glorifiers
too? Upon the whole, I have concluded to be
satisfied
without pleasing every body.
This journey may have been only a dream, but
if so, it certainly contained, like some other dreams,
much of the inner life of things.
VOL. I. 3
CHAPTER III.
Let's take the world as some wide scene,
Through which, in frail but buoyant boat,
With skies now dark and now serene,
Together thou and I must float.
Moore
.
As
, in this fitful and fancy-led world, it is
prudent
to secure one faithful and confidential friend,
rather than to seek to be generally beloved, so it is
better for one who is desirous of communicating
thoughts and impressions which have proved
interesting
to himself, but which may yet possess little
intrinsic value, to aim steadily at pleasing a single
reader,to seek for the sympathy of one alone,
to throw himself upon the indulgence of an
individual
,
rather than hope to interest the
undistinguishing
crowd. We are all apt to be cross or stupid
sometimes,how delightful to be so with
impunity
!
And if we
have
any bright moments, how
pleasant to feel that we are making some amends
to the dear patient soul who has borne our vagaries
with unruffled brow!
It is on this principle that I have resolved to
write solely for that generous being who was so
easily pleased with the earlier history of Montacute;
who entered so readily into our moving difficulties
and disappointments; who laughed so heartily at
our new-country expedients, and bore our
grumblings
with such unexampled equanimity. To
you exclusively then, O best of readers! to you
whose tried kindness encourages me to speak out
my whole mind, without fear of reproach or
ridicule
,
are the following pages addressed. Let a
league be established between us at the outset,
a league offensive and defensive. Bear with me
when I am dull, and take my part when I am
abused, and I, on the other hand, will wink at your
napping over my best stories, and maintain your
infallible taste against all challengers. Is it agreed?
I read in your intelligent smile an answer favorable
to my undertaking; so I begin without dread of
unfriendly criticism.
Shall we venture to unite the new thread with
the old? to take up our portfolio just as we laid
it down, and continue in the old strain our
desultory
notices of the village and its vicinity?
New-country
customs and ways of thinking favor such
an arrangement of our materials, for we consider
twenty miles round only a moderate extent of
neighborhood,a fact which must in all reason be
supposed to prevent every approach to a narrow
and contracted view of things. And indeed I must
protest against being limited even to this liberal
allowance of scope, since I mean the history of one
settlement to include that of many others. My
daguerreotype is of a new and improved construction,
making nothing of distance, so there be only plenty
of sunshine, and no intervening mists.
But though I have named the daguerreotype, it
must be acknowledged that the restless,
ever-shifting
character of our population would make a
faithful chronicle of their doings bear no small
resemblance to the phantasmagoria exhibited by
that pretty scientific toy, the magic-lantern; for
our neighbors seem bit with the strange madness
of ceaseless transit, flitting mostly westward, like
ghosts that shun the coming day. Some of them
not a few indeedare now living on their third
or fourth Western farm;successive purchases
and residences in scarcely more than a
corresponding
number of years. The effect of this blundering
search after happiness is what might be expected.
One would think they must have vowed
themselves
to a nomadic life, and, as a natural
consequence
,
renounced all the dear delights of home;
all idea of providing domestic comforts; all interest
in public improvements; all local attachments and
neighborly sympathies. These have indeed the
true spirit of pioneers, and their peculiarity of taste
has done much to expedite the rapid settlement of
the wilds. They purchase a lot or two of
government
land; build a log-house, fence a dozen
acres or so, plough half of them, girdle the trees,
and then sell out to a new comer; one whose less
resolute spirit has perhaps quailed a little before
the difficulties of the untouched forest. The
pioneer
is then ready for a new purchase, a new
clearing
,
and a new sale. How his wife and children
enjoy themselves meanwhile is matter of small
doubt, but this is a trifle for the present. The
futurethe bright, far-ahead, vague Western
future
is
to make up for all. The eager adventurer,
unscared by difficulty, undiscouraged by
disappointment
,
still chases airy good, contenting himself
with mere existence
en attendant,
forgetting that
only to-day is his own.
There was at one time some show of reason in
all this; so profitable was the flitting plan during
the early speculating times, that many who began
with an eighty only, found themselves, after a
few such changes, possessed of great farms,
whether of stock or implements in proportion
may be another question,but landthe grand
object of ambitionwas easily tripled by those
who were able to turn their strength and hardihood
to account in breaking the way for the less
adventurous
.
Now the case is far different, and the
advantages
of these frequent changes are not always
evident to the unconcerned spectator.
Nor is the spirit of change evinced in migratory
habits only. Horses, oxen, wagons, carts, are
equally subject to mutation. Some people scarce
ever have the same for six months at a time. I do
not observe that such of our community as are
especially attached to this system, grow rich any
3*
faster than the less enterprising, but they never
seem to doubt that each change is for the better.
Any thing for a trade, is a common expression.
We have seen the scrip or certificate for eight
hundred
acres of soldiers' bounty land, lying in some
far south-western region, sold for ten sheep; and
in a week resold for a drove of cattle,each
dealer well satisfied with his bargain. A
broken-down
hack will be exchanged for another
stone-blind
,
to the great chuckling of both parties. This
sort of traffic in horses is, I believe, of foreign origin,
but it would appear to be a thing easily learned.
When regular business is dull, these
entr'acte
proceedings
are more common. They serve to keep
the spirit of trade from stagnation, a state which it
dreads above all others. Not but there are many
among us who are as averse to this shifting plan
as if they had been born and bred under the shadow
of the dikes of the king of Hollandbut the
enterprising
,
being the majority, rule the hour. And
it is not to be denied that the quietists, though
willing to follow in the track of the more
adventurous
,
would never have penetrated and ploughed
this wide-spread and teeming land, so lately the
home of the deer, the bear, and the wild wolf, now
fast becoming one wide expanse of industry and
abundance.
Our little village has of course been affected, like
the rest of the Western world, by the depressed
state of the times. It has not increased with the
gourd-like suddenness, which marked the upward
career of such settlements a few years ago. Every
thing but the outpouring abundance of mother
Earth has dwindled and looked blighted since the
great commercial revulsion which succeeded the
land-mania. Even our little, isolated, unimportant
village was not too insignificant to be swept by the
skirts of the great whirlwind; and distancesnot
magnificent, like those of our seat of
government
,but
simply blank and bare, or cumbered
with oak-brush, intervene between the houses even
in the business part of the place. Buildings
are still less ostentatious in size than formerly;
fences content themselves without pickets, and paint
is forgotten by general consent. Corn-cribs and
pigsties
are as large, andtruth to sayas well
filled as ever; but they are made of slender
tamarack
poles, which need no cost of sawing. The
men wear their old coats; the women turn and
alter their faded dresses; and the children are
taught that it is wholesome to go barefoot. In
short, if the axiom that economy is wealth,
have any value, we are all in a fair way to be rich,
and as soon as we are rich, we all intend to be
very happy indeed.
CHAPTER IV.
We were not made to wander on the wing,
But, if we would be happy, we must bring
Our buoyed hearts to a plain and simple school.
Percival.
Next
to talking about ourselves, the pleasantest
thing is talking about our neighbors. This is a
fact which every body concedes in general, yet
nobody is willing to apply in particulars; so I trust
I shall secure a reputation for candor by confessing
that my foible (if I have one) is love of gossip.
I am no great tea-drinker, nor yet an immoderate
snuffer; I am not able to knit a stocking during a
ride of ten miles on a hard-trotting horse; nor have
I ever taken geese away from home to pick rather
than refuse an invitation for an afternoon visit. So
there are people that excel me in the true tokens
of gossipry,yet I am a hopeful scholar. If we
should ever establish an Order of the Golden
Cricket, or any other sociable sisterhood, in these
parts, I shall be a candidate for secondary honors
at least. I know who will have the Grand Cross
and Collar.
Now, if there be a propensity in the feminine
nature on which it is barbarous to place any
restriction
,
it is this. What should we say of the
man who should rivet down the safety-valve of a
steamer? Should we not hold him accountable
for all the mischiefs that might follow? Or of him
that should build a mill-dam, and omit the
flood-gate
?
Ought he not to pay for all the fences that
might be carried off by the consequent inundation?
My former sketches were of the safety-valve and
flood-gate kind. They were the overflowings of a
reservoir of new sights, new sounds, and new
notions
.
They wrote themselves, so to speak. They
were First Impressionswhich, by the bye,
is the most fortunate title ever yet devised for a
book of travels. First impressions are the only
ones worth recording for the amusement or
enlightenment
of those who stay at home; and they must
be arrested on the instant, or they lose their sparkle.
It is in vain, after new things have become familiar,
to attempt to make them amusing. The bead is
gone forever.
After all that is said of the influence of habit, I
was never fully aware of its power until after some
residence in the new country. I never knew or
believed that the oddest, most inconvenient, or even
odious customs, the most incorrect modes of speech,
and the most incongruous jumbling of all that
ought to be kept separate, could have become so
familiar as to be almost forgotten. I had supposed
that whatever might be the opposing influences
around us, our own views, and the imperious
requisitions
of our habits, would continue to wage war
with every particular of the new life. Such a
change is at first so violent that we might apply to
it some of the characteristics of the final one:
a separation from all that has hitherto engaged or
delighted us; a change not only of the place, but
of the manner of our being; an entrance into a
state not only which we know not, but which
perhaps
we have not faculties to know;yet it is
only while the novelty lasts that these things strike
us with that vividness, which prompts us to
describe
them. At first nothing is more natural than
to think and speak of the contrasts that are
shocking
us at every turn, but a few years' familiarity
with what we dislike makes it nearly indifferent.
As far as modes of speech are concerned, we find
ourselves much more likely to adopt unconsciously
the quaint and incorrect expressions that assail our
ears in daily intercourse, than to inspire our
neighbors
with a desire for habits of greater correctness;
and after this assimilation takes place, we do not
recollect to describe what at first seemed so odd. I
confess myself to have become too much
Westernized
to be a competent painter of Western
peculiarities
.
Still, there is enough to say; but, bless me!
when I attempt to draw fancy-pictures, bearing only
some general resemblance to particular classes of the
human family, I am horror-stricken to find myself
a Mephistopheles. Every creation of my not very
lively imagination instantly becomes a living,
breathing
,
and very angry reality. Shadows adopt
substance
,
and forthwith avenge themselves upon this
unlucky potency of mine, by looking hideous, and
shaking their unkempt locks at me as if I were
really in league with the arch-enemy! What is to
be done in such a case? Can one hope to be
agreeable in such disagreeable company? Did
Damocles eat his dinner with his usual
self-complacency
after he discovered the suspended sword?
Having in vain tried all my little power of
exorcism
on these unquiet spirits, I take this
opportunity
to declare that all the naughty and unpleasant
peopleall the tattlers and mischief-makers,all
the litigious,all the quarrelsome,all the
expectorant
,all
the unneat,all the unhandsome,
have emigrated to Iowa, Wiskonsan, or Texas,
or some other far distant land, to this deponent
unknown; and that there is not
meo
periculo
one
single specimen of any of these classes
remaining in this wide peninsula. So that any
description of such characters which I may hazard
in future must be mere phantoms of the brain, and
cannot have been drawn from real life within these
bounds. Some subjects being thus precluded, I
shall content myself with offering such general
sketches of life and its chances and changes, as
shall exempt me from any charge of being too
correct
or too sincere; avoiding thus the sour glances
of the conscious and the critical, though at the
expense
of some little amusement to my chosen
friend and constant ally, the reader.
Of the adventurous spirits who cast in their lot
with us at the beginning, few have been content
with our jog-trot rate of advancement. A large
proportion of this class have been, as we have said,
attracted by the alluring prospects held forth by
the West, and have started off at a tangent,
determined
to see with their own eyes grass growing
higher than a giant's head, and fields of corn
through which a mounted horseman might
gallop
unobserved. These and many other things of
similar character they went to see. They have
not come back to tell us what they did see; but
some of them who left their land under mortgage
having forgotten to send money to make the
requisite
payments, we conclude they must have seen a
great deal that was very interesting, or they would
not have been so oblivious. Peace be with them!
Wiskonsan or Iowa will doubtless profit by our
loss, since states are nothing without men.
The successors of these original settlers (and some
of them have already had a succession of
successors
)
we, who have been here four or five years,
look upon as new peoplemere mushrooms;
and we are slow in admitting them to our
confidence
,
except they dress uncommonly well or own
more stock than usual. This of course alters the
case, for we are all apt to believe with the
merchant-princes
of one of our great cities, that the
mere possession of property necessarily implies
some kind of merit. Fortunately our belief in this
great principle is not put to any very severe test,
since we have no reason to suspect that any of our
new neighbors got their cows or horses by piracy,
or even by slave-driving. They are emphatically
nice people, and present a sufficient variety of
characteristics; so that we think we shall like them
very well if they will stay long enough for our
present favorable impressions to take root.
Of outward changes, the tax-gatherer, as he
paces on his tall gray steed our roomy avenues,
can trace but few,of public improvements still
fewer. Times of general discouragement, when
the entire spirit of the country is lowered by the
stagnation of commerce, and such depression of
prices that the labor of the husbandman becomes
an almost hopeless toil, are not those when what
is popularly termed public spirit is wont to be very
warmly evinced in any community, least of all in
those which, during the most favorable times, know
superfluity only by name. Smile not, kindest
reader, at this somewhat formal apology for the
homely and primitive aspect of our vicinity. We
are of much more importance in our own eyes than
we are in yours, and we choose not to have our
case considered an isolated instance, but rather as a
part of the great whole.
While the great tide of emigration was rolling
westward, its waves, though finding their limit far
beyond us, still added something in their course to
our population and our prosperity. But at present,
VOL. I. 4
if we see now and then a great wagon with its load
of household utensils,bedsteads walling up the
sides,a washing-tub turned up to serve as a seat
for the driver,a bundle of window-sash sticking
out behind, surmounted by a new broom or two,
pots and kettles dangling below,bundles of beds
and bedding tied up in coverlets, enthroning
children
of all the smaller sizes,a rocking-chair
topping all,we do not expect to see it make a
final stop in our Main Street. We know that it is
destined for the deep woods far beyond us, and we
conjecture that the stout farmer who guides the
whole
cortge,
including perhaps cattle, sheep, and
hogs, driven by the boys on foot, has tired of his
Michigan farm, and is going out to the diggings
in Illinois, Wiskonsan, or Iowa. He only stops
long enough at our hotel to refresh his weary
wife and children, and to buy provisions for a
further
march, and then bravely sets forth again, to
eat and sleep in the woods as long as may be
necessary. If you should ask him why he thus
forsakes all that most of us think worth living for,
he would tell you perhaps that he thinks there is
more room at the West; that a poor man can get
along better where there is not so many folks; and
that he can get twice as much good land for his
boys where the country is quite new. If you ask
his wife how she likes the change, she will try
perhaps to put the best face on the matter, and say
that she hated to break up, but th' old man thought
he could do better for the children;or if she be
of the more timid and gentle nature, (as there are
indeed many in this rough West,) she will answer
with silent tears, which however will be carefully
concealed from her husband. Such have indeed a
hard lot before them. But to return to ourselves.
Our school-house still serves all denominations
as a place of worship, and its walls, venerable with
the gathered blackness of two years, have had as
yet no taste of paint. The various lawsuits, to
which its location, construction, erection, and
furnishing
,
gave rise being still undecided, the building
remains an object of the first interest. The library
which ought to decorate its western wall is still
unpurchased, nor have I heard any thing lately said
of an appropriation for the purpose. Nor is there a
tree yet planted whose shade may soften to the
rising generation the fervors of the noon-spell. It
is sometimes a term of reproach among us in
speaking
of a silly fellow, that he is not half baked:
our district scholars may all be wise, if baking
have any efficacy.
Various masters and mistresses have swayed
the sceptre of the infant realm; the men in
winter
,
the young ladies in summer;alternating on
the interesting plan of the tenants of the
weather-house
.
I was proceeding to speak of the
improvement
evident in the manners of the young hopes,
but that little rogue in the red and black striped
cap just then threw a snow-ball against my
window
,
and I resolved not to say any thing about it
at present.
One of the teachersa fair, slender girl of
eighteen or thereaboutswas to every one an
object
of peculiar interest. She was soft-voiced and
dark-eyed, with a most lady-like quietness of
manner
,
and a temper which could not be disturbed
even by a school. Her home was at no great
distance
,
and her parents, though highly respectable
and well-educated, found it not easy to make
comfortable
provision for a very numerous family; so
Miranda, being the eldest, volunteered, for the
meanest
conceivable stipend,scarce more than
sufficient
to furnish her own unpretending dress,to
undertake the wearisome task of drilling lisping
tongues through the long hours of a sultry summer.
She soon began to fade. She was always cheerful;
ever answering with a pleasant smile your
questions
about her health, her decreasing waist, and
narrowing chest;but she declined evidently and
rapidly. She had intervals of delusive hope; but
after months of suffering and heavenly resignation,
we had at last the melancholy task of arraying her
for the grave, and carrying her home to her father's
in her coffin. She came of a consumptive race,
they said, but I could not help fearing that
confinement
to a sedentary employment, and the lack of
the ordinary amusements and gratifications of
youth, had some share in removing her so early.
I have seen so many heart-rending instances of a
similar kind, that I always tremble for young girls
who undertake such a difficult and trying office
while the constitution is yet unconfirmed.
If our dear young friend's life was a sad and
short one, her death at least was all light and love;
and like a dew-drop, first sparkling in the morning
sun and then exhaled by its beams, she seemed to
our watching eyes to be gradually absorbed in the
great Fountain of purity and blessedness; so
gradually
that the change from an earthly to a heavenly
state was scarce perceptible. May her closing,
scene be ours!
4*
CHAPTER V.
Our doom is near: behold, from east to west
The skies are darkened by ascending smoke;
Each hill and every valley is become
An altar unto Mammon and the gods
Of man's idolatrythe victims we.
Cole.
I wish
our people cared more for the beautiful!
I do wish that simple and inexpensive recreation
entered into their plan of life, if it were only in the
shape of pleasant, shaded walks, where young girls
and children whose feelings still have the natural
leaning towards harmless pleasure, might spend
some of the long hours of our short summer. If
the experiment were once madeif there were such
resources for the young, I cannot help thinking
that their elders, who have been willing scholars
to the creed that this is only a working world,
would learn in time a better philosophy, even that
the bow unbent when out of use is the one which
will be longest fit for service. These opinions are
heretical, I know. There is a sort of vague notion
that only the dissipated and the irreligious can
possibly
covet amusement of any kind, and the
practical
effect of this notion is in many cases absurd
beyond belief. But I began without the most
remote
intention of scolding, and this tirade was
elicited only by a passing thought connected with
the subject which was in fact uppermost in my
mind.
Though our public square was intended to
become in time the glory of our village, it is still
in a state of nature,unsubdued, as the
agriculturist
,
with an unconscious poeticalness, is wont to
describe that condition; and this is at once the
effect of the hard times before mentioned, and of
that indifference to ornament and amusement which
is a prominent characteristic of our people. If this
bare, open space had been neatly fenced, provided
with seats and planted with trees, four years ago,
but it was not, and I dare say never will be.
The only alteration it has undergone was the work
of a passing flock of sheep, which sowed it thickly
with Canada thistles, with which their fleeces were
abundantly stored. These have yielded a crop
sufficient to supply all the country round, and an
unfortunate feature in the affair seems to be that
the authorities cannot agree as to whose business
it is to cut them down. The subject is annually
discussed until the seed begins to fly, and then
abandoned as being disposed of for the present.
A similar difficulty occurs with respect to the
planting of shade-trees on this debatable land.
We cannot approach unanimity in deciding what
kinds we shall select, in what order they shall be
placed, or in what manner protected, so that
blackened
stumps are likely to continue the sole
ornaments
of our Prado.
Would I could hope that the fine remnants of
the original forest that still remain to us, were to
be allowed foothold on this roomy earth. They
too must fall ere long before the irresistible
influence
of public opinion. The Western settler
looks upon these earth-born columns and the
verdant
roofs and towers which they support, as heavy
timber,nothing more. He sees in them only
obstacles which must be removed, at whatever
sacrifice
,
to make way for mills, stores, blacksmiths'
shops,perhaps churches,certainly taverns.
Clearing is his daily thought and nightly dream;
and so literally does he act upon this guiding idea,
that not one tree, not so much as a bush, of natural
growth, must be suffered to cumber the ground, or
he fancies his work incomplete. The very notion
of advancement, of civilization, of prosperity, seems
inseparably connected with the total extirpation of
the forest.
Le bucheron Amricain,
said the keen-witted
Talleyrand,
le bucheron Amricain ne s'intresse
rien; toute ide sensible est loin de lui. Ces
branches si lgamment jetes par la Natureun
beau feuillageune couleur vive qui anime une
partie du bois, un vert plus fort qui en assombroit
une autre,tout cela n'est rien; il n'a de souvenir
placer nulle part; c'est la quantit de
coups de
hache
qu'il faut qu'il donne pour abattre une arbre,
qui est son unique ide. Il n'a point plant; il n'en
sait point les plaisirs. L'arbre qu'il planteroit n'est
bon pour rien pour lui; car jamais il ne la verra
assez fort pour qu'il puisse l'abattre.
1
1.
The backwoodsman of America feels no interest in any thing; ideas
connected with sentiment are foreign to his nature. Those branches so
elegantly disposed by naturesplendid foliagethe brilliant colors
which animate one part of the wood, the deeper green which gives a
touch of sadness to anotherall is nothing to him; he has no
associations
with any thing; the number of blows with the axe which he must
bestow in felling a tree is his only idea. He has never plantedhe
knows not the pleasure of planting. A tree which he should plant
would be good for nothing to him, for it would never grow large enough
to be felled by his hand.
In preparing for a residence in the wilderness it
is really ludicrous to observe the warm opposition
made by every strong-armed agent of one's plans,
against leaving a scattered remnant of the forest
by way of shelter to the rude dwelling. Though
one might suppose the matter would be quite
indifferent
where only the taste of another is
concerned
,
yet this is far from being the case. So
inveterate
is the prejudice that an angry battle must be
fought for every tree. Pretended blunders
accidents
all
stratagems will be resorted to in order
to get rid of those marked for preservation; and
the few that one may succeed in retaining by dint
of watching and scolding, become the frequent
subject of wondering remark: Well! I
should
think there was oak-trees enough without keeping
'em in a body's door-yard! Jus' like the woods!
However, we as yet enjoy the privilege which
belongs to nooks and corners whose insignificance
protects them in some degree from the influence of
public opinion. We are still lulled to sleep by
the plaintive iteration of the whippoorwill. We
can still occasionally catch the wild note of the
owl as he chides the moon from his nest in the
hollow tree; and we hear with ever-new delight the
welcome with which the thousand songsters of
morning hail the approach of the sun. There is still
leafy shelter enough for multitudes of pretty
flutterers
of all hues and sizes; and even the bare girdled
oaks which still abound on the farm of our thriving
neighbor Ainsworth afford homes for the feathered
tribes. Not only are their gaunt branches
occasionally
blackened by immense flocks of pigeons or
blackbirds, but their knotty outline is rendered
more grotesque by the frequent nest of the
red-headed
woodpecker, which delights in such rough
locations. This busy creaturegaudy as an
Indian, but far more thriftythough the most
inoffensive
of bores, will yet sometimes contrive to
discompose one; for it is almost impossible to
distinguish
the screwing of his bony auger from the
creaking of a gate left to swing in the summer
wind; and the idea of intrusive pigs and
demolishing
cows is apt to break the reveries of country
people very unpleasantly.
Yet I, for one, shall regret even the girdled trees,
sad remembrancers of past shade and freshness; of
morning readings, and it may be of noon-tide
naps;of evening rambles and next-day agues.
One would rather have girdled trees than none, and
it seems a long time to wait till our locusts and
horse-chestnuts grow.
One darling tree,a giant oak which looked as
if half a dozen Calibans might have been pegged
in its knotty entrailsthis one tree, the
grandfather
of the forest, we thought we had saved.
It stood a little apart,it shadowed no man's land,
it shut the broiling sun from nobody's windows,
so we hoped it might be allowed to die a natural
death. But one unlucky day, a family fresh from
the 'hio removed into a house which stood at
no great distance from this relic of primeval
grandeur
.
These people were but little indebted to
fortune, and the size of their potato-patch did not
exactly correspond with the number of rosy cheeks
within doors. So the loan of a piece of ground
was a small thing to ask or to grant. Upon this
piece of lent land stood our favorite oak. The
potatoes
were scarcely peeping green above the soil,
when we observed that the great boughs which we
looked at admiringly a dozen times a day, as they
towered far above the puny race around them,
remained distinct in their outline, instead of
exhibiting
the heavy masses of foliage which had
usually clothed them before the summer heats
began
.
Upon nearer inspection it was found that
our neighbor had commenced his plantation by the
operation of girdling the tree, for which favor he
expected our thanks, observing pithily that
nothing
wouldn't never grow under sich a great
mountain
as that! It is well that Goth and
Vandal
are not actionable.
Yet the felling of a great tree has something of
the sublime in it. When the axe first falls on the
trunk of a stately oak laden with the green wealth
of a century, or a pine whose aspiring peak might
look down on a moderate church steeple, the
contrast
between the puny instrument and the gigantic
result to be accomplished approaches the ridiculous.
But as the eagle towering in his pride of place,
was by a mousing owl hawked at and killed, so
the leaf-crowned monarch of the wood has no
small reason to quiver at the sight of a long-armed
Yankee approaching his deep-rooted trunk with an
awkward axe. One blow seems to accomplish
nothing: not even a chip falls. But with another
stroke comes a broad slice of the bark, leaving an
ominous, gaping wound. Another pair of blows
extends the gash, and when twenty such have
fallen
,
behold a girdled tree. This would suffice to
kill, and a melancholy death it is; but to fell is
quite another thing. The
coups de hache
now fall
thicker and fasteronly on opposite sides however,
not all round the trunk, as before. Two deep
incisions are made, yet the towering crown sits firm
as ever. And now the destroyer pauses,fetches
breath,wipes his beaded brow,takes a wary
view of the bearings of the tree,and then with a
low and watchful care recommences his work. The
strokes fall doubtingly, and many a cautious glance
is cast upward, for the whole immense mass now
trembles, as if instinct with life, and conscious of
approaching ruin. Another blow! it wavesa
groaning sound is heardsomething like that
which struck the ear of the gallant Tancred:
Un suon che flebile concento
Par d'umani sospiri e di singulti;
E un non so che confuso instilla al core
Di pieta, di spavento, e di dolore.
2
2.
A sighing, sobbing sound,
Which breathes of human woe, and to the heart
Brings whispers vague of pity, terror, grief.
Yet another stroke is necessary. It is given with
desperate force, and the tall peak leaves its place
with an easy sailing motion accelerated every
instant
till it crashes prone on the earth, sending far
and wide its scattered branches, and letting in the
sunlight upon the cool, damp, mossy earth, for the
first time perhaps in half a century.
If moralizing were in fashion, how quaintly one
might string wise saws on the vast results of
persevering
effort!
VOL. I. 5
CHAPTER VI.
And early, ere the odorous breath of morn
Awakes the slumbering leaves, or tasselled horn
Shakes the high thicket, haste I all about,
Number my ranks, and visit every sprout.
Milton.
Mrs. Ainsworth
has been to York state. Nor is
this all,though such events do not often befall
us,but she has brought back as much of the
show as she could carry, and enriches our ears with
glowing accounts of all the wonders she saw and
heard. She set out a desperate utilitarian. Her
sleeves were only rationally largeher bonnet
only moderately fashionable, and she wondered,
for her part, how people could be so foolish as to
care about such nonsense. She believed in being
accommodating; would cut from the butter-plate
with her own knife, and dip her tea-spoon times
and again into the dish of preserves intended for
the whole company, without a misgiving. If a
wash basin was required, she could not see where
was the harm of using for that purpose the bowl,
which would in a few minutes be on duty on the
breakfast table, and she did not mind mislaying
her pocket-handkerchief, since an apron did just as
well for her. She always washed and combed in
the kitchen, though she had a bedroom adjoining,
and she considered it amiable to appropriate the
space under her bed to her husband's best boots, a
spare bridle or two, and the saddle when it
happened
to be at home: it was so handy.
Her good man was so much of her mind that he
thought the true and sole use of a garden was to
raise onions and cabbages; and he went even a
little beyond her, and ploughed up every spring
the rose-bushes and lilacs with which she had
decorated her posy-yard, saying that he could
not tell one kind of
brush
from another.
But, dear me! how things are changed now!
Mrs. Ainsworth's heart is removed to the right
side. She made so long a visit among her Eastern
friends, who are now fore-handed folks, that
she has come back imbued most satisfactorily with
a loving appreciation of the advantages of
civilization
.
In dress, she is even ultra, according to our
sober ideas. The little wreaths of flowers which
decorate her cap, meet under her chin, and
mingling
there with certain dangling blonde ringlets,
give her face no slight resemblance to that of the
individual with the flowing beard who used to
figure in the school-books as saying,
Pity the sorrows of a poor old man!
the sleeves out-bishop any body, and she is never
without a neck-chain, to which we are bound to
believe a watch is appended.
Then her tablehere the change is all for the
better
since
what table can be too neatly arranged?
The dishes are marshalled with military precision,
and, when tea and talk rule the hour, a
plat
of
preserves
is sure to appear in the van, flanked on one
side by a pile of little plates, and on the other by a
reserve of tea-spoons. No more fishing in public
property with one's own spoon! No more
fragmentary
specimens of the different sorts of food
edging the cut side of the pat of butter! Mrs.
Ainsworth would be ready to faint if any body
should reach across the table to plunge his dripping
tea-spoon into the sugar dish, to supply a deficiency
in his tea. Not but that her husband still
occasionally
transgresses, in spite of curtain lectures;
but he will come round in time, since neatness like
truth is mighty, especially when urged only by
good-humor.
But improvement is no less evident in the
garden
than in the house and its mistress. Mrs.
Ainsworth
returned in the autumn and brought a load
of treasures of this sort; the greater part useful,
some only ornamental. And without a murmur,
though no doubt with some suppressed groans, did
Mr. Ainsworth delay his wheat-sowing until roses
and honey-suckles, and peonies and tulips, with
multitudes of their fair or fragrant brethren, were
duly committed to the bounteous soil. Walks were
laid out, and currant-brush planted; and great
beds of Alpine strawberries, and whole thickets of
Antwerp raspberries, took the place of fireweed and
sorrel, grubs and dwarf-willows. So excellent an
example will, it is to be hoped, wake up the whole
village.
We ought all to have good gardens by this time,
but then we have so much else to do. Wheat and
indian corn, and oats, and buckwheat turn directly
into one's pocket; lilacs and lilies, and even
cauliflower
and celery, are mere superfluities, and we
are a practical people. The tomato has hitherto
been considered heathenish and abominable;
asparagus
useful only to put above the looking-glass
as a fly-trap. These things are common enough in
the older settlements, but we are only just
beginning
.
Many currant and raspberry bushes have been
planted, and they have shown a disposition to thrive
most luxuriantly. But the cows will get in once
in a while and eat them off, which checks their
growth sadly. And besides, the birds, free
commoners
by prescriptive righthaving been
accustomed
to a boundless range of bushes of all kinds,
just where our little clearing now usurps their
place, make no scruple of helping themselves
without
stint or measure to our half-formed fruits; and
so numerous are they that it would seem in vain
to attempt planting for them and ourselves too.
Strawberries however grow without planting, and
this is the sort of gardening that most of us like
best. These are so abundant that in the spring the
very road-sides are damasked with their silver
blossoms
,
5*
and in their ripe season the foot of the
passing
traveller crushes them every where on the
uncultivated
uplands and on the moist borders of the
marshes. It is however on fields that have been
once ploughed that we find them in their greatest
perfection. This rude sort of cultivation
doubles
their size without impairing their exquisite
flavor
.
Transplanting them to your garden seems to
affect them as a change from rural to city life does
some people. They branch out into splendid
foliage
,
but bear good fruit more sparingly than
before
.
All the fruits that ever grow in northern
climates, including even the peach, have been
successfully
cultivated throughout this state. The
apple attains great perfection, as is usual on this
side the ocean, in these latitudes, and even in
those somewhat farther north. Plumssuch as
grow on trees, not in pocketsare becoming very
abundant; and cherries are already so in the more
advanced settlements, and promise well in the new.
Pears, those terribly slow bearers, have reached
perfection
only where planted by the old French
inhabitants
of the regions in the vicinity of Detroit
River, where, we are told, some trees are still
productive
,
which are known to be centenarians.
The peach and the apricot,especially the former,
which is so much the most valuable,grow well
and bear abundantly; but the fruit is very liable to be
cut off by the sneaping frosts which sometimes
occur so late in the spring as to nip the trees when
in full blossom, and sweep their garlands from the
boughs. Yet we have seen noble specimens of
this delicious fruit raised in Michigan; and as
greenhouses and nurseries abound, and men skilled
in such mysteries are not wanting, we have high
hopes for future desserts.
But to finish our notice of Mrs. Ainsworth. She
has not only provided for the kitchen-garden, but
ventured upon a little stand of exotics for the
parlor
.
And there is a rumor,a floating report,
(and they say where there is smoke there must be
some fire,) that Mrs. Ainsworth has a plan for an
underground conservatory, to be constructed on the
south side of a little descent which slopes
obliquely
near her house. This extravagance is not
expected
to be more than six feet square, but I am
sure it will hold acres of happiness. I would not
wish to have it mentioned however. Let her break
the matter to her husband herself.
Connected with this same notion of acres of
happiness a thought suggests itself. Our
neighbor
has just made a large addition to her innocent
enjoyment, by means of the improvements in her
garden. Now suppose her in the course of a year
or two to come into the possession of a handsome
establishment, such as may be found in this
Western
worlda garden containing a couple of acres
a corresponding variety of plants; a good
greenhouse
,
and people competent to keep such things
in order. There would then be no weeding in the
morning, and coming in to breakfast well draggled
with dew(none for the lady, I mean)no
transplanting in showery weather armed with a
pointed stick, and so shrouded in an old bonnet,
thick shoes, and dirty gloves, that her own
husband
will scarcely own herno solicitude about
any of the contingencies on which depends the
success of so much care and labor. To walk about
and enjoy what has been done, and question the
gardener as to what
may
be doneand to feel
very sure that he will object to whatever she
wishes to donow constitute her gardening
pleasures
.
We will go on still further, and suppose good
Mrs. Ainsworth made, in process of time, the
mistress
of such a garden as may be found in the
neighborhood of any of our Eastern cities. Here,
American wealth shall have done its utmost, and
extensive graperies and pineries, with all things on
a corresponding scale of expenditure, shall court
the charmed eye of the delighted guest;the
lady herself having risen in condition and manners
accordingly.
Thus far all is easily supposed, and would imply
no greater ascent in the scale than has been the lot
of perhaps some of the very proprietors of those
delicious gardens. But we will strain a point, and
see Mrs. Ainsworth, our happy neighbor, pleased
with her little garden, pleased yet more with her
ample one, and thinking that her third and more
elegant one ought to give still greater pleasure; we
will suppose her at last transplanted to the twelve
acre garden at Chatsworth; with a greenhouse at
every turn, and two or three gardeners to every
greenhouse;flower-baskets of cut stone
thirty-two
feet square, and hundreds of people employed
in sweeping every aisle in her spacious
pleasure-grounds
,
that not a stray leaf shall offend her
majestic eye.
Tell us now, O sagacious philosopher! keen
sifter of the human heart and its desires and
enjoyments
,which
of these gardens shall afford the
greatest amount of pleasure to Mrs. Ainsworth?
CHAPTER VII.
The hearts in sun and shadow known
The kind hands lingering in our own
The cords of strong affection spun
By early deeds of kindness done
The blessed sympathies which bind
The spirit to its kindred mind.
Whittier.
Why do the gods indulge our store
But to secure our rest?
Prior.
I know
it is time to say something of our own
selves. In our first attempt at Western sketches,
that good reader for whose eye I write dwelt, I am
sure, longer and more kindly upon what interested
us personally, than upon the more elaborate parts of
our simple narrative. And when after many trials
(of patience) and many hardships (in a small way)
we emerged from the dark precincts of the loggery
into the bright atmosphere of the framed house
exchanged worm-eaten beams for a plastered
ceilingand miniature Rocky Mountains for a
tiled hearthand succeeded in excluding the pigs,
and discovered some amiable traits in the
neighbors
I
know that one kind heart rejoiced with
us, and found a benevolent satisfaction in
prophesying
still better times for the future.
Better times did comethat is, they would have
come, if there had been good times any where.
Better timesso far as our own personal
accommodation
was concerneddid come; and the
sojourn
in the log-house, though ugly and
venomous
enough while it lasted, fulfilled yet the sweet
uses of such things, by giving to very humble
arrangements a charm which they would have
lacked if we had come into possession of the new
abode directly from the city.
The children in particular, to whose minds the
present is every thing, and to whom five months is
a little forever, considered the new house as the
realization of the most romantic dreams of fancy.
They could imagine nothing more convenient or
more elegant. One of them, a tolerably intelligent
child of six years old, had been snapping one of
those detonating mottoes which usually scatter
French sugar-plums and French sentiment together
upon the carpet. She desired an explanation of the
two short lines, which, oddly enough for such a
purpose, ran thus:
Le palais qui presse la terre
Tremble au voix du tonnerre.
3
3.
The splendid pile of massive stone
Must tremble at the thunder's tone.
I could make intelligible the general drift of the
wise saw wrapt in this poetical guise readily
enough; but when I tried to explain familiarly the
word palace my efforts were fruitless. All my
descriptions of a large and elegant mansion elicited
but one exclamation, and we could never get
beyond
that:
What! nicer than
our
house?
Blessed simplicity of youth! Why do we not
strive to perpetuate it? Why are almost our first
practical lessons those of fastidiousness and empty
pridethat living for the eyes of others which
has been so long the censure of the wise?
To desire perfection in every thingto prize
grace, delicacy, beauty, elegance, and even
splendor
,
as gratifications of taste, and as aids to mental
refinement, is rational and commendable. To make
these things, and others that money can purchase,
the ground of distinctions in society and the excuse
for a haughty exclusion of our less fortunate
fellow-creatures
is surely contemptible and unworthy of a
reflecting and accountable being.
I fear those of us who can subscribe to this
sentiment
do not always act in consistency with it.
Republican simplicity, though so evidently the
dictate
of our real interest and the foundation of our
true dignity, is scarcely thought of, except on one
day in every year, when it serves to round a period
for the orator. Yet not one of us is ignorant that
no republic has ever survived the universal
prevalence
of luxurious habits and the blind and weak
pride, which seems to be their inevitable
consequence
.
Ought we not to consider ourselves as
giving a stab to the land we love and the
institutions
we venerate whenever we leap forward in the
race of petty emulation in mere outward show?
But I set out to say something of selfthe
theme on which all are eloquent but none
agreeable
.
To live comparatively alone is apt enough
to make one dreadfully egotisticalbut there is
absolutely nothing to tell. Hopelessly humdrum
has been our course of life. Not an event darkens
our doors once a year. We seem omitted in the
general revolution of human affairs. The world
goes round without us, and if we try to run in
as children do while others are jumping the rope,
we are sure to get a rap over the knuckles, if
nothing
worse.
One solitary incidenta momentary glimpse of
the busy world, where I was so much out of
place, so staring, so rustic, so
brusque,
so oblivious
of the
biensances,
that I had the satisfaction of
being called Mrs. Rip Van Winkle more than
oncethis and this alone gave a ripple to life's
dull stream. It was a marvellous pretty ripplenot
only breaking the monotony of the said stream, but
throwing back so many cheerful gleamsgiving
occasion to so many agreeable reflectionsthat the
mere remembrance will serve to brighten the
lonely
hours of a long winter or two at the very least.
O! it
was
sweet to see again the old, familiar
faces,to hear once more the well-known voices,
whose tones were music in years long past, and
had lost none of their power to charm! to meet
VOL. I. 6
the glance of ancient friendshipto clasp the kind
hand that has so often traced lines of cheering
comfort
for our solitudeto find affection still warm
in the bosom of venerable ageto read in the eyes
of a younger race that tenderness for the long absent
had not been forgotten in the training of their
guileless
heartsand to feel that in spite of absence,
change, sorrow, and disappointment, our own hearts
were still capable of a thrill of grateful pleasure in
answer to all the kindness lavished upon the
returning
wanderers! In the enthusiasm of the moment
I was almost tempted to think years of trial in the
cold atmosphere of a strange land had been repaid
by the delight of that visit.
It was during this crowded dream of enjoyment
that I made the discovery of a change in my own
views, which may be ascribed according to the
reader's humorto natural simplicity or rudeness
to want of means or want of tasteto indolence
or an enforced philosophy;for I will plead guilty
to any thing but a disposition to undervalue
advantages
which I do not possess.
It was a change in my estimate of the splendid
accessories which are so much an object of desire
and ambition among the inhabitants of our cities.
I can refer easily to the time when these things
wore to me the same enchanting aspect which they
seem now to present to their possessors, and still
more to those who can scarcely hope ever to become
their possessors. I too thought large and elegant
houses, trains of servants, and imposing equipages,
if not the constituents of happiness, at least most
potent auxiliaries to earthly bliss. In my darker
estimate of country life, the want of these things
the certainty that they would never be transplanted
to these remote shades, so that I could even take
the spectator's (often the best) part of the show
formed one prominent item of my desponding
prognostics
.
After several years spent among the plainest
people
,
living in the plainest mannerpeople whose
very wishes reached not beyond the most ordinary
comforts and decencies of lifewhat would
naturally
be the effect of a return to scenes of
comparative
splendor, toward which early impressions
had inspired me with respect, if not with envy?
Would the contrast in externals be the most
striking
?
Would the decorated drawing-room, the
delicately fancied carriage with its well-trained
horsesthe triumph of Parisian art in costume
would
these
be likely to awaken the longing sigh
of the dweller in the wilderness?
They were beautiful and in some respects
desirable
,
it is true. We do not grow so obtuse as
not to appreciate in some degree the elegances of
life. But the true attraction lay in the aspect of
society itselfin the thousand graces of manner
which are unknown in ruder atmospheres; in the
refinement of sentiment; in the display of
thoroughbred
intellectual power; in the moral and not the
physical contrast which is exhibited between life
in the city and life in the woods; in the people
and not in their style of living. The magnificent
edifices of the great city awake in no low degree
the admiration of the exiles; but her painters, her
sculptors, her musicians, her men of letters, her
poets, her preachersher monuments of genius
and of artthese filled the soul even to the pain
of pleasure, and in these lay the points of difference
which alone appeared, for the time, worthy of
notice.
So great has been the power of habit in
simplifying
our wants and reducing their number, that
many things which are considered essential to
comfort among those who make modes of life a
study and a science, appeared to us absolutely
cumbersome and harassing. Mr. Edgeworth is
said to have collected, in his family mansion at
Edgeworthtown, so many ingenious contrivances
to spare his visitors every kind of trouble, that
people were puzzled and put to great inconvenience
by the multiplication of conveniences. It seemed
to me that some of our city friends had fallen into
a kindred error. They have secured so many of
the comforts and luxuries of life, that life is itself
expended in the solicitudes attendant upon such
extensive and costly arrangements. In our country,
where good domestic service is scarcely a thing
within the limits of hope, every new necessity for
the aid of such people seems to entail a new slavery
on the proprietor, and to multiply his cares, his
risks and his vexations much mere rapidly than his
enjoyments.
I see thee smiling, O reader!but I care not.
I really believe that both for myself and my
children
,
I shall never cease to bless the training that
has procured us some little insight into even an
enforced philosophy. So smile on, and be
careful
that thou err not through too lavish and too
unsympathizing use of the gifts of an all-beneficent
Providence.
6*
CHAPTER VIII.
What dire necessities on every hand
Our art, our strength, our fortitude require!
Of foes intestine what a numerous band
Against this little throb of life conspire!
Yet science can elude their fatal ire
A while, and turn aside Death's levelled dart;
Soothe the sharp pang, allay the fever's fire,
And brace the nerves once more, and cheer the heart.
Beattie.
The
French character has been supposed to
surpass
all others in flexibilityin the power of
adapting
itself to circumstances, even the most adverse
and uncomfortable, and surely no people have been
more fully tried. I think it was a practical
philosopher
of that race who asserted that a change of
condition
,
however severe, ceased to be keenly felt
after the first three months. The truth of this
remark has been questioned, but I believe many,
who have emigrated to these new countries, will be
ready to confirm it by their own experience. It
appears to me indeed that we must partake, in no
slight degree, of the mobility of the French
character
,
in order to maintain even a moderate share of
spirits and resolution, under a change of situation
which is certainly what, in their superfine phrase,
is termed
vraiment desolant,
though it must be
confessed
that to say in plain English,
desolating,
too
much might be implied. No English word that I
can remember does express precisely this
compulsory
uprooting of all ancient memories, and the
substitution
of new and not very attractive associations
in their honored place.
I know not whether we may not push still further
our claim to the philosophical character, and
consider
ourselves as surpassing our prototype; for the
French in their lowest estate have usually contrived
so to place themselves as never to lack that elixir
of lifesociety. A faithful friend or twoand
they are too imaginative a people not to be tender
and faithful in friendshipa friend or two and
something to talk about, rank next to shelter and
before food in their estimate of the comforts of
life. But the emigrant to the wilderness must
dispense even with society, as well as almost every
thing else which he has been accustomed to
consider
essential to happiness, and it is only after a weary
interval of solitary rule that he may hope for
neighbors
and
de quoi causer
.
And happy would it be if even this were the
worst. But what would the lively Frenchman say
of his lot if he had witnessed, as so many of us have,
the complete prostration of his family by agues? if
he and his wife and his children, his man-servant
and his maid-servant, and the good neighbor who
tried to alleviate their sufferings, should be
successively
deprived of health, and reduced to a state of
the most dispiriting helplessness, until scarce a hand
retained power to draw water for the sick?
Such things are experienced annually by many
of the settlers in the Western country; and, to
finish the picture to the life, we must add the entire
failure of the supply of
quinine,
on which alone
we can rely for relief. This medicine, which acts
like a charm on intermittents, is sometimes not to
be procured in the interior at any price, and many
lives are doubtless lost in consequence.
The cures wrought by means of this powerful
agent are wonderful, and yet there exists a violent
prejudice against its use. Agues are often suffered
to run, as we phrase it, the whole year round, in
preference to curing them in two or three days with
quinine, and it is perhaps only when the miserable
patient is reduced to the last extreme of pallor and
emaciation, and the grave seems opening to receive
its prey, that the cure will be resorted to. A
thousand
prescriptions are in circulation, each of which
is infallible in the estimation of a circle of believers,
though experience is constantly demonstrating their
fallacy. Mountain flax, prickly-ash, bark, bitter
root, Cayenne pepper, laudanum, raw eggs, strong
coffee, wormwood, hop tea,but I might fill a
page with the names of nauseous bitters, narcotics
and stimulants which we are solicited to try, rather
than subject ourselves to the terrific array of evils
which are supposed to follow in the wake of the
only true elixir. These are, dimness of sight,
palpitation of the heart, obscurity of intellect, and
general debility, even to the entire loss of the use
of the limbs.
Now, it so happens that some or all of these are,
in different degrees, the natural consequence of the
agues themselves, and we have never seen them so
severely experienced as in a case where not a
particle
of quinine had been used. But all this is as
nothing in refutation of a popular prejudice; and
one of our neighbors has been twice
in articulo
mortis
under his own prescriptions, when his
friends have taken advantage of his nearly
insensible
state to send for a physician who administered
quinine every hour for some time, to the evident
saving of life in both cases.
But what is, in fact, the result of a class of
diseases
which requires the frequent exhibition of this
powerful agent? Disastrous, undoubtedly; and it
seems really marvellous that any who have
experienced
the disorder can suppose otherwise. The
effect of an ordinary course of aguessay from
six weeks to three months if no quinine be used,
is of a most discouraging character. The sight
is usually a good deal affected, at least for the time,
and, I almost fear, for life. There is a constant
sense of feebleness, as well of mind as of body;
a confusion of ideas and a sombre view of ordinary
circumstances. The limbs are prone to stiffness
and inability, and the fearful shrinking or quivering
sensation about the heart, is, as I can avouch, most
depressing.
Why then is it that this condition, which I have
described with all care and accuracy according to
general as well as personal experience,why is it
that such a train of ills does not drive away the
population in despair? What an inconsistency
does it seem for such as can at any sacrifice strike
the tent and remove to more fortunate regions, to
remain a month in such an atmosphere? This
has occurred to me a thousand times, yet I, like
the rest, am content to live on, with the aid of that
which supports all the world under every variety
of difficulty and misfortunehope. Every body
hopes this particular fit is to be positively the last
visit of the foul fiend. If we can only get through
to-dayif the shake does not dislocate the
neck-bone
,
or the fever set the house on fire,we feel
sure that we have had it so long, or we have had
it so hard, or we have been so little subject to
it,that it is not likely to return. This is
certainly the most violent shake or the most
delirious
fever;there is more perspiration, or
less headache; or in some respect this attack
differs from all that have preceded it; so that we
feel confident there has been a change in the
system
,
and any change must be for the better. And
many times these prognostics at a venture prove true
as if by miracle. An ague will quit one as suddenly
and as inexplicably as it came on, without the use
of remedies, whether of diet or medicine, and one
may feel nothing of it for a year, perhaps for life.
The consequences wear away, and we forget them.
We look around us, through a translucent
atmosphere
,
at a stout and even ruddy population; we
see on every side a fertile and smiling country,
abounding in natural resources and improving with
unsurpassed rapidity,a country where population
is wealth;and we ask ourselves, Is it really
best to flyto leave behind so many advantages,
and to lessen, even by our mite, the comforts of
those who remain? Can we elude disease? And,
since disease and death are every where, are the
hopeless pulmonary ills of the seaboard less to be
dreaded than these curable intermittents? All old
people who have weathered the storm tell us that
these troubles are concomitants only of new
settlements
,
and that we shall see them diminish year
by year,to be replaced, however, by the less
frequent
but more fatal diseases of older countries.
Thus we live on, content to bear the ills we have,
perhaps from a sense that there are ills every where;
and that after all there may be worse things even
than agues. Nine out of ten ague patients (as I
suppose) are'able to eat with good appetite as soon
as the fit is over, and many continue about their
ordinary business during all the time, save that
absolutely occupied in shaking and burning. Those
who have the complaint in this form generally keep
up their spirits, and can, of course, be the more
readily cured. Others see the matter in a different
light, because they suffer agonies of pain, and
perhaps
rave during the long hours of fever. But
there are few cases so desperate that they cannot be
cured, at least temporarily, although again it must
be confessed that it takes but a breath to call back
the tormentor. The quivering of an aspen leaf will
set one shaking from sympathy.
Among the rather novel remedies may be
reckoned
a cold shower-bath once or twice a day, which
one may well believe would frighten away ague or
any thing else; and among those sanctioned by the
learned, bleeding in the cold stage, which has been
found successful in many cases. But neither of
these modes is popular with us. We stick to
thoroughwort,balmony,soot tea,number
six,and the like; and avoid, as if for the very
life, all pothecary medicines. Yet if a petticoated
professor of the healing arta female physician
so calledshould prescribe the most deadly drugs,
(purchased at the nearest druggist's,) or tell a man
that his liver was grown fast to his side, and that he
must release it by reaching upward while leaning
on his elbow in bed,or if she should pronounce
oracularly that a dose of centipeds procured from
beneath a fallen tree whose head should lie toward
the east would cure the spinevantosey that comes
in the breast,she will find supporters who
would not employ an educated physician on any
account. I have been assured, with all seriousness,
that the hepatic experiment alluded to had been
tried with signal success; the patient having had
the satisfaction of hearing it tear very distinctly.
Happily this order of practitioners is not numerous,
and from the general intelligence of the people, may
be expected rather to diminish than to increase.
Of all the prominent curative theories of the day,
that of the disciples of Hahnemann is, I think,
the only one which we have not tried in some
shape. It may be thought from what has been
said, that we must be an imaginative community,
and ought therefore to be good homopathic
subjects
;
but we have an instinctive disrespect for
every thing weakexcept indeed coffee, which
we take only in the decillionth potence. And
besides, it would never do to cure the ague by
medicines which might be rendered destructive by
much shaking. It would be safer indeed, upon the
principle
similia similibus curantur,
to shake the
patient soundly, without exhibiting a single
globule
or pellet of medicine, since we should thus
avoid all danger of drug-sickness from
over-dosing
.
After all, though I believe homopathy to be in
advance of our present degree of Western
civilization
,
I wish all my countrymen were converts to
the doctrine that it is impossible to give (or take)
doses too small. They are terribly apt to err on
the other side.
VOL. I. 7
CHAPTER IX.
While warring in the Holy Land, Richard was seized with an AGUE
* * * He became convalescent, and the first symptom of his recovery
was a violent longing for
Pork
.
Sir Walter Scott
Introduction to the Talisman
.
This
is the only historical notice which I have
been able to discover of the connection or
rapport
between pork and ague, but here they are evidently
in a concatenation accordingly; and this one
instance is amply sufficient to satisfy the
unprejudiced
mind that human nature, high and low, is
every where the same. The Wolverine in his
log-hut
need not blush for a
penchant
which has been
sanctioned and rendered classical by the heroic
example of Richard the lion-hearted. It is true
the king's ague was the consequence of being
exposed
to the burning heats of Palestine, enclosed
in iron, like a waffle;ours, the effect of as hot
a sun, boiling the moist meadows and cooking man
by steam, like a potato. The result is the same.
Ague is one and indivisible in whatever station
or clime it may be found. There is no possibility
of confounding it with any of the other varieties
of life; as little of changing its nature or evading
its persecutions by the best use of the best gifts
of fortune. The utter self-abandonmentthe
wretched good-for-nothing-ness,the invincible
conviction that gradually gets possession of the
mind, that life is destined to be one long shake,
with occasional varieties of fever and headache,
these, we venture to assert, will be found
inseparable
concomitants of ague, whether the silken
hangings of the palace or the pendent cobwebs of
the log-cottage, quiver under the influence of the
malignant fiend. I quote Armstrong, who knew
all about it, and who would not, I dare say, have
characterized Quartana as a fiend if he could
have found any thing worse to call her.
And the appetite for porknay, this is a cold
term,the affection for pork, so far as my
observation
in this Western world extends, is a natural
consequent upon ague, as shadow follows substance
or flattery power. In our neighborhood, where
every body has, or has had, or expects to have
ague,where indeed ague begins to be looked
upon as a condition of humanity,pork, the
beau
ideal
of good cheer every where in this region,
bears also the highest reputation as an abracadabra.
Those who are already shaking will often ascribe
their low estate to a lack of this indispensable
luxury, and expect certain relief to be the
consequence
of a fresh supply. If I only had some
pork! they exclaim pathetically. And when the
fates are propitious and the necessary sacrifices are
completed, they do not take the remedy on the
homopathic plan. They have no faith in
infinitesimal
doses. As much as can be swallowed, three
times per diem, is the usual prescription; whether
intended as preventive or as cure;as a relief for
present ills or a talisman against those which may
come. And many of the stout old settlers adhere
to this regimen with a religious strictness which
implies full faith. To them sweetnin is
nothing
;
nor garden-saase;nor even whisky
itself, unless pork crown the good cheer, or at least
play the part of
pice de rsistance,
be the occasion
what it may. To them killing-time, so dreaded
by travellers in America, affords a sort of Saturnalia.
They do not approve the saying that one may
have too much of a good thing. Of fresh,
which term includes every description of unsalted
meat,they soon tire; with respect to pork they
are insatiable. They are certainly practical
believers
in extreme unction.
This exalted estimate is often exhibited
incidentally
.
Is it desirable to awaken your compassion
and relax your purse strings? You are told, with
a pensive sigh, that the complainant has not had a
bit of
meat
in a monthmeat having but one
signification with us. Is the rising prosperity or
overflowing abundance of a family to be typified?
They have as much pork as they can eat. In
short, if we should set about contriving a Western
emblem of happiness and plentysomething that
should mean all that the ancients associated with
Amalthea's horn and a little more,I believe
nothing could be found so closely significant as a
magnificent porker,six inches on the ribs, and
weighing from three to six hundred pounds.
From all this it follows, as a matter of course,
that we take excellent care of these greasy treasures.
Their privileges among us are unlimitedindeed
they are generally preferred to their human
dependants
,
in all ordinances devised for the public
well-being
.
Not the sacred cow of Isis was the subject
of more reverential attention. They form the
theme of much anxious consultation at our
town-meetings
,
and the result has hitherto been to make
them free commoners; i. e., to give them
unbounded
range of the fields and gardens of the
neighborhood
,
since few fences can be found in a new
country
which will hold good against so enterprising a
forager when sent out to get his own living. This
arrangement is, to be sure, rather trying to those who
attempt to keep gardens; but who ever thought of
putting garding-saase in comparison with pork?
This high stand in public estimation has the
effect that might be expected, in changing and
exalting the characteristic propensities of these
darlings of fortune. Far from being content with
the grovelling habits and coarse fare which satisfy
their brethren, in those countries where man,
under
the benighted prejudices of civilization, denies
them their true place in society, our porkers will
leap a garden fence with the agility, if not with the
grace of an antelope. Once in, they show their
7*
refined taste by banqueting upon tidbits selected
here and there from your tomatoes and cauliflowers,
your bulbs and your grape-vines; resembling the
butterfly in one respect at least, inasmuch as they
never complete their feast upon one or two varieties,
but rather choose to try every thing in the garden.
In fact, I have sometimes thought we ought
scarcely
here to call man the lord of the creation, since he
is in so many respects at the mercy of these very
imperious masters.
Some people have professed to find a connection
between national character and national food.
They have imagined the waveless calm of the
German to have some mysterious affinity with the
cool and heavy nature of his beloved cabbage; the
mercurial agility of the Frenchman with the
saltatory
propensities of the frog; the remarkable
modesty
of the Englishman with the blushing red of
the half-cooked beef in which he is said to delight;
and the tameless wildness of our own Indians
with that of their venison which must be chased
before it can be eaten. But we protest against such
illiberal pseudo-philosophers and their doctrine.
We are not greater gormandizers than our
neighbors
.
We do not, to be sure, like to be penned up,
but we are slow in jumping fences. Our proclivity
to pork is not fairly to be considered so much
typical
of the characteristics of the inhabitants, as of
the exuberant fatness of their soil. And we are
not at all prone to cut our own throats as we swim
in the tide of commercial prosperity.
But there is one trait in the character I have
attempted merely to sketch, which we need not
blush to own as a national one. The bristly
citizen
,(I
speak of him whose nature has been
exalted by his privileges,)when he once fixes
his keen eye upon a desirable object,be it corn,
be it cabbage,is indomitable in perseverance.
Go ahead is his motto, whatever be the obstacles
in the way. He may get dozens of knocks over
the pate, but none the less forces his nose into the
pail. So his biped compatriot, if he be full-blooded,
whether the general term Yankee, or the more
especial and local Wolverine, Buckeye or Hoosier
be his designation, when he has a point in view,
never stops, come weal come woe, until he has
accomplished the desired end.
We had once the pleasure of spending a short
time on the British side of Niagara where a broad
Scotchman, in the literal as well as the figurative
sense of the term, was sojourning with his family.
This worthy was a merciless talker; no voice but
his could be heard, whether at table or elsewhere;
under the very brow of the Falls his self-satisfied
tones were audible above the ceaseless roar of the
mighty cataract; and the one, only, darling theme
of his conversation was contemptuous abuse of the
Americans, or
Yenkees,
as he called them. We
were told he had written a book of some sort which
carried the same burden.
On the day we left, as he concluded his wine
and his tirade together, he made one sweeping and
significant observation:
After all, it is ra'ally asto-nishin' to see how
these Yenkees get on! They DO a thing while
we're talkin' aboot it!
And as a postscript is often found to contain the
pith of a letter, so we thought we had discovered,
in this concluding exclamation, the real source of
all Mr. F.'s cherished enmity to our pork-eating
nation.
Nous n'aimons pas toujours ceux que nous
admirons
.
CHAPTER X.
I sighed to hear
Once more earth's breezy sounds, her foliage fanned,
And turned to seek the wilds.
Mrs. Hemans
.
Give
every bodyhis due. After all
that has been said and thought about ague,and
it must be confessed, that while the fit is on, or its
recollection fresh in the memory, this includes
almost
all kinds of hard thoughts and evil speaking,
there are good things connected with it. The
sympathy of one's friends is not of this number
certainly: It is nothing but the ague! is very
commonly all the consolation one gets. One is
sometimes (in the fever) almost desperate enough
to wish to die just once to make people a little less
unfeeling. The same amount of pain and suffering
under any other name would excite abundant
commiseration
.
There is however no disease that leaves more
strikingly melancholy traces on the countenance;
and pallid lips and languid eyes and feeble steps
are a fair enough warrant for some little
self-indulgence
,
when that is practicable. If a good, high
rolling salt surf were an importable article, I am
sure the inhabitants of Ague-land could enter into
no more profitable speculation, than to club their
entire available means for the purchase of
Rock-away
or Nahant. The sum would draw enormous
returns in the best of all possible shapes
accumulated
strength and energy. But as this is hardly to
be compassed even in this age of wonders, we, who
are recovering from protracted agues, claim as our
right the next best thingtravelling. Which
brings me back to the proposition with which I set
outthat there may be some pleasant results even
from ague.
Our travels are, to be sure, very limited. There
are no Himmalehs to be scaledno Nile to be
tracedno Aztalan or Palenque to be explored.
But the source of Nile gave Bruce but a moment's
rapture in payment of his toils and dangers, and we
console ourselves for our lack of romantic
adventure
by considering that we gain at least as much
in proportion
. It costs but little trouble to get
sight of
Those heathen goddesses most rare
Homer, Venus, and Nebuchadnezzar
All standing in the open air
thanks to our nomenclators. Is it not something
to be able, in the course of a few days' travel, to
see not only Homer, and Milton, and Byron, and
Napoleon, and Romeo, but Scio and Athens as
well as Marengo and Lodi, and a host of other
celebrated
spots?
While Fancy, like the finger of a clock,
Runs the great circuit and is still at home.
Barring these advantages, a journey through the
wilds, if performed by steam or by post chaise, is
just like a journey any where else, except a lack of
some of the more refined accommodations for
travelling
.
To find a spice of novelty,to reap an
advantage from position which shall in some degree
counterbalance the deficiency necessarily
observable
in public conveyance so far from the great
thoroughfares, we have devised a new mode of
travel, or rather, we have adopted one which is new
to us, although highly popular in these tramontane
regions.
This resembles in no small degree that of the
tinker
in the story-book, whose equipage was a gigantic
tea-kettle, the spout of which served for a chimney
and the
tout ensemble
both for professional sign and
family domicile; while its owner jogged along cosily,
hammering as he went, chatting with the good wife
within, and occasionally encouraging by a cherup
the praiseworthy donkey that drew the entire
establishment
.
A pedler of geniusa Yankee of coursehas
added yet one improvement to this ingenious plan.
His
cow
serves a double purpose as a beast of
draught,
for she goes well in the harness, and he
has only to stop and milk her when he is thirsty.
The nearest approach we have yet made to this
compression of comforts took place last summer,
when after a most justifying course of agues we set
out in the great wagon for a rambling tour of
discovery
,
with every thing we should be likely to
wantincluding a large basket of provisions
embraced within its ample verge. Umbrellas good
storebooks and blanketstrunks and
sacs de
nuit,
besides some oats for the dear old ponies,
and a pail wherefrom to give them drink, in case
they should be athirst where water is more plenty
than buckets,all these made some ingenuity
requisite in bestowing ourselves and our
conveniences
within the compass of even a regular
back-woods
wagonthe most capacious of vehicles;
and it took from early breakfast time until fully ten
o'clock to load up.
It may be that my dear reader being as I well
surmise a dweller in cities, shall suppose this same
farm wagon, which is so often referred to as a
regular family vehicle, to be a sort of exaggerated
britskaan able-bodied barouche, capable of
containing
,
on crowded occasions, six ladies in bishop's
sleeves: and that when we take a
fantaisie
for a
week's ramble, it is only to send to John to drive
round at the appointed hour. Illusions all! The
wagon consists of an oblong box of rough boards,
mounted on the clumsiest of all possible wheels,
and for springs we have two long slender tamarack
poles placed within on iron hooks appended to the
sides. On these springs are board seats, with
cushions or not, as the case may be, but always
with buffalo skins by way of drapery. In the
harness, all that is not leather is iron chain, except
that there are generally weak points which are to
be frequently fortified with twine or, alas! with
the strings from your husband's vest if you forget
to carry twine. Then your John, if you are so
lucky as to have one, requires goodly notice of your
errant intentions. Shoes are to be resetharness
to go to the
shoemaker's
for repairswhite paint
to be bottled for Quicksilver's shoulder, galled in
ploughing. To secure a happy issue for your
expedition requires only less deliberate preparation
than Napoleon ought to have made for the jaunt to
Moscow. It is awkward to discover important
omissions when you are miles from efficient aid.
But every body is waiting while I discuss these
particulars. It was a cloudy day in July; a cloudy
day after heavy showers,showers which we felt
confident had exhausted the watery reservoirs for
the present, so that we congratulated ourselves upon
the tempering clouds, and thought of leaving the
umbrellas at home. However, it was not long
before the sun shone out in such force as to call
forth the parapluies as parasols, and we were almost
fainting under that peculiarly oppressive heat which
belongs to such dropping weather in the midst of
our summers. After we reached the boundaries of
the clearing and plunged into the timbered
land, this heat was exchanged for a grotto-like
coolness, and the horses trod leisurely as if to enjoy
the damp, mossy soil and the grateful shade.
It was not long after noon when we began to
VOL. I. 8
think favorably of dinner, and we had not far to
seek for a pleasant spot of green turf whereon to
spread our couches of buffalo-skins and blankets.
In the midst of a circle thus formed was the
tablecloth
with its accompaniments; and there, in a
`caf
mille colonnes'
which required no multiplying aid
of mirrors, we took our first rustic repast,all
highly delighted with the novelty, but especially
the young fry, who were allowed to go as often as
they liked to a clear spring that welled from the
hill-side, and dabble in the water which widened
into a small, glassy pond below. They fed Prince
with bread, which he took from their fingers with
a care and delicacy worthy of his gentle blood,
while poor Quicksilver showed his awkward
rusticity
by hanging his head or turning it sedulously
aside when the same civility was offered him. But
what they found most delightful of all was to see
Leo's enthusiastic plunges in pursuit of the crackers
which they sent skimming along the water as far as
they could, trying his patience occasionally by the
substitution of a flat stone by which he obligingly
allowed himself to be deceived as often as they
thought proper.
This said Leo is a particular friend of the family,
not on account of his beauty, for he is an enormous
creature with a ferocious bull-dog aspectnor on
the score of his services, for a more useless and
chicken-hearted monster never ate goslings,but
justbecause. This is the only assignable ground
of Leo's popularity, and it is sufficient to secure
his impunity in spite of many a misdemeanor, as
well as to make him an inamissable member of the
party whenever we go from home
en famille
. And
indeed I have seen people admitted into society on
slighter pretensions.
Speaking of Leo calls up tender reminiscences.
My poor D'Orsay! introduced to the world in the
earlier sketch of our village annalslike many of
the delicate and beautiful things of this
ever-shifting
panorama, was but short-lived. He was not
made for rough usage, and one sharp night in May,
when his master with unconscious cruelty locked
him out in the chill dew, he took a cold from
which he never recovered. He died of a regular
consumption, resembling in all its stages the same
disease in the human sufferer, and a more patient
creature never coughed away his poor life. They
said it was the distemper. D'Orsay with the
distemper, indeed!
When his last days came, the weather was
oppressively
warm, and he could lie nowhere but in
the open air. There a kind hand formed a thick
roof of boughs to exclude the sun, and D'Orsay's
last bed was visited with unceasing interest as long
as he continued to breathe. I could not but think
he looked at his mistress as if he had something to
say, but I could only guess at what might perhaps
be the sentiments of a very graceful and elegant
greyhound dying thus untimely. My thoughts
took naturally the form of an epitaph:
D'Orsay! to thee, O thrice-blest imp of fame!
I here resign, unsoiled, the illustrious name.
In all things happy else, one grief is mine
I quit the scene ere thou hast ceased to shine.
Poor fellow! I hope he had forgotten the leg
of mutton which lay too near his nose on the
kitchen table! but we must not judge him hardly,
especially as the pitiless cook bestowed upon him
blows enough of that odious ladle to have sowed
the seeds of that melancholy which shadowed o'er
the latter part of his life. Ah, D'Orsay! let none
be too severe upon thy one fault, but rather
remember
,
as I do, thy exceeding beauty!
uncorsetted
,without
false curls,bishop sleeves,
tight shoes,tourneurs; unindebted, in short, to
any of those adjuncts which do so much towards
the enchantingness of beauty,how faultless was
thy slender waist! how classical the contour of
thy head and neck! how silky the pendent ears,
asking no aid from tassels of pearl to enhance their
graceful undulations! How light and active thy
limbs, and how fleeter than the fleetest thy softly
patting feet! Alas! I might expatiate upon thy
better qualities,thy gentleness, thy forgiving
temper, thy docility, thy faithful attachmentbut
my readers never knew thee, and I forbear.
CHAPTER XI.
Assured that no
mock
shower is shed.
Where
was I? as the
causeurs impitoyables
always say. Oh! telling of our dinner in the
woods.
When all was done, the cold beef and its
attendant
pickles,the pies and the cake and the huge
loaf were returned each to the niche it was
ordained
to fill in the champagne basket that served
to hold our treasures. The little tin pail of butter
which had been carefully placed in the water, was
now re-wrapped in its shroud of fresh leaves, and
we set forth again, but under a threatening aspect
of the heavens. We had been so amused watching
Leo's gambols in the still transparent water, that
we had not noticed the gathering clouds, which
now grew apace thicker and heavier than we could
have desired. Nevertheless on we went, and at a
good pace, for our steeds had been as well refreshed
as ourselves, and seemed to understand beside that
there might be reasonable ground for haste. Not a
house was to be descried, for in the back route we
had chosen, settlers are few and scattered, and
much of the road lay through tracts of untouched
timber, where one was obliged sometimes to take
good heed of the great H hacked on the trees by
8*
the surveyor's axe, to be sure that we were on the
Highway.
And now the rain came down in earnest. No
pattering drops,no warning sprinkle,but a
sudden deluge, which wet every thing through in
half a minute. Onward, good Prince!
en avant,
Quicksilver! (for thou art of French extraction;)
shining and smoking as ye are, with torrents
streaming down your innocent noses, adopt David
Crocket's motto, so often quoted and acted upon by
our compatriots,Go ahead! If bonnets and
veils,if gingham and broadcloth or their wearers
find any favor in your eyes, let not water extinguish
your fire! Think of our soaking bread! Think
of your own swimming oats, and as ye love not
spoon-vittles, hasten.
The rain spatters up from the rail-fences so as to
create a small fog on every rail. The puddles in
the road look as if they were boiling, and the sky
seems to grow more ponderous as it discharges its
burden. We have emerged upon a clearing, and
there is a liquid sheet between us and the distant
woods.
But there is a roof! I see a stick chimney! and
there is a drenched cow crowding in beneath a
strawy barrack, and some forlorn fowls huddled
under an old cart. We approach the habitations of
men, and we may not doubt a good fire and a kind
welcome,so forward, good steeds!
The log-house proved a small one, and though
its neat corn-crib and chicken-coop of slender poles
bespoke a careful gudeman, we found no gate in
front, but in its stead great awkward bars which
were to be taken down or climbed over; and either
of these is no pleasant process in a pouring rain.
But by the aid of a little patience we made our
way into the house, which had only a back door, as
is very usual among the early settlers.
Within, marks of uncomfortable though
strictly
neat and decent poverty were but too evident.
No well-stored dresser,no snug curtains,no
shining tins,no gorgeous piece-work bed-quilts,
exhibiting stars of all magnitudes and moons in all
quarters. Not even the usual display of Sunday
habiliments graced the bare log walls. The good
woman was of a shadowy thinness, and her
husband
,
with a green shade over his eyes, wore a
downcast and desponding air. One little girl with
her yellow hair done up in many a papillote sat in
a corner playing with a kitten. The mother put
down her knitting as we entered, but the father
seemed to have been sitting in listless idleness.
We were received with that free and hospitable
welcome so general among the pioneers of the
West. Our wet garments were carefully disposed
for drying, and even the buffalo-robes and blankets
found place on those slender poles which are usually
observable above the ample fireplace of a regular
log-hut; placed there for the purpose of drying
sometimes the week's wash, when the weather
proves rainy,sometimes whole rows of slender
circlets of pumpkins for next spring's pies,
sometimes
(when we can get them) festoons of sliced
apples. The rain gave no sign of truce; the eaves
poured incessantly, and we heard the rumbling of
distant thunder. There was every prospect that
we should be constrained to become unwilling
intruders
on the kindness of Mr. Gaston and his
family
,
for the night at least.
When this was mentioned, the good woman,
after expressing her willingness to do the very best
she could for us, could not forbear telling us there
had been
a time when she could have entertained
us decently under such circumstances. But those
days are gone by, she said with a sigh; trouble
has followed us so long that I don't look for any
thing else now. We left a good home in York
state because my old man couldn't feel contented
when he saw the neighbors selling out and coming
to the West to get rich. And we bought so much
land that we hadn't enough left to stock it, and
improve it; but after a while we had got a few
acres under improvement, and begun to have
enough for our own consumption, although nothing
to sell, and we had to part with some of our land
to pay taxes on the restand then we took our
pay in wild-cat money, that turned to waste paper
before we got it off our hands. And my husband
took on dreadful hard upon that,and we all had
the ague,and then his eyes took sore,and he
is almost blindtoo blind to see to work more
than half the time. So we've been getting down,
down, down! But I needn't cry, said the poor
creature, wiping her eyes; for I'm sure if tears
could have bettered our condition, we'd have been
well off long ago.
Here was an apology for poverty, indeed! How
many complain of poverty, sitting in silks and laces,
at tables covered with abundance! What groans
over hard times have we not heard from jewelled
bosoms within these two or three years! What
rebuffs are always ready for those who take upon
themselves the pleasant office of soliciting of the
superfluity of the rich for the necessities of the
poor! Hard times! say the unthinking
children
of luxury, as they sip their ice-cream, or hold
up to the light the rosy wine!
This log-cabin with its civil and respectable
inhabitants would furnish a lesson for such
economists
,
if indeed they were willing to learn of the
poor to appreciate the over-abounding comforts of
their lot.
Our hostess was a very active and tidy person,
and she busied herself in all those little offices
which evince a desire to make guests feel
themselves
welcome. She had small change of
garments
to offer, but she was unwearied in turning
and drying before the fire such as we could dispense
with for the time; for we hoped the storm would
be but shortlived, and did not wish to open our
trunks until we stopped for the night. The rain
however slackened not, but on the contrary frequent
flashes of lightning, and a muttering thunder which
seemed momently to draw nearer, threatened still
longer detention. The eaves poured merrily, and
it was amusing to see our little hostess, with an
old cloak over her head, fly out to place tubs, pails,
jars, basins and milk-pans so as to intercept as
much as possible of the falling treasure, intimating
that as soap was pretty scarce she must try to catch
rain-water, any how. A trough scooped from the
portly trunk of a large whitewood-tree was so
placed as to save all that fell from one side of the
roof, but on the other almost all the utensils of the
house were arranged by the careful dame, who
made frequent trips for the purpose of exchanging
the full for the emptyapologizing for not calling
upon th' old man to assist her, because getting
wet might increase the inflammation of his eyes.
Mrs. Gaston had carried out her last milk-pail
and was returning to the door when the sound of
wheels was heard above the rattling of the storm;
and in another moment a loud Hilloa! told that
other travellers beside ourselves were about to seek
shelter.
I'll tell 'em to drive on to Jericho, said Mrs.
Gaston, for we can't make them any ways
comfortable
here. What! two mile further in this
rain! rejoined her husband; no, no, that'll
never do. The shower won't last long; let 'em
come in. And he would take his great straw hat
and go out to invite in this new windfall.
CHAPTER XII.
Kinder than polished slaves, though not so bland,
They piled the hearth and wrung their garments damp,
And filled the bowl, and trimmed the cheerful lamp,
And spread their farethough homely, all they had.
Byron.
Hilloa
there! hilloa! where under the canopy
is
all the folks? be a joggin', can't ye? shouted
one of the newly arrived.
Mr. Gaston hurried as fast as his poor blind eyes
would allow, and his wife threw fresh wood upon
the fire, and swept the rough hearth anew, as well
as she could with the remnant of a broom.
This was scarcely done when we heard voices
approachingat first mingled into a humming
unison with the storm, then growing more
distinguishable
.
A very shrill treble overtopped all the
rest, giving utterance to all the approved forms of
female exclamation.
O dear! O mercy! O bless me! O
papa! O! I
shall
be drownedsmothered!
O dear! but we must not pretend to give more
than a specimen.
A portly old gentleman now made his appearance,
bearing, flung over his shoulder, what seemed at
first view a bolster cased in silk, so limp and
helpless
was his burden. Behind him came as best
she might, a tall and slender lady, who seemed his
wife; and after scant salutation to the mistress of
the cottage, the two old people were at once
anxiously
occupied in unrolling the said bolster, which
proved, after the Champollion process was
completed
,
to be a very delicate and rather pretty young
lady, their daughter.
After, or rather with, this group entered a bluff,
ruddy, well-made young man, who seemed to have
been charioteer, and to whom it was not
unreasonable
to ascribe the adjuration mentioned at the head
of our chapter. He brought in some cushions and a
great coat which he threw into a corner,
establishing
himself thereafter with his back to the fire,
from which advantageous position he surveyed the
company at his leisure.
The luggage must be brought in, said the
elderly gentleman.
Yes! I should think it had oughter, observed
the young man in reply;
I
should bring it in, if
it was mine, any how!
Why don't you bring it in then? asked the
gentleman with rather an ominous frown.
I! well, I don't know but what I could, upon a
pinch. But, look here, uncle! I want you to take
notice of one thingI didn't engage to wait upon
ye. I a'n't nobody's nigger, mind that! I'll be up
to my bargain. I came on for a teamster. If you
took me for a servant, you're mistaken in the
child, sir!
VOL. I. 9
However, he continued, as if natural kindness
was getting the better of cherished pride,I can
always help a gentleman, if so be that he asks me
like
a gentleman; and, upon the hull, I guess I'm
rather stubbeder than you be, so I'll go ahead.
And with this magnanimous resolution the youth
departed, and with some help from our host soon
filled up every spare corner, and some that could
ill be spared, with a multifarious collection of
conveniences
very inconvenient under present
circumstances
.
Three prodigious travelling-trunks of white
leather formed the main body, but there were bags
and cases without end, and to crown all, a Spanish
guitar.
That is all, I believe, said the old gentleman,
addressing the ladies, as a load was set down.
All! exclaimed the teamster; I should hope
it was! and what any body on earth can want with
sich lots o' fixins, I'm sure's dark to me. If I was
startin' for Texas I shouldn't want no more baggage
than I could tie up in a handkercher. But what's
curious to me is, where we're all a-goin to sleep
tonight
.
This here rain don't talk o' stoppin'; and
here we've got to stay if we have to sleep, like pins
in a pin-cushion, all up on eend. It's my vote that
we turn these contraptions, the whole bilin' on
'em, right out into the shed, and just make up a
good big shake-down, with the buffaloes and
cushions
.
The young lady, upon this, looked ineffable
things at her mamma, and indeed disgust was very
legible upon the countenances of all these unwilling
guests. The house and its inhabitants, including
our inoffensive and accidental selves, underwent an
unmeasured stare, which resulted in no very
respectful
estimate of the whole and its particulars. Nor
was this to be wondered at, for as to the house, it
was, as we have said, one of the poorest and not one
of the best of log-houses,there is a good deal of
difference,and the people were much poorer
than the average of our settlers.
The young lady at least, and probably her
parents
,
had never seen the interior of these cabins
before; indeed, the damsel, on her first unrolling,
had said very naturally, Why, papa, is this a
house?
Then as to the appearance of our little party, it
was of a truly Western plainness, rendered doubly
plain, even in our own eyes, by contrast with the
city array of the later comers. Theirs was in all
the newest gloss of fashion, bedimmed a little, it is
true, by the uncourtly rain; but still handsome;
and the young lady's travelling-dress displayed the
taste so often exhibited by our young
country-women
on such occasionsit was a costume fit for a
round of morning visits.
A rich green silk, now well draggled; a fine
Tuscan-bonnet, a good deal trimmed within and
without, and stained ruinously by its soaked veil;
the thinnest kid shoes, and white silk stockings
figured with mud, were the remains of the dress in
which Miss Angelica Margold had chosen to travel
through the woods. Her long ringlets hung far
below her chin with scarce a remnant of curl, and
her little pale face wore an air of vexation which
her father and mother did their best most
duteously
to talk away.
This is dreadful! she exclaimed in no
inaudible
whisper, drawing her long damp locks through
her jeweled fingers, with a most disconsolate air:
It is really dreadful! We can never pass the
night here.
But what else can we do, my love? rejoined
the mamma. It would kill you to ride in the
rainand
you
shall have a comfortable bed at any
rate.
This seemed somewhat consoling. And while
Mrs. Margold and her daughter continued
discussing
these matters in an under tone, Mr. Margold
set about discovering what the temporary retreat
could be made to afford besides shelter.
This wet makes one chilly, he said. Haven't
you a pair of bellows to help the fire a little?
The good woman of the house tried her apron,
and then the good man tried his straw hatbut
the last wood had been wet, and seemed not
inclined
to blaze.
Bellowses! exclaimed the young man, (whose
name we found to be Butts;) we can do our own
blowin' in the woods. Here! let me try; and
with the old broom-stump he flirted up a fire in a
minute, only scattering smoke and ashes on all
sides.
The ladies retreated in dismay, a movement
which seemed greatly to amuse Mr. Butts.
Don't you be scart! he said; ashes never
pison'd any body yet.
Mr. Margold was questioning Mrs. Gaston as to
what could be had for tea,forgetting, perhaps,
that a farmer's house is not an inn, where chance
comers may call for what they choose without
offence.
But I suppose you have teaand bread and
butterand'
Dear! exclaimed the poor woman, I haven't
seen any but sage tea these three months;and
as for bread, I could make you some johnny-cake
if you like that; but we have had no wheat flour
this summer, for my old man was so crowded to pay
doctor bills and sich, that he had to sell his wheat.
We've butter, and I believe I may say it's pretty
good.
Bless my soul! no bread! said the old
gentleman
.
No tea! exclaimed his wife.
O dear! what an awful place! sighed Miss
Angelica piteously.
Well! I vote we have a johnny-cake, said the
driver; you make us a johnny-cake, aunty, and
them that can't make a good supper off of
johnny-cake
9*
and butter, deserves to go hungry, that's a
fact!
Mrs. Gaston, though evidently hurt by the rude
manner of her guests, set herself silently at work in
obedience to the hint of Mr. Butts, while that
gentleman
made himself completely at home, took the
little girl in his lap with the loving title of Sis,
and cordially invited Mr. Margold to sit down on a
board which he had placed on two blocks, to eke
out the scanty number of seats.
Come, uncle, said the facetious Mr. Butts,
jes' take it easy, and you'll live the longer. Come
and set by me, and leave more room for the
women-folks
,
and we'll do fust-rate for supper.
Mr. Butts had evidently discovered the true
philosophy
,
but his way of inculcating it was so little
attractive, that the Margolds seemed to regard him
only with an accumulating horror.
Hitherto we had scarcely spoken, but, rather
enjoying the scene, had bestowed ourselves and our
possessions within as small a compass as possible,
and waited the issue. But these people looked so
thoroughly uncomfortable, so hopelessly out of
their element, and seemed moreover, by decree of
the ceaseless skies, so likely to be our companions
for the night, that we could not help taking pity
on them, and offering such aid as our more mature
experience of forest life had provided. Our
champagne
basket was produced, and the various articles
it contained gave promise of a considerable
amendment
of Mrs. Gaston's tea-table. A small canister
of black tea and some sparkling sugar gave the
crowning grace to the whole, and as these things
successively made their appearance, it was
marvellous
to observe how the facial muscles of the
fashionables
gradually relaxed into the habitually bland
expression of politer atmospheres. Mrs. Margold,
who looked ten years younger when she smoothed
the peevish wrinkles from her brow, now thought
it worth while to bestow a quite gracious glance at
our corner, and her husband actually turned his
chair, which had for some time presented its back
full to my face.
We got on wondrously after this. Mrs. Gaston,
who was patience and civility personified, very
soon prepared a table which was nearly large
enough to serve all the grown people, and as she
announced that all was ready, Mr. Butts, who had
been for some time balancing a chair very critically
on its hinder feet, wheeled round at once to the
table, and politely invited the company to sit down.
As there was no choice, the strangers took their
seats, with prim faces enough, and Mrs. Gaston
waited to be invited to make tea, while her poor
half-blind husband quietly took his place with the
children to await the second table.
Mr. Butts was now in his element. He took
particular pains to press every body to eat of every
thing, and observing that Miss Angelica persisted
in her refusal of whatever he offered her, he cut
with his own knife a bountiful piece of butter, and
placed it on her plate with an air of friendly
solicitude.
The damsel's stare would infallibly have frozen
any young man of ordinary sensibility, but Mr.
Butts, strong in conscious virtue, saw and felt
nothing but his own importance; and moreover
seemed to think gallantry required him to be
specially attentive to the only young lady of the
party. Why, you don't eat nothing! he
exclaimed
;
ridin' don't agree with you, I guess!
now for my part it makes me as savage as a
meataxe
!
If you travel much after this fashion, you'll
grow littler and littler; and you're little enough
already, I should judge.
It was hardly in human nature to stand this,
and Mr. Margold, provoked beyond the patience
which he had evidently prescribed to himself, at
last broke out very warmly upon Butts, telling him
to mind his own business, and sundry other things
not particularly pleasant to relate in detail.
Oh! you're wrathy, a'n't ye? Why, I didn't
mean nothing but what was civil! We're
plain-spoken
folks in this new country.
Mr. Margold seemed a little ashamed of his
sudden
blaze when he found how meekly it was met,
and he took no further notice of his republican
friend, who on his part, though he managed to
finish his supper with commendable
sang froid,
was evidently shorn of his beams for the time.
CHAPTER XIII.
Tune a deploring dump; the night's dead silence
Will well become such sweet complaining grievance.
Shakspere.
Most
lamentably amusing was the distress of
Miss Angelica when it became necessary to concert
measures for passing a night in a crowded log-cabin.
The prospect was not a very comfortable one, but
the view taken of its horrors by these city people
was so ludicrously exaggerated that I am sure no
spectator could help laughing. The philosophy
that cannot stand one night's rough lodging should
never travel west of Lake Erie. Not that the
lodging any where in these Western wilds is likely
to be found more really uncomfortable than is often
the lot of visitors at the Springs during crowded
seasons; but fashionable sufferings are never quite
intolerable.
The sleeping arrangements were of a more
perplexing
character than those which had been
fortunately
devised for the tea. There were two large
beds and a trundle-bed, and these, with a scanty
supply of bedding, comprised our available means;
and besides our tea-party, two little boys had come
dripping home from school to add to our numbers.
After much consultation, many propositions, and not
a few remarks calculated rather to wound the
feelings
of our civil entertainers, it was concluded to
put the two large beds close together in order to
enlarge their capabilities, and this extensive couch
was to hold all the women-folks and some of the
children. The trundle-bed by careful stowage took
the little ones; and for the old gentleman, a couch
of buffalo-robes and carriage-cushions was skilfully
prepared by none other than the forgiving Mr.
Butts, who seemed disposed to forget past rebuffs,
and to exert himself very heartily in the public
service. This disinterested individual was
perfectly
content to repose Indian fashion, with his feet
to the fire, and any thing he could get for a pillow;
and the master of the house stretched himself out
after the same manner.
When all was done, Mrs. Gaston made the
ordinary
cotton-sheet-partition for the benefit of those
who chose to undress; and then began to prepare
herself for the rest which I am sure she needed.
All seemed well enough for weary travellers, and
at any rate, these poor people had done their best.
I hoped that all fault-finding would soon be hushed
in sleep.
But it became evident ere long that Miss Margold
did not intend to become a person of so small
consequence
.
She had disturbed her father several
times by requests for articles from different parts
of the luggage, without which she declared she
could not think of going to bed. She had received
from her mother the attendance of a waiting maid
without offering the slightest service in return, and
now, when all her ingenuity seemed to be
exhausted
,
she suddenly discovered that it would be in
vain for her to think of sleeping in a bed where
there were so many people, and she decided on
sitting up all night.
A silence expressive of the deepest consternation
held the assembly bound for some seconds. This
was first broken by a long, low, expressive whistle
from Mr. Butts, but the remembrance of past
mischance
bridled his tongue.
Do you think you could sleep here, my dear?
inquired Mr. Margold from his snug nest in the
corner.
The young lady almost screamed with horror.
Never mind, my darling, said the mamma, I
will sit in the rocking-chair by the fire, and you
shall have plenty of room.
Oh no, ma! that will never dowhy can't
the woman sit up? I dare say she's used to it.
This was said in a loud whisper which reached
every body's earsbut no reply was made.
Mrs. Margold and her daughter whispered
together
for some time further, and the result was
that the lady drew one of the beds apart from the
other, which movement caused Mrs. Gaston's little
girl to roll out upon the floor with a sad
resounding
thump and a piteous cry.
This proved the drop too many. Outspoke at last
the poor half-blind husband and father. His
patience
was, as Mr. Butts would say, used up.
Neighbors, said he, I don't know who you are
nor where you come from, and I didn't ask, for
you were driven into my house by a storm. My
family were willing to accommodate you as far as
they could; such as we had, you were welcome to,
but we are poor, and have not much to do with.
Now, you haven't seemed to be satisfied with any
thing, and your behavior has hurt my wife's
feelings
,
and mine too. You think we are poor
ignorant
people, and so we are; but you think we
haven't feelings like other folks, and there you are
mistaken. Now, the short and long of the matter
is, that as the storm is over and the moon is up, it's
my desire that you pick up your things and drive
on to the next tavern, where you can call for what
you like, and pay for what you get. I don't keep
a tavern, though I'm always willin' to entertain a
civil traveller as well as I can.
Hast thou not marked, when o'er thy startled head
Sudden and deep the thunder-cloud has rolled
I do not know whether this unexpected display
of spirit in poor Mr. Gaston was more like a
thunder-clap
or a deluge from a fire engine. Like
single-speech
Hamilton, he was too wise to attempt to
add any thing to the effect it had produced. He
waited in silence, but it was very resolute silence.
The Margolds were in a very pitiable perplexity.
Miss Angelica, knowing that none of the trouble
would come upon herself, was for being very spirited
upon the occasion; her papa, who had already
begun to dream of Wall Street and Waverley Place,
did hate to be recalled to the woods; and Mrs.
Margold had no opinion of her own on this or any
other occasion. Mr. Gaston, seeing no
demonstrations
of retreat, went to Butts, who was or pretended
to be asleep, and, shaking him by the shoulder,
told him he was wanted to get up his horses.
Get up the poor critters at this time o' night!
said he, rubbing his eyes; why! what upon the
livin' earth's the matter! has the young woman got
the high strikes?
Your folks is a-goin' to try and mend their
lodgin', that's all, replied the host, whose temper
was a good deal moved. They a'n't satisfied
with the best we could do for 'em, and it's my
desire that they should try the tavern at Jericho.
It is but two miles, and you'll soon drive it.
I'll be tipp'd if I drive it to-night though,
uncle, replied the imperturbable Mr. Butts; I
don't budge a foot. I sha'n't do no sich nonsense.
As for their trying the tavern at Jericho, the tavern's
a deuced sight more likely to try
them,
as you
know very well. Any how, this child don't stir.
But if we are turned out of doors, said Mr.
Margold, who aroused himself most unwillingly to
the consciousness of a new cause of disturbance,
you are bound to
VOL. I. 10
I a'n't bound to drive nobody in the middle of
the night, said Mr. Butts, so you don't try to suck
me in there. But as to turning you out o' doors,
this here chap a'n't the feller to turn any man out
o' doors if he'll be civil. He's a little wrathy
because
your folks wa'n't contented with such as he
had. I see he was a gettin' riled some, and I
thought he'd bile over. You see that's the way
with us Western folks. If folks is saasy we walk
right into 'em, like a thousand o' brick. He'll cool
down agin if you jist pat him a little. He's got
some grit, but he a'n't ugly. You only make
your women-folks keep quietget a curb-bridle
upon their tongues, and we'll do well enough.
Poor Mr. Margold! here was a task! But sleep,
though it makes us terribly cross when its own
claims are interfered with, is a marvellous
tranquillizer
on all other subjects; and as Mr. and Mrs.
Margold
and Miss Angelica were all very, very weary
the latter of teasing her parents, the former of being
teaseda truce was at length concluded by the
intervention of Mr. Butts, who acted the part of
peace-maker, and gave sage advice to both parties.
The conduct of these city people, who were
evidently of a very numerous classthat which
possesses more money than intellect or cultivation
is not, after all, very surprising; for it is still fresh
in our recollection that an English traveller of
intelligenceone notorious for ultra-liberal
principles
toomade angry complaint because the
mistress of a log-house somewhere on the Western
prairies was not disposed to entertain a party of
strangers, who found it convenient to enter her
dwelling uninvited. It seems that this person,
whoever she may have been, was insensible of the
honor done her house by an Avatar of so much
dignity. She thought, perhaps, that travellers who
had abundant means might have arranged their
distances
so as to make public-houses their
stoppingplaces
.
And if her dwelling had, by a chance
which might not unnaturally occur in the wilds of
the West, been the mansion of wealth and
consequence
,
it may be doubted whether our liberal
guests would have claimed hospitality at its gates.
It was because the tenant of the log-cottage was
supposed to be
poor,
that she was censured for her
unwillingness to turn her humble lodge into a
tavern.
Hospitality claimed as such is, I believe,
invariably
rendered among us, with a freedom worthy of
Arcadia itself. It is only when there is evidently a
supposition on the part of the guest that a poor
man's house and family are necessarily at the
service
of any body, for the sake of a few shillings,
that our cherished independence is called into action.
It is under such circumstances that those who are
disposed to lord it in log-cabins discover that
people
who are not afraid to be poor can afford to be
independent; and that uninvited guests must
purchase
civility by civility, or find themselves
unwelcome
in spite of money.
After much experience I can assert that I have
never known or heard of an instance where those
who have found it convenient to throw themselves
on the kindness of a settler of any degree, have not
been received with a frank welcome, which has
appeared to me peculiarly admirable, because
extended
,
in many cases, under circumstances of the
greatest inconvenience. Nor have I ever known
compensation demanded, whatever may have been
the trouble given; and where it has been accepted
at all, it has been only sufficient to repay actual
cost, and that usually upon urgency.
Less than this I could not say in fairness to the
justly praised hospitality of the West; and I
believe
every reader will scarcely think our friend
Gaston's apparent departure from the practice of
the land needed this apology. It suggested itself
unbidden, under the recollection of many a kindness
received from strangers in the course of our
numerous
peregrinations.
CHAPTER XIV.
Est-ce que vous
joueriez de la clarinette, docteur?
Doct.
Il est, je crois,
loisible
tout humain, vu
l'galit des hommes,
de
Comte de V.
De jouer de la clarinette...
C'est une vrit
incontestable
mais,
malheureusement, il n'est pas
loisible
tout humain de
ne pas en entendre jouerc'est en cela que la nature est
injuste.
Eugene Sue
.
We
had agreed to make a twelve-mile stage
before
breakfast in company with the city people,
whose way lay with ours so far. When the
morning
came and our mutual arrangements were to be
made, the Margolds were so prodigiously sulky
under the consciousness of last night's disagreeables,
that I felt rather ashamed of the companionship,
and would have preferred waiting to breakfast on
sage-tea with poor Mrs. Gaston, who was evidently
very uncomfortable between the recollection of the
affronts put upon herself, and the fear that her
husband
had gone too far in resenting them. The die
was cast however, and we were obliged to seem to
belong to the offending side, who carried their
wounded dignity very high at parting. Mr.
Margold
asked for Mr. Gaston's
bill;
our host
declined
making any charge. Mr. Margold insisted
on his receiving payment, and finished by placing
a bank-note on the table as he left the house
without
saying farewell, in which latter civility he was
10*
closely imitated by Mrs. Margold and Miss
Angelica
.
You
didn't think I was
on
civil, did ye? said
Gaston, somewhat anxiously, as we prepared to
follow.
Not in the least! You were quite right, was
the very sincere reply, for we thought the poor
blind man had borne more than enough.
Well! you've had a pretty mean time, I
reckon
!
said Mr. Butts, who stepped in to bid good
by, just as we were departing: and I heard him
add, You larnt 'em a good lesson any how! I
wouldn't ha' missed of it for a cow!
Mr. Margold was to be my husband's companion
as far as Wellington, where we were to take our
coffee, and I was exalted to the back seat of the
jingling barouche, which I shared with Mrs.
Margold
,
leaving the front for Miss Angelica and her
guitar.
The morning was a charming one, and a strong
breeze from the west came as if on purpose to
refresh
the spirits and cool the temper of the party
after the
contretemps
of the night. But this breeze,
bearing on its fresh pinions some of the balmy
moisture of last night's shower, blew Miss
Angelica's
long ringlets about most intolerably, and her
little forehead became quilted with very
unbecoming
wrinkles, when, as we drove through a narrow
way where the bushes almost met above our heads,
a provoking puff sent down a copious shower from
the leaves, demolishing the small remnant of curl
and the smaller remnant of
patience,
and the young
lady scolded outright.
I never
did
see such an odious country as this
is! she exclaimed; it is impossible to look decent
for an hour!
Well! one comfort is, said Mr. Butts
consolingly
,
that there a'n't many folks to see how bad
you look, here in the woods! We a'n't used to
seein' folks look dreadful slick notherso it don't
matter.
Double-distilled scorn curled Miss Margold's lip,
and she maintained an indignant silence, as the
only shield against the impertinence of the driver,
who found consolation in an unceasing whistle.
They had picked up this youth at a neighboring
village, supposing, from his pleasant countenance
and obliging manner, that they had gained a treasure
of civility. It had been at Miss Angelica's especial
instance that the party had quitted the usual road
and taken to the woods. She wished to be a little
romantic, but she had not counted the cost. Butts
was indeed all they had supposed from his address,
smart, good-tempered and kind-hearted, yet, as we
have seen, he was not the less lacking in the kind
of knowledge which was requisite for the part
he had undertaken. He had never lived with
any but those who considered him quite equal
to themselves. He was the son of a
respectable
farmer, whose ample lands would cut up well
among his heirs; and when our friend Dan engaged
to drive team for Mr. Margold, he had no idea
but that he was to be, to all intents and purposes,
one of the party, saving and excepting his duty
towards the horses, which he performed with
scrupulous
fidelity and no small skill. All this seemed
so evident, that I almost wondered that Miss
Margold
could not have passed over his intrusiveness
more good-humoredly, setting it to the account of
sheer ignorance, and not evil intention. But
unfortunately
the young lady seemed to fear that her
dignity would be irrevocably compromised if she did
not resent each and every instance of impertinence,
and as Butts was one of those who cannot take the
broadest hinteven an Irish onehe only talked
the more, thinking he had not yet hit upon the
right way to make himself agreeable.
By and by, finding it impossible to extort a reply
from the thready lips of the fair Angelica, he hailed
a young man whom we overtook on the road.
Hilloa! Steve! where are you a stavin' to?
If you're for Wellington, scale up here and I'll give
ye a ride. I swan! I'm as lonesome as a
catamount
!
You won't have no objection, I suppose?
turning slightly to Mrs. Margold. The lady did
not forbid, and the traveller was soon on the box,
much to Mr. Butts's relief, as he now had an
interlocutor
.
How do you stan' it nowadays? was the
salutation of Mr. Butts to his friend.
O, so as to be a crawlin' most of the time.
Be you pretty hearty this summer?
Why, I'm middlin' tough. I manage to make
pork ache when I get hold on't.
Are you hired with any one now, or do you
go on your own hook?
I've been teamin' on't some for old Pendleton
that built them mills at Wellington. I come on to
drive a spell for this here old feller, (jerking his
thumb backward,) but I guess we sha'n't hitch
long.
Why not? Don't he pay?
Pay! O, no danger o' that! money's the
thing he's got most of. But he wants a
servant,
and that, you know, Steve, is a berry that don't
grow on these bushes.
So he hired you for a servant, eh! and at
the thought Steve laughed loud and long.
Why! a body would think you had found a
haw-haw's nest with a te-he's eggs in't! said
Mr. Butts, who seemed a little nettled by his
friend's ridicule.
Well, but it's too funny, any how, was the
rejoinder; and the two friends branched off into
various discussions, and regaled each other with
sundry pieces of intelligence referring to the fortunes
and characters of the Toms, Dicks and Harries of
their acquaintance; leaving my attention at liberty
to profit by many parallel passages from the lips of
Mrs. Margold, who was well acquainted with the
latest improvements in the choice and quality of
refreshments at parties, the newest style of French
embroidery, and the shape and trimmings of the
bonnets by the last packet. I had become quite
absorbed in these matters, and had fallen into a sort
of doze, such as I suppose to be the only sleep
needed
by a French milliner, when I was aroused by a
clear, manly voice, with just enough of a nasal
twang to make me remember that I was still in the
woods, singing an air that recalled young
Lochinvar
,
and which had doubtless originally been
intended
for none other. The words were those of
a Western song which refers to that interesting
period in our local historythe admission of
Michigan
into the Union,on which occasion our
General Government decided that between the
States at least, might makes right;the era
of the Toledo war, which cost us so much
inkshed
,
and the unfortunate borderers such numbers
of water-melons and pumpkins. This song is
not,
I believe, the one written by Mrs. Sigourney on
the occasion.
I.
Oh! dashing young Mick is the pride of the West!
Of all its bold hunters the boldest and best,
He has town-house and villa, and water-craft fair,
And parks full of red-deer, enough and to spare.
He has meadow and woodland, lake, river, and lick,
And prairie-land plenty, has dashing young Mick.
II.
Now Mick, while a minor, was under control
Of his loving mamma, a good careful old soul.
And to all her long lectures, so prudent and sage,
His pithy response wasBut, ma'am, I'm of age!
Says she, You must share with poor Philo and Dick.
But a'n't I of age, ma'am? cried dashing young Mick.
III.
One time, when a party of gentlemen came
To prose with his mother, Mick sent in his claim:
Says he, Here's the recordmy nonage is o'er;
In this year thirty-five I've exceeded my score;
Make o'er my estate, ma'am, and please to be quick!
I can shear my own wolves, now! quoth dashing young Mick.
IV.
But, my dear, there's your brothersthey worry my life
And you know 'tis
my
duty to smother all strife!
They
will
have
that farm
andwe'll pay on demand
Ten miles of good ice for an acre of land;
Of the pine-barrens north you the choicest may pick.
I'll be blam'd if I do, ma'am! growled dashing young Mick.
V.
The dame, with a sigh, put her spectacles on;
Now tell me, grave counsellers, what's to be done!
Oh! let it lie by till we taste your good cheer;
A twelvemonth's discussion will make it more clear.
You know what stout fellows are Philo and Dick,
And they'll nibble, if we don't, from dashing young Mick!
VI.
Poor Mick! he talked big, and most roundly he swore
He'd at least have his own, if he couldn't get more:
But his ma' kept the farm and the money to stock it,
And quietly buttoned her purse in her pocket,
While the gentlemen argued through thin and through thick
Oh! I'll share and be thankful! quoth dashing young Mick.
The ditty might have extended to the length of
Chevy Chase for aught I can tell, in spite of many
signs of indignation on the part of Mrs. Margold
and her daughter, if we had not at that moment
come in sight of the tavern at Wellington, which
caused Mr. Butts to interrupt his vocal efforts, and
give a rousing touch to his horses to insure a trot
for the avenue.
CHAPTER XV.
What do they in the north when they should be in the south?
Shakspere.
We
found a decent inn and a tolerable breakfast,
but the place itself was the image of desolation.
It was one of those which had started into sudden
life in speculating times, and the great mill, the
great tavern and various other abortions had never
known the luxury of a pane of glass or a paint-brush,
nor did they bear marks of having at any time been
occupied. A variety store, offering for sale every
possible article of merchandise, from lace gloves to
goose-yokes,ox-chains, tea-cups, boots and
bonnets
inclusive,displayed its tempting sign; but
the clerk sat smoking on the steps, and a few
loungers around him looked like whisky-customers
only. There was a banking-house, of course; and
(also of course) it was closed, though the sign still
stared impudently at the cheated passenger. And
this was Wellington! Hollow honor for le
vainqueur du vainqueur du monde!
After breakfastat which, by the bye, Mr. Butts
and his friend filled high places,we bade adieu
to the Margolds, who were to regain the great road
after a few miles of further travel, while we took
to the woods again. Before we parted, however,
VOL. I. 11
Mr. Butts sought occasion to call us to witness that
he returned to Mr. Margold the bank-note which
that gentleman had deposited on Mr. Gaston's table.
You see, he a'n't no hand to make a fuss,
Gaston a'n't; so he jist told me to give it to ye after
you got away. And he said, added the agreeable
youth with a smile, that he'd rather you'd buy
manners with it, if you could.
How Mr. Margold and his driver got on after we
parted, I cannot pretend to say, but I must confess
I did not find it difficult, on review of what had
passed during our short acquaintance, to decide
which party had been most deficient in propriety
and good feeling.
Butts was certainly boorish and provoking enough,
but what had been his advantages? He was rude
and impertinent to a rich man, but how far greater
the offence of wounding wantonly the feelings of
the poor!
Mr. Margold's indignant estimate of the
presumption
of this young man was grounded entirely upon
the difference of condition between employer and
employed. This alone made the offence, for Butts
had neither said nor done any thing which could
be considered wrong in itself. And the opinion
that this difference is such as to make disrespectful
conduct particularly offensive, is one which is acted
upon every day, wherever society has taken a
settled and permanent form. It is invariably
recognized
in practice,
by all parties.
But Mr. Margold was one of those whose lives
are passed in strenuous efforts to make the people
believe that they recognize no distinctions of rank
or station, of whatever kind, in society. To this
end (as we have since been assured) has he talked
and voted, and by such talk and such votes has he
risen to several profitable offices. Would that such
mean inconsistency were less common! To preach
unmeasured social equalityan equality differing
in no respect from the fraternization which placed
the fishwoman and the princess on a leveland
at the same time to exhibit a most indignant
sensitiveness
under the slightest approach to a practical
recognition of this principle,such is the basely
hypocritical system of too many among us. They
insist loudly upon the theory, yet maintain a
constant
struggle against the naturalwe do not say
the rational and properworkings of this vital
principle of our political institutions.
To carry out into full practical effect the
common
view of the doctrines alluded to, would indeed
imply nothing short of a lingering mental
martyrdom
to the cultivated and the refined. The
sacrifices
would be so ruinous that cultivation and
refinement would become a curse instead of a
blessing; and in charity to our children we should
refrain from attempting to give them any
instruction
beyond that which is to be acquired at a
district
school, or to allow them to imbibe any tastes,
or habits, or manners, which would unfit them for
the plough or the forge. Care would become
cruelty
with such a life in view, for who would wish
his son to be thin-skinned if he knew it would be
his lot to receive a hundred lashes daily?
Do we then contemn the principle? By no
means; but we think it should be expounded to
the people by the philosopher, and not by the
demagogue. We protest against the disadvantages
under which those who desire to act consistently
labor, in consequence of the hypocrisy of
place-hunters
.
We give our sincere, and hearty, and
devoted support to that broad basis of our
Constitution
the
natural equality of allbut we are
compelled
to deny some of the inferences which are
attempted to be drawn from it. The
social
equality
of all is acted upon by nobody. The roughest
farmer in the backwoods expects from the
grownup
son who shares his businessfrom the man
whom he has hired to assist him in his labors
nay, from the wife of his bosoma deference
which he does not look for from those over whom
he has no control. He would as soon give up his
right hand as relinquish this supremacy. Yet he
would be indignant if you should attempt to prove
to him by argument that the distinctions which he
finds so necessary for the harmony and usefulness
of the members of his family, are equally requisite
for the well-being of society at large. This is a
view of the subject which he has never heard
discussed
at town-meetings; never read in his
newspaper
;
never learned from the stump-orator who
gained his vote and voice by declaring that the rich
are the natural enemies and oppressors of the poor.
We do not need to have our privileges extolled,
but we do sadly need faithfully and fearless exposition
of the duties which are entailed upon us by those
privileges. Yet it would seem to be left for
foreigners
to discern and to explain the difficulties and
peculiarities of our position, while those among us,
who are qualified to render this essential service to
their country, stand coldly aloof, disdaining to
counteract
,
even by a whisper, the loud and hollow
brawlings of the venal demagogue who pretends to
long for agrarian laws, and to approve of universal
and unmitigated coarseness. What
honest
man of
tolerable intellect and information really believes
that because men are born equal, there ought to
be no distinctions in society? Yet do we not see
this put forth daily by those who claim to be
directors
of the public mind? While none can attempt
to deny or conceal that the highest earthly reward
of strenuous effort and consistent virtue is to be
found in the respect, esteem, or admiration of our
fellow-beings, there are those who advance, side by
side with this reluctant confession, the insincere and
futile dogma that virtue, talent, accomplishments,
manners, wealthshould of right create no grades
in social life.
Why not go one step further, and say that all
theseart, science, intellectual power, virtue,
11*
manners, wealth,ought to be at once and forever
annihilated? Some one has lately given this as the
only consistent interpretation of the doctrine.
The distinction which arises from wealth alone
wealth ungraced by enlarged views, literary
acquirements, virtuous aspirations, or even elegant
mannerscan indeed be but a sordid one. It was
on this basis only, if I read aright, that Mr.
Margold
and his family built their lofty pretensions;
and it is certain that those pretensions were felt to
be supremely ridiculous by all who witnessed their
display. But the haughty demeanor which such
people suppose to be a representative of true dignity,
though it may pass unrebuked as long as they
remain
within the circle of their dependants and their
semblables,
will be detected and exposed as
counterfeit
the moment it comes in contact with
independent
minds. And if one may judge by the
angry remarks of such persons as our city
acquaintances
,
it is hard to say what degree of servility,
short of absolute slavery, would content their
magnificent
claims to the respect of those who chance
to lack their
summum bonum
. It is, in fact, slavery
which they desire. They are so intensely vexed
when poor people stand up rudely and boldly
for the rights which they suppose in danger, that it
is hard to make them willing these offenders should
be allowed any rights at all.
Politicians may talk of the simplicity of our
national maxims, but those who have seen their
practical bearings,those who have lived really
among the people,not in the great cities, where
society is, in many particulars, but a reflex of the
condition of the old world,these will bear
witness
that nothing can be more complex and puzzling
than the aspect given to our social relations by the
honest carrying out of these maxims. Not that the
maxims themselves involve contradictions when
rightly understood; but that they are misinterpreted
to inculcate impossible sacrifices, and so, like
custom-house
oaths, trouble only the honest.
There is indeed one key to the difficultythe
short and simple rule of Christian kindness. This
would smooth all salient and rugged points. There
need be no sacrifice of proper dignity or
reasonable
taste, and yet no wounding of natural human
feelings. In fact, distinctions are never offensive,
even among
us,
unless there be found haughtiness
on the one part or envy on its opposite; and if any
thing can be more inimical to the spirit of Christian
love than a self-worshipping pride, it is that
master-passion
of the fallen angels which gnashes its teeth
at the exaltation of another.
A high look and a proud heart, saith the wise
man, is sin;but who shall be able to stand
before envy?
CHAPTER XVI.
And as each one is praised for her peculiar things,
So only she is rich in meadows, meres, and springs;
And holds herself as great in her superfluous waste
As others by their towns and fruitful tillage graced.
Drayton.
I trust
I may be pardoned for having ventured
to give words to a small part of the reflections which
filled my mind after parting with the city travellers.
The subject is with us an all-engrossing one, and
so intimately is it connected with all that is most
important to us, that it is difficult to enter upon it
at all without enlarging to the extent of a volume
at leastso I must be excused for a few lines.
Our way lay northward, through a broken and
uneven tract, and the road wound round the base
of high woody hills in many an intricate curve.
This road is only one of Nature's laying. When it
is what is technically called laid, by the united
wisdom of the district,at present the owl and the
fox are the only
savans
in the neighborhood,it
will go most determinedly straight up and straight
down the hills, and in a bee line, as we say,
through the broadest marshes, if marshes lie in the
way. We scorn to be turned aside when we are
laying roads. Not that we run them in a direct
line between the places we wish to connect.
Nothing is further from our plan. We follow
section
lines most religiously, and consequently,the
sections being squares,we shall in time have the
pleasure of travelling zigzag at right angles, from
one corner of the state to another. We do not
submit to have notches and slices cut off our farms,
for the accommodation of the public. If fifty cents'
worth of land would save digging down a hill or
bridging a wide marsh at the expense of hundreds
of dollars, no farmer would be found who would
vote for so tyrannical a proceeding. Truly says
Mons. De Tocqueville that ours is a most expensive
mode of transacting public business.But as I
was saying, our road was not laid, so it was a
very even and pleasant one, although it led through
a rough country.
We had not yet lost the fresh breeze of the early
morning, but the sun had become so powerful as
to make the flickering shade of these scattered
woods very delightful to us all. The children
were never tired of watching the vagaries of the
little chipmonk as he glanced from branch to
branch with almost the swiftness of light, but they
screamed with pleasure when the noise of our
wheels started three young fawns that were quietly
nestled at the foot of a great oak, and now pursued
their graceful flight over hill and hollow, lost to the
sight at one moment, then reappearing on
another-eminence
,
and standing still to watch us, belling
all the while. It was a pretty sight, and I was as
much disappointed as the little folks when I found
our fairy company had indeed left us, as the
children
said, for good and all. On the whole, that
morning ride was one of the pleasant trifles which
one remembers for a long time.
Our scenery has been called tame. What is
tame scenery? Is every landscape tame which
cannot boast of mountains or cataracts? Save these
I know of no feature of rural beauty in which our
green peninsula is found wanting. If the richest
meadow-land shut in by gently swelling hills and
fringed with every variety of foliageif streams
innumerable, not wild and dashing it is true, but
rapid enough to insure purityif lakes in
unparalleled
variety of size and figure, studded with
islands and tenanted by multitudes of wild fowl
if these be elements of beauty, we may justly boast
of our fair domain, and invoke the eye of the
painter
and the pen of the poet. No spot on earth
possesses
a more transparent atmosphere. If it be true
of any region that
The glorious sun
Enriches so the bosom of the earth
That trees and flowers appear but like so much
Enamel upon gold
we may claim the description as our own. The
heavenly bodies seem to smile upon us without an
intervening medium. The lustre of the stars and
the white glittering moonlight seem more pure and
perfect here than elsewhere.
That's a little sun, papa! said wee Willie,
pointing with rapt admiration at the evening star;
and it is not long since I uttered an exclamation at
seeing what I supposed to be a crimson flame
bursting
over the roof of a house at a little distance, but
which proved to be Mars just risen above the
horizon
,
and showing an aspect which in warlike times
could be considered nothing less than portentous.
This peculiar transparency in the atmosphere is
strikingly evident in the appearance of the Aurora
Borealis, which often looks to be so near us that
one can almost fancy that the tall pines pierce its
silvery depths and enjoy perpetual daylight.
Perhaps it is this that gives a charm to scenery
which it has been the fashion to call tame. The
waters are more like molten diamonds, and the
herbage
like living emeralds, because the lustrous sky
brings out their hues in undimmed intensity, adding
depth to shadow, and keeping back nothing of
brilliancy. Philosophers might tell of refraction,
painters of
chiar oscuro
I have but one word
Beauty! and this expresses all that I know about
that which fills me with delight.
We can at least boast some features unique and
peculiar
in our landscapeour openings and our
wide savannas are not to be found in Switzerland,
I am sure. Theseas to the picturesque which
we are all wild aboutbear something like the same
proportion to the Alps that the fair, blue-eyed,
rosy-cheeked
and tidy daughter of one of our good
farmers
,
does to the Italian improvisatrice with her wild
black eyes and her soul of fire. There are many
chances in favor of the farmer's daughter being the
most comfortable person to live with, though she
will attract no tourists to her
soires
.
It is well understood that a large portion of the
new
new world was found but scantily clothed
with timber. Immense tracts are covered but thinly
with scattered trees, and these are almost
exclusively
of the different kinds of oak. By contrast with
the heavily timbered land these tracts seem almost
bare, and they have received the appropriate name
of oak-openings. Innumerable are the
hypotheses
by which the learned and the ingenious have
attempted to account for this peculiarity of the
country. Many have ascribed it to the annual
fires which the Indians are known to have sent
through the forest with the intention of clearing
away the almost impervious under-brush which
hindered their hunting. But the fact that the soil
of the openings is ordinarily quite different in its
characteristics from that of the timbered land seems
to oblige us to seek further for a reason for so
striking a difference in outward appearance. Much
of our soil is said to be diluvial,the wash of the
great ocean lakes as they overflowed towards the
south. This soil, which varies in depth from one
foot to one hundred, (say the explorers,) is light
and friable, but it is based upon something
emphatically
called hard pan, which is supposed to
prevent the roots of large trees from striking to a
proper depth. Whether oak-openings are found
only where the soil is one foot in thickness, or
equally where it extends to one hundred, we are
not informed, I believe; but in all cases the hard
pan gets the blame, from one class of theorists at
least, of the want of large timber in these park-like
tracts of our pleasant land.
The other feature to which I alludeda very
wide and flat onethe prodigious amount of wet
prairie or marshthe produce of millions of
springs which percolate in every direction this
diluvial
massis said to promise magnificent resources
of wealth forour great-grandchildren. At
present
it yields, in the first place, agues of the first
quality, and, secondly, very tolerable wild grass for
the cattle of the emigrant; which latter advantage
is supposed very much to have aided in the rapid
settlement of the country. People make their
transit now as in the time of the patriarchs, with
their flocks and their herds, certain of finding
abundant though coarse food for the sustenance of
all kinds of stock until they shall have had time to
provide better.
As to future days, inexhaustible beds of peat and
marlthe former to use as fuel when we shall
have burned all the oaks, the latter to restore the
exhausted soil to its pristine fertilityare to
compensate
to our descendants for the loss of energy
and enterprise which we ancestors shall
undoubtedly
VOL. I. 12
suffer through agues. So things will in time
be equalized. We reap the advantages of the rich
virgin soil; our hereafter is to find boundless wealth
beneath its surface.
Not fewer than three thousand lakesevery
one a mirror set in verdant velvet and bordered with
the richest fringewith a proportionate number
of streamsthe very threadiest capable of being
dammed into a respectable duckpondsupply
moisture to our fields. What wonder then that
those fields stand dressed in living green!
One acre of water to less than forty of land!
Small need, one would think, for artificial
irrigation
!
Yet we have seen much suffering from
drought, even in this land of water. For eighteen
months, at one time, we of the interior had not a
heavy shower, nor even a soft rain long enough
continued to wet more than the surface of the
ground. This lack of the ordinary supply of falling
water is supposed to have effected materially the
decrease of depth in the great lakes. Their
periodical
subsidence (a knotty subject, by the bye) went
on much more rapidly than usual during that time.
A smaller, though not unimportant, concomitant of
the parching process was the thirsty condition of
the poor cattle, who had to be driven, in some
cases, miles for each day's drink. They do not
like their champaign without water, so that they
really suffered. At such times, one is almost
disposed
to wish, in defiance of the picturesque, that
the state was laid out like a checkerboarda lake
in every other quarter-section. I suppose however
that no countryexcept Holland perhapsis
more thoroughly soaked than ours; so that,
notwithstanding
this one arid period, we need scarcely
fear that our history will be a dry one.
The quietly beautiful aspect of Michigan, tame
though it be, is not without its consolations. Have
not the learned agreed that people's characteristics
usually bear some mysterious
rapport
to those of
their native land? Few of our natives have as
yet had time to show much character, but as we
are bound to believe in the pretty notion that
La terra molle, lieta e dilettosa
Smile a se l'habitator produce
4
4.
Lands gentle-featured, calm and softly fair,
Produce such men as should be dwellers there.
what of mildness, kindness and all the gentler
virtues
may we not augur for the rising race? It is
true there may never be a William Tell among
them, but the mountain hero was the bright
creation
of circumstances that will never arise in this
sunny land of lakes. We can do without such, for
we shall have no Gesslers.
CHAPTER XVII.
'Tis a long rough road, said farmer John,
As he saddled his nag in haste to be gone;
But cheer thee, Dobbin! for this old sack
Will be light of its load ere we come back;
For our good miller, a jolly old soul,
Takes ever the grist, and gives customers the toll.
Western Ballad.
Wilder
and rougher grew our winding way
after we lost sight of the fawns, and I began to
think Constantinople must be farther off than we
had supposed, when our wheel plumped suddenly
into a great dry hole so deep that it brought our
steeds to a stand still. They, like ourselves, had
been unprepared for any thing of the sort, for the
track had been as smooth, if not as level, as a
bowling-green
.
It was green too, for it had not been
enough travelled to destroy the original sward.
What could be the meaning of this pitfall?
It was vain to question the trees or the
chip-monks
,
and our own wits offered no satisfactory
solution; so we drove on. A few yards more, and
we came to a similar trap, and from this time
onward
they became more and more frequent. They
were the oddest thing that could be, in this out of
the way place, seeming freshly dug and without
conceivable aim or purpose. We discussed the
point without arriving at any satisfactory
conclusion
,
till we became sensible of a new wondera
distant sound of Yo heave! recurring at regular
intervals, and transporting one's mind at once to
the borders of the well-beloved sea, whose various
music was far more familiar to our youthful ears
than the murmur of the forest.
Yo heave! Yo heave! the mingled sound of
many voices, became more and more distinctly
audible as we ascended a high bank broken every
where by the holes I have mentioned. When we
reached its summit, from which the road descended
suddenly into a deep, woody dell, a scene of strange
beauty met our eyes, and explained all. Over a
small stream in the bottom of the della mere
brooklet as it seemed from that distancesome
eighty or perhaps a hundred men were erecting
the frame-work of a large millan object which
seemed almost as much out of place in this primal
solitude as would the apparition of a three-decker
upon the stocks, which indeed it much resembled.
Nothing could be more striking than the contrast
between this intricate specimen of human skill, and
the majestic simplicity of nature around it. The
trees which had been felled to make room for it,
lay in their yet unfaded green on every side, and
so scanty allowance had been made for the gigantic
intruder, that the still living forest hung over its
symmetrical spars. An immense
beat
was about
to be raised, (borrowed learning this,) and as many
12*
men as could find hands-breadths on its edge were
applying their united energies to the task, bringing
to mind inevitably the sleeping Gulliver under the
efforts of his Lilliputians. As the huge mass left
the ground, poles and handspikes assisted its
ascent
,
and the Yo heave! was repeated as a
signal
for every fresh effort, as on shipboard. When
it had reached its place high in air, it made one's
heart stand still to see men perched upon it, and
leaning over to drive its corners home with heavy
mallets; those below tossing up the requisite pins,
which were caught with unerring precision.
When we could withdraw our attention from
this part of the scene, we found much to attract it
below. The spectacle of a raising, though so
commonplace
an affair elsewhere, is something worth
seeing in the woods; and accordingly there were
almost as many boys and idlers as efficient hands
present on this occasion. These were making the
most of their time in various games of skill or
strengthwrestling, running, leaping;and shouts
of merry laughter mingled with the cheering song
of the workmen. Not a few lounged around the
door of a temporary building or shanty, as we
sayerected for the refreshment of the guests;
for be it known that on these occasions neighbors
one and all leave their own business, if possible,
and lend their aid for love, and not for money
expecting only some good cheer, and in case of
need a reciprocation of the kindness.
Where the country is settled but little, the
assembling
of so many able-bodied men is no small
undertaking. I have no doubt the company before
us cost several days' hard riding. And there were
probably many there who would not have been
hired to quit their own affairs to work for any
body. It is considered very churlish to refuse in
such cases, and nothing would make a man more
unpopular than the habit of excusing himself from
raisings. Indeed few are disposed to offend in this
way, for these are considered in the light of friendly
visits, and constitute almost the sole attempt at
merry-making in which the men of the country
take part.
The work went on rapidly and well. Every
thing fitted, and the complicated structure grew as
if by magic aid. When one only thinks of such
undertakings, it seems wonderful that terrible
accidents
do not often occurbut when we see the
operation, it is more natural to ask how it is that
they ever occur, so great is the amount of skill,
care and accuracy employed. The master mind,
clear-headed and keen-eyed, stands by, calmly
directing the minutest movement; and so complete
is the confidence reposed in him that his commands
are implicitly obeyed where the least mistake
might cost many lives. This person took upon
himself very properly the right of repressing, with
some sternness, the jokes and laughter of the
younger portion of his assistants; who, preferring
of course the highest and most perilous parts of
the work, yielded to the excitement of the moment,
greatly increasing their own risk as well as that
of all concerned.
'Ta'n't play-spell, boys! said the boss.
Law! I tho't 'twas! I seen the master out o'
doors, replied one of the pickles.
Well, now you know it a'n't, you'd better keep
your teeth warm, shouted the master in return;
put your tongue in your elbow, and then may-be
you'll work!
And under such auspices it was not long before
the last rafter found its appropriate place, and
nothing
was lacking, from the huge foundation stones
which had left such yawning cavities in the wood,
through which we approached the scene, to the
apex of the airy pile, which showed its outline
with beautiful distinctness on the heavy foliage
around it. This was the moment of triumph.
The men, who had been scattered in every direction
throughout the frame, giving it the appearance of
an enormous bird-cage, or rather aviary, now ranged
themselves along the beams, and gave three thrilling
cheers, presenting the most perfect image of the
beautiful manuvre of manning the yards on
board a vessel of war, that can possibly be conceived.
With me the illusion was complete for the moment,
and I found my eyes filled with tearsthe tears
of ancient and well-preserved memories,in spite
of the great old trees and the deep lonely dell.
Nothing now remained but to name the structure
according to the formula invariably used on such
occasions, let the terms suit as they may.
Upon this plain
Stands a fair frame
Who'll give it a name?
To which a voice from a distant corner responded,
We'll call it `the miller's delight,'
To take toll all day and count the cash at night.
This again reminded me of the ceremony of
naming
at a launch, but if there were libations on this
occasion they were not poured upon the ground.
The whole company now adjourned to the shanty,
where abundant refreshments were provided. We
were very politely invited to partake, but the day
was waning, and the scene had already beguiled us
of so much time, that we declined any thing beyond
a glass of excellent spruce beer,a luxury which
we of the woods know how to appreciate.
Sir Walter Scott observes that he always found
something fearful, or at least melancholy, about
a mill. He had never seen one raised, I am
sure. Perhaps he had owned one when wheat,
having stood at twelve shillings, fell to six
and after some fluctuation settled at four. This
would account for his impression.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Near the moist brink
Of music-loving streams they ever keep,
And often in the lucid fountains peep.
H. Pickering.
The
day had been sultry, and, spite of the
woods, our horses began to look fagged and weary
before we reached the place where we intended to
pass the night. The sun was in mighty power, as
if he had forgotten it was four hours after noon,
but certain attendant clouds had already begun to
lay their golden cushions down in preparation
for his
coucher
. The land now lay low and level,
much intersected by small streams, and covered with
the long grass of our rich savannas. On these
wide, grassy plains, great herds of cattle were
feeding
,
or lying stretched in luxurious idleness under
the scattered trees. We might have been surprised,
such was the solitariness of the region, to find such
numbers of these domestic animals; but we have
not lived so long in the wilds without having
discovered
that a herd of cattle, with its tinkling bells,
is not to be considered as a sign of close vicinity to
the abodes of men. When cattle feed in wild and
unfenced pastures, they soon exhaust or spoil those
nearest home; and even without this excuse, they
will often wander at their own sweet will, till
the chase after them at milking-time becomes no
small part of the day's business.
Hunting cattle
is
a dreadful chore! remarked
one of our neighbors, with piteous emphasis, after
threading the country for three weeks in search of
his best ox.
This is one of the characteristic troubles of
new-country
life. In vain is the far-sounding bell
strapped round the neck of the master ox or cow,
(for we say
master-
cow by catachresis I suppose.)
A good bell may be heard by practised ears four
miles, if a valley or lake aid the transportation of
sound; and a horse that has been accustomed to
this species of coursing will prick up his ears and
turn his head toward the sound of a well-known
bell, thus serving as guide to the gudeman if he
chance to be slow of hearing. Yet the herd will
not always keep within bell sound. In vain too
do we employ every ingenious artifice of temptation
supplying our
salting-place
with the great
delicacy of the grazing people, and devoting the
bran of each grist to the purpose of an extra feast,
in the hope that the propensity to good feeding may
overrule the national taste for unbounded liberty.
Home-bred memories seem to have no place in
the ruminations of the gregarious tribes. These
expedients, which are resorted to only by the more
provident, have indeed some efficacy, but they do
not remedy the evil. It is sometimes mitigated by
accidental causes.
When the flies become troublesome on the wide
marshes, the whole herd, as if by previous
agreement
,
will make for some well-known shade, near
or distant, as the case may be, and there pass the
sultry hours, only changing their position gradually,
as the sun throws the coveted shadow eastward.
And at the time of year when insects are most
tormenting, the farmers make huge smokes in
convenient
spots near home, certain that to these all
the cattle in the neighborhood will flock
instinctively
,smoke
being the best of all preventives
against flies and mosquitoes. So that, in the six
weeks of mosquito-time, cattle-hunting becomes a
less formidable chore, and thus good comes out
of evil. Evil! ay, the term is none too strong! I
appeal to those who have travelled in the timbered
land in July or August, I will not say to those who
live
in those regions, for I would fain hope their
skin is hardened or armed in some way, as the fur
of the ermine thickens and turns white in
preparation
for a Siberian winter.
One may observe,
en passant,
that ours is a rare
region for the study of entomology. Those
virtuosi
who expend their amiable propensities in
transfixing butterflies and impaling gnats would
here find ample employment from May till
November
.
Indeed they might at times encounter more
specimens than they could manage comfortably and
without undue precipitation. First, in early April,
appear, few and far between, the huge blue-bottle
flies, slow-motioned and buzzy, as if they felt the
dignity of their position as ancestors. Next in
order, if I forget not, come the most minute of
midges, silent and stealthy, pretending
insignificance
in order that they may sting the more
securely
.
These seem to be ephemera, and fortunately
the race soon runs out, at least they trouble us but
for a short time.
Flies properhonest, sincere fliescome on so
gradually that we can hardly date their advent;
but it is when sultry weather first begins, when
the loaded clouds and the lambent lightning
foretell
the warm shower, that twitchings are seen,
and quick slaps are heard,and these, with the
addition of something very like muttered
anathemas
,
announce the much-dreaded mosquito. Then
come eveningsfortunately not long ones,
passed in the dark, lest the light should encourage
the intruders. Moonlight is praised; and even
this must be admired through closed sashes, unless
we can contrive by the aid of closely-fitted gauze
blinds to turn the house into a great safety-lamp,
we burning within its sultry precincts. Then
are white walls spotted with human blood, like the
den of some horrible ogre. Then smudges are
in vogue,heaps of damp combustibles placed on
the windward side of the house and partially
ignited
,
that their inky steams may smother the
mosquitoes
while we take our chance. I have had a
smudge made in a chafing-dish at my
bedside
,
VOL. I. 13
after a serious deliberation between choking
and being devoured at small mouthfuls, and I
conscientiously
recommend choking, or running the
risk of it, at least.
If one wished to make a collection for a museum,
nothing more would be necessary than to light a
few candles on any hot, close evening in August,
especially when the weather is cloudy, and the
open windows would be filled at once with a
current
of insect life, comprising all the varieties of
coleoptera
and their many-named kinsfolk; from
the shard-borne beetle with his drowsy wing,
that goes knocking his back with unflinching
pertinacity
against every inch of the ceiling, to the
darning-needle, said to be an implement of Pluto
himself, darting in all directions a body as long,
and to all appearance as useless, as the sittings of
our legislature.
We must not however claim preminence for our
dear Michigan in this particular point. The
gallinippers
of Florida are said to have aided the
Seminoles
in appalling our armies, and we have of late
heard of a prodigious number of bites in all parts of
the Union. And do we not know from
unquestionable
historic authority, namely, that of a British
tourist in America, that a presumptuous proboscis
once dared to penetrate even General Washington's
boots, as he rode through Newark marshes?
Our butterflies are nothing to boast of, and there
are few of them with which one would be willing
to change costumes, even to be born in a bower.
I have fancied that yellow predominates more than
usual among them, and I have been tempted to
believe they are bilious, like the rest of us. At any
rate, the true ethereal and brilliant Psyche is but
faintly represented by any specimen I have yet
seen.
Mosquito-time, as before hinted, lasts, in its fury,
but about six weeks, but flies are in season all
summer. In the months of August and September
particularly, black is the prevailing color of ceilings,
looking-glasses and pictures, not to mention edibles
of all classes. Much ingenuity is displayed in
contriving
what, in the paraphrastic tone of the day,
we are bound to denominate destructive allurements
for these intrusive and inconsiderate insects,we
used to call them fly-traps. These consistin the
more refined situationsof paper globes and
draperies
,
delicately cut, so as to present externally an
endless variety of cells and hiding-places, and these
are well furnished within with poisoned sweets.
Less fanciful people, frugal housewives and
hard-hearted
old bachelors,place a large tumbler, partly
filled with molasses, and covered with a piece of
innocent-looking pasteboard having in the centre a
hole large enough for a blue-bottle to enter
toute
dploye,
but affording a poor chance for escape
after he has clogged his feet and wings in the too
eager pursuit of pleasurea melancholy (and
quite new) warning illustration of the
facilis
descensus
.
And again those of us who may by some
chance have attended a course of chemistry, show
our superior advantages by using a little water
impregnated with cobalt, which carries swift
destruction
in every sip; and having at least the
recommendation of not being sticky, answers a
very good purpose, unless the children happen to
drink it.
Yet this ingenious variety of deaths makes no
perceptible diminution in the number of our
tormentors
,
and I have heard a good old lady exclaim
against such contrivances altogether, saying that if
you kill one fly, ten will be sure to come to his
funeral.
Yet we must not be persuaded to fancy
ourselves
worse off than other people in this particular
either. I remember welland perhaps you too,
readerthe appearance of an elegant array of
confectionary
displayed in a verandah which hung over
a lovely moonlit lake in a region where flies and
midges had been for many years under the
civilizing
influences of good society. A blaze of light
illumined the flower-wreathed pillars, and the gay
crowd were ushered from the ball-room to the
delicately
furnished table, when lo! every article in
sight appeared as if covered with black pepper;
and the purest white and the most brilliant
rainbow
tints of creams and ices presented but one sad
suit of iron gray. The very lights waxed dim in
the saddened eyes of the gazers, for whole colonies
of hapless gnats had found ruin in too warm a
reception
,
and were revenging themselves by
extinguishing
their destroyers.
But return we to our herds feeding beside the
still waters.
13*
CHAPTER XIX.
I am as free as Nature first made man,
Ere the base laws of servitude began,
When wild in woods the noble savage ran.
Dryden.
When
we miss our way in a labyrinth,I have
never attempted any thing in this line beyond
following
with my bodkin's point cunning trickery
on paper,our only hope of ultimate success lies
in returning to the position whence we set out, and
endeavoring by more disciplined attention to avoid
further wandering. I believe some people's heads
are labyrinthine by naturebut we will try.
We left the sun setting or preparing to set; the
willows looking at their pensile tresses in the
water
;
the herds making pleasant music at small cost
as they cropped the dainty meadow-grass. As my
memory recurs to that hour of beauty, I can
recollect
that we paused a moment under the shade of
a spreading beech, and were wishing that the taste
of some adventurous settler had led him to pitch
his tent in this lovely spot, that we need not
wander
further in search of a shelter for the night, when
we discovered that the light evening breeze, that
had seemed so refreshing as we met it on our
onward
way, was in reality coaxing from their day
beds whole clouds of mosquitoes, whose detested
horn was fast overpowering all sweeter sounds.
The charm of the scene was gone at once. To
the practised ear the note of this enemy of mankind
is like signal guns in battlea sound which
awakens at once a degree of passionate energy that
would seem surprising to the uninitiated. Our good
steeds felt the whip, probably for the first time that
day, and we soon found ourselves at the summit of
a gentle eminence which arose gradually from the
borders of the wide tract of meadow. Here the eye
wandered over a plain clothed rather sparingly
with heavy timber, and affording a cheering though
distant view of several newly-built log-houses
peeping here and there between the tall and
stately trunks of the original forest. Could this
be Constantinople? or was it only a Pera or
Scutari
a
mere vestibule to more imposing
localities
?
We could not be long in suspense. Fumes of
tobacco filled the airI hope the Turks smoke a
better qualityand lo! before we reached the
first house or its clearing, an Indian, without any
sort of covering for the head, not even a flaming
handkerchiefhis hair faded to a red brown by the
burning suna cigar in his mouthand in his hand
yet no!it cannot be!yes! it isa book!
An Indian with a book! This must be some
missionary
station that we had never heard of. And
besides
,
I thought our Indians had all been persuaded
off to Green Bay, at the point of the bayonet.
Can you tell us, friend,but what is this?
Mr. Jenkins! our old neighbor, Mr. Simeon
Jenkins
ruralizing
with a volume such as used to
grace the corner of his shop! the very same, I dare
say; at any rate I warrant it full of hard words,
or it would not have found favor in his eyes.
Our quondam neighbor seemed really glad to see
us. Cordial greetings were exchanged, and many
questions asked on both sides; but the one I most
desired to put, I did not dare even to hint at,
namely
,
what could possibly have transformed our friend
into so near a resemblance to the aborigines? He
never was particularly solicitous as to his outward
man, but he used to wear Hyperion's curls, though
he combed them but seldom; and his front, though
not exactly that of Jove, was of a scholarly
whiteness
save when he rubbed it red in the anxiety of
his deep cogitations. His dress, which had
formerly
carried with it as much of an outside show of
humanity as that of most of his neighbors, was
now, to say the least, none too much for the sultriest
weather. He seemed systematically to have
dispensed
with every thing that could be deemed
superfluous even by an Indian. Indeed, Red
Jacket
,
if we may draw inferences from his name, must
have been in the habit of devoting a greater
proportion
of his income to external decoration, than
our literary friend in his rusticated state.
He was changed but little, otherwise. His flow
of talk presented the old mixture of grand words,
picked up in the course of his reading, with local
peculiarities of diction which came unbidden.
We had no idea that you lived in this quarter,
Mr. Jenkins. I think, when you left our
neighborhood
,
you were going into another part of the
country?
True! you are correct. When I transferred
my residence, I located for a pretty considerable
space of time in Etny, which was then
confidentially
anticipated for to become the county-seat.
But, by the influence of faction, sir, our plans was
circumvented; nothing went as it had oughter;
and when I see how things was a goin', and that
we had got to be awfully taxed to pay for them
county-buildin's that's a dilapidatin' every day for
want of tenants and winder-glass, I concluded to
cut stick; and as my cows
would
concentrate at
Constantinople whether or no, and it took all my
time to run after 'em, I thought I might as well
come here at once, and devote myself to an
agricultural
profession.
This is Constantinople then?
It is. This here eighty in your immediate
vicinity is intersected with streets.
And the stream which we have just passed
has it a name too?
I should think it had! That's the Wolgy. I
named it myself, after considerable of a run in the
old country. Wolgy Creek, they call it here. There
is not much book-learning among our neighbors.
This last observation was accompanied by a
pitying smile.
I suppose your own studies must be materially
interrupted since you turned farmer.
Mine! O no! far otherways, for I farm
altogether
by the book. I consider headwork to be by
far the most important, so I generally let my boys
perform the manual labor, while I exercise my
mind in planning work for them. Farming requires
a great deal of reflection, and I never could reflect
much while I was hard at work.
And how does your mode of farming
succeed
?
Why, as to that, I hardly consider myself in
a suitable position for to answer determinedly.
I got a number of plans, and made some
improvements
upon every one of them, but some how or
anotherthe season wasn't propitiatious. My
wheat was unaccountable chessy, though I turned
water upon it, and kept it moist all summer.
After
all my care, we came pretty nigh bein' short on
for bread-timber this spring. I hadn't good luck
with my bees, neither; they all died off, though I
washed the hives in sulphur-water to kill the
worms. Some of the neighbors says it was the
sulphur that killed 'em, but they are very much
under the dominion of prejudice and superstition.
Sulphur is a dreadful purifying thing, and there
a'n't nothing in the analogy of things to make a
body suppose it would be bad for any thing.
Your neighbors then do not agree with you in
your fondness for experiments?
No! they are jined to their own ways, and
adverse to any improvement. I got some
silk-worms
,
and tried 'em upon oak-leaves, and they all
died, and I ra'ally believe my neighbors was glad
on't. Now you see them silk-worms had been
foolishly kept upon one particular kind of food;
but I am certain that if I could light upon some
that had been left to foller the leadings of their
own just appreciations, they would elongate the
best of silk from oak-leaves, which is naturally,
you know, a very tough sort of victuals, and would
therefore, of course, be productive of causing the
silk to be stronger. But, talking of victuals, won't
you enter my cottage and partake of a little
refreshment
?
It's a getting on towards night, and I
reckon you can't get along much further.
This was declined, as we had a particular
resting-place
in view; but we could not think of
proceeding
without seeing Mrs. Jenkins, who is a woman of
sterling worth, and bears her husband's oddities with
admirable patience, evidently considering him as
belonging to that high order of genius whose
errors are more than pardonable.
The good lady received us with smiles somewhat
tinctured with sadness. She had not found very
pleasant the change of residence, from a little
growing
village, where plain wives and mothers often
dropped in to take a quiet cup of tea, and discuss the
floating, feminine news of the day, to a woodland
solitude, where even her husband's grandiloquence
was but sparingly bestowed, and where he
identifying
himself alternately with Cincinnatus,
Franklin
,
and Lord Byronexacted the indulgence and
the homage which he conceived to be the just due of
a person whose exalted capacities and acquirements
united all these claims, and some more besides.
Mrs. Jenkins did not appear to have participated
in her husband's plan of extreme simplification of
costume. Her gown and cap were neat as usual,
though somewhat more worn than when I saw her
last; and she enjoyed shoes, though not stockings.
Perhaps Mr. Jenkins had discovered that the
Albanian
ladies did not consider them indispensable.
The younger children were somewhat like Cupids,
in drapery if not in contour; the elder had not yet
returned from their field-work.
While we detailed our stories of village news,
births, deaths, marriages, and removals,the last
far the most prolific topic,Mr. Jenkins vanished
for a few moments, and when he reappeared it
could not be unobserved that he had made material
additions to his dress. His wife looked evidently
pleased at this effort at humanization, and he replied
to her looks with something of a sheepish air, as
one might who had been caught betraying his
principles.
The evenings come on chilly, after these hot
days, he said; and I find that old habits requires
more covering than an unsophisticated natural
condition would render necessary. I am a trying
to bring up my family upon rational principles, and
to learn them not to want things that wasn't
naturally
required by the human constitution at the
creation of the world. We all know that nature
had its origin before the rise of human affairs, and
that most of the inventions that men has sought
out, is the offspring of pride and luxuriousness,
no ways needed by man in his true, independent
condition.
But do you consider it desirable to exchange
the habits of civilized life for those of the savage,
of our own Indians for instance?
Certingly I do. Pride I consider to be the
ruin of every thing in this world. Now there a'n't
no pride among the Indians. They like a man
just as well when he is dirty as if he was dressed
up ever so grand, and better too, because it seems
more sociable. Every body's alike among them,
and so it ought to be. They all eat out of one
dish, and drink out of one bottle.
But would you like to eat and drink with
them?
Why, as to that, the Indians is nasty creatures,
and don't know how to cook any thing; and
besides, my habits is fixed, as I was a saying a
while agoand my health a'n't very good neither
VOL. I. 14
(he might have stood for a Hercules)and besides,
as to eatin', you know the Indians a'n't the same
color that we be.
Oh! your opinion that every body is alike
does not extend to color then?
I should hope not! you'll never catch me
eatin' with Indians nor niggers. They never were
meant to associate with white folks. But I want
my boys to be brought up rational, only their
mother won't let 'em.
I could not help saying I was glad to hear it.
Yes, I s'pose so! was the reply. Your
ideas was all originated and begun where folks
lived for nothing but prideI don't mean no
reflections
,but
it is jes so with people that's
brought up in citiesI don't blame you none,
but I know you can't be expected to see things in
their true light. We ra'ally need but precious little
if it wasn't for pride.
We knew of old that Mr. Jenkins's passion for
argument was insatiable, and we declined entering
on the discussion of first principles on so short
notice. We knew too that our old neighbor had
been sadly unsuccessful in the many ingenious
modes by which he had attempted to get a living
without work; so that we had the more charity
for his desire to prove that very little is needed in
this world beyond a contented mind. He is one
of a numerous class who solace themselves by
decrying worldly advantages which they have not
been able to attain, and habits of neatness and
refinement
which contravene their own coarse and
self-indulgent usages. They are self-deceivers
undoubtedly
,
but they seldom deceive others. Their
inconsistencies invariably tell the truth.
We might have been glad of a further
opportunity
to cheer the good wife, whose eyes told the
pleasure our call was bestowing; but the
westering
sun warned us to depart, and we bade adieu
after requesting a visit in return.
CHAPTER XX.
Where were his friends when he sank low?
Knew they no strange presaging woe?
Ah, no! they talked, or laughed, or sang,
Unconscious of his dying pang.
Mrs. Radcliff
.
The
evening had fallen when we arrived at our
lodging-place, and the stars were beginning to be
visible, like specks of chaste silver in the dazzling
but shaded gold of the western sky. We had left
Constantinople several miles behind us, and the
dwelling to which we had now come stood solitary
in the centre of a wide clearing, with not a tree of
the dense forest left to shade it from the burning
sun. This was nothing new to us, for it is the
prevailing taste of the country, but one can never
get accustomed to so barbarous a fashion. The
new
feature on this occasion consisted in thirteen
huge pillars, not supporting the low roof of the
cottage, but standing in a semicircle, with nothing
above them but the star-spangled arch of night.
They were of Saxon proportionsalmost as thick
as they were high; and they bore not the
outline
of mere stumps, for they were of nearly even
size throughout. Black-looking and ominous things
were they, and in the dying light they gave
the scene an air of Druid gloom. As we drew up
at the bars the house-dogs barked, and with some
aid from Leo, made abundance of noise, but no
sign of humanity greeted our approach. One does
not wait for invitation however in such cases, and
we opened the door upon a sad scene.
The master of the family, a stout farmer of forty,
whom we had met only a day or two before, lay
extended on the bed, evidently beyond the help of
man. His eyes had begun already to wear the
cold glaze of death, and his countenance expressed
an intensity of anxiety and distress which was
fully reflected in the faces gathered around his bed.
An awful silence, which we of course were most
careful not to disturb, reigned in the room, broken
only at long intervals by a faint moan from the
dying
man, echoed with heart-breaking emphasis by
his poor wife, who wiped his forehead frequently,
with a trembling hand. A large family of children,
and two or three neighbors, made up the company,
and one of the latter, stepping out of the door,
beckoned my husband, and explained the dreadful
casualty which had thus brought sorrow like a
whirlwind.
The poor man had been crushed by a falling
tree. He had been an adventurous and successful
bee-hunter, and the pillars which had attracted our
attention were the trophies of his triumphs in this
line. He had by his very success been excited
to still further effort, intending to surpass all his
14*
neighbors in his collection of bees, and in the
quantity
of honey which he should prepare for market.
The thirteen monuments near his house had every
one been procured at the risk of life or limb. They
were the shafts of bee-trees, found in the forest at
much expense of time and trouble, and cut down
with so much skill as not to disturb the inhabitants,
although this implies not only felling, but also
cutting off all that part of the tree which grows
above the hive.
The mode in which this is accomplished is this:
another tree, or perhaps more than one, is first felled
in such a direction as to form an elastic bed for the
reception of the bee-tree, which thus falls without
shattering itself to pieces, as from its hollowness it
is sure to do when it falls on the ground. The
upper portion is then to be removed, and when
this is very heavy, as is generally the case, since
the hives are almost always found in very large old
trees, the greatest care and accuracy are requisite to
prevent a tremendous and dangerous rebound of
one or both the parts.
After all his experience and all his triumphs,
poor Mallory, perhaps grown less careful as he
became more self-confident, had received the whole
force of a huge limb across his neck and shoulders,
and though no fracture could be discovered, it was
evident from the first, that death was in the blow.
There was not only no medical aid in the
neighborhood
,
but his son, who was his assistant on the
occasion, was obliged to walk two miles before he
could procure a yoke of oxen and a sled on which
to bear him home. One scarcely dares to imagine
what his wife must have suffered as she pursued
her weary way over a thousand obstacles to the
depth of the dense wood where she was to find
him dyingperhaps dead. But it may be that
our imaginations would not picture such scenes
faithfully.
He
who tempers the wind to the
shorn lamb, does not, we may hope, give to those
of his children, whose lot it is to dare the perils and
trials of the unhewn wilderness, that cultivated
sensitiveness which places new and keen weapons
in the hand of sorrow. Their lives are occupied
with stern realitiessome of them sad and heavy
ones; and the necessity for constant effort and for
habitual fortitude, is a protection against the
exaggerations
of fancy.
The woodsman is continually subject to
accidents
of the most appalling kind. Added to the
incredible toil of clearing heavily timbered land,
the hardy settler goes to his work every morning
with the consciousness that only the same
Providence
that could preserve him unharmed on the
field of battle, can shield him from the perils of his
daily labor. The ordinary operation of cutting
down large trees, if performed where the timber is
scattered, involves considerable risk; since a
splinter
,
a limb heavier than was allowed for, or a heart
more decayed than appeared outwardly, may thwart
his nice calculations, and wound if not kill him.
But it is in the dark and heavy wood, where the
fathers of the forest stand in ranks almost as serried
as those of the columns of Staffa, that peculiar
dangers are found. If a tree, when felled, happen
to lodge against another, it is almost a miracle if it
is dislodged without an accident. This the best
and most experienced woodsmen acknowledge, yet
there are few of them who can resist the temptation
to try. In cutting down the supporting tree, the
one first felled is almost certain either to slide or to
rebound in a way which baffles all calculation, and
accidents from this cause are frightfully frequent.
The only safe course is to girdle the second tree,
and let both stand until they decay, or until some
heavy storm sweeps down the incumbrance. But
this involves too great a vexation to the axeman,
since his ambition is to see the piece of land he
has undertaken to clear, bereft, of every thing but
the unsightly stumps which attest his skill and
bravery.
Here the fatal consequences of too adventurous
daring had brought woe unutterable, and we could
read volumes of anguished thought in the
darkening
countenance of the sufferer, as he rolled his
dim eye slowly round the circle of youthful
countenances
,
and fixed it at last on the face of his wife.
If you and they were provided forhe said
in a faint, husky voice,and he tried to add
God's will be done!
The words were not fully audible, but the
feeling
was there, for the calm expression which
belonged
to it took gradual possession of the sunken
features.
To stay to witness so heart-rending a scene
would have been worse than useless, for what
could we do or say? If a stranger intermeddleth
not with our joy, how much less with our
sorrow
!
A lad had been sent fifteen miles for the nearest
physician, and at this moment a slight bustle at the
door announced their arrival. As the medical man
entered, we withdrew, and, setting out once more,
drove on with overburdened hearts to the next
house, which was perhaps three miles off. There
we explained our circumstances and asked for
lodging, which was very hospitably accorded by
the sole inmates, an old man and his wife. They
had but one room, and much of one of its sides
was occupied by a carpenter's bench and tools;
but the space was still large, and they had plenty
of bedding, so that it was not difficult to arrange
resting-places for weary people.
After the children were in bed, I looked out for
a while at a low meadow which lay at no great
distance from the house, now covered with a
splendid show of fire-flies. The moon had not yet
risen, and the evening being somewhat cloudy, the
effect of this ever-changing expanse of green light
was most brilliant. Yet all was saddened for the
time by the impression of the scene we had just
quitted. The busy flitting, the appearing and
disappearing
of these shining creatures, seemed to
image only the efforts, the successes and the
disappointments
of human life; and I was glad at
length to forget in sleep fatigue and heavy
thoughts.
CHAPTER XXI.
The weight of this sad time we must obey;
Speak what we feel, not what we thought to say.
Shakspere
.
So
soon and so soundly did we rest after a weary
day, that when we were awakened by a loud
hammering
,
we supposed the night was gone, and the old
carpenter arisen to his daily labor. He had a
candle
however, and I lay idly watching his
movements
,
and noting the various operations of planing
and shaping, till I became aware that his business
was none other than the framing of a last receptacle
for one of the tenants of the narrow house. I now
remembered, too, that it was Sunday morning.
Are you really making a coffin? I said, as if
such a work could be strange any where.
Surely I am, said the old man, and for a
good neighbor too.
For whom, pray?
Seth Mallory, you know,you saw him in
the evening,he was the man that got hurt
yesterday
.
Mallory! he is dead then! and so soon
No! I believe he wa'n't quite gone when they
came and brought me the measure. You know
they'll want to bury him pretty soon 'cause the
weather's so warm.
The idea nearly curdled my blood. A coffin for
the still living husband and father! My thoughts
recurred to that agonized countenance, and its look
of manly care and love for the dear one she was
leaving.
Is it possible his body was measured for the
grave while he was yet alive?
Oh, he was past knowing any thing, poor
fellow, and they got his woman out of the room
for a few minutes. You know, ma'am, such things
must be done, and the sooner the better, said the
old man as he stooped over his work.
He himself had nearly reached the limit of
human life, and the few scattered hairs which still
remained on his temples shone like silver in the
light of the one dim candle; yet he wrought away
cheerily at the strong man's coffin, whistling
occasionally
to himself as the ghastly object assumed the
proper shape. He might have personified Death
as he fashioned this emblem of mortality, but it
would have been Death in a mild and kind form.
And is not this Death's usual form? and why do
we ever picture him otherwise?
As much of the night was still to come, I tried
to turn away and forget the scene and its
associations
,
but it would not be. My eyes were
fascinated
to the spot, and I lost not a step of the process.
A white lining was tacked to the sides, the cover
was shaped, and smoothed, and fitted and screwed
home; and to my excited mind, the body, still
warm with scarce departed life, was pressed
within
these dark and narrow bounds. Why are we
trained from infancy to such gloomy and terrifying
views of all that belongs to this universal and
inevitable
change?
Day dawned before the work was finished, and
the old man, carefully extinguishing his candle and
setting open the door, put the last touches to it by
the cold gray light of morning. He stained the
whitewood with some reddish composition, and
then, after turning it in every direction and
surveying
it with a look of professional complacency, set
it up against the outside of the house to dry in the
beams of the rising sun.
We were at breakfast when two young men
came for the coffin.
What time did he die? asked the old man.
He breathed till about midnight, but he never
spoke after dark.
Ay! said the old lady, I thought he would
die about the turn of the tide. When do they bury
him?
This afternoon, after meeting.
This strange custom obtains here, almost
universally
.
A dead body is seldom kept in the house
more than one night, and sometimes not even one.
More especially if an opportunity occurs to bury
the dead on Sunday is the last rite hastened; since
the presence of a minister of religion, and a day of
leisure and of best clothes, are all convenient.
VOL. I. 15
Such haste seems more excusable under such
circumstances
,
when we consider the condition and
habits of the country, but there are cases where it
looks like an indecent or a superstitious haste to
get rid of a painful object. The superstitious
feeling
is not, perhaps, very common; but there are
some who are, as they say, afraid of the bodies
of their nearest friends. This is generally found,
if at all, in young people; and it arises probably
from their having been bred in neighborhoods so
far scattered that deaths were very infrequent, and
so came seldom under their notice. I have seen a
young woman who did not dare approach the corpse
of her husband unless somebody went with her
and remained close at her side.
The meeting of that day was held in a large barn
at some miles' distance. It was a quarterly meeting
of one of the sects most numerous in this country,
and great numbers attended from every direction.
The central part or bay of the barn was filled
with seats of rough boards, and a long seat for the
preachers was enclosed after the same style. The
place was crowded to such a degree, that even
after many men and boys had perched themselves
on beams and other out of the way places, there
were still numbers who remained in their wagons,
drawn up as near as might be, so as to be able to
hear all that was said. And this was not difficult,
for in most cases the speakers, who were seven
in number, exerted their lungs to a degree that I
had seldom heard equalled.
In spite of many unpleasant circumstances
naturally
inseparable from a gathering of this kind, the
scene was a very impressive one. The greatest
attention prevailed, and there was an air of
reverence
and devotion which is not always the attendant
on the long-drawn aisle and the solemn organ. The
speakers adverted more than once to the
circumstances
of our Savior's birth; and indeed nothing
could be more natural than the connection which
brought that humble yet glorious scene to mind.
It was needless then to warn us against despising
our place of meeting. The idea had already
consecrated
it to purposes of worship.
The preachers all spoke in turn, but of course
each briefly. Prayer and singing came between
these short sermons, the singing seeming
spontaneous
,
as no hymns were given out. One of the
ministers would begin singing without any
previous
notice, and as if taking it for granted that
every body would be able to join, as indeed many
did, forming a choral swell of wild and solemn
melody. The sacrament followed, and it was
administered and received with much appearance
of earnest devotion. Ere yet the holy rite was
finished, the body of the unfortunate Mallory, and
with it his weeping wife and her bereaved children,
were all in the midst before we were aware. The
coffin was placed on trestles before the preacher's
desk, and after the communion, one of the ministers,
one who had been long a neighbor of the deceased,
pronounced a funeral sermon,unpremeditated of
course,but who could lack most touching topics
of instruction on such an occasion as this?
Funeral hymns were now sung, and prayers
offered
for the afflicted family; and then the whole
multitude followed the corpse in solemn procession
to the burial-place. This was a sweet, lonely spot,
enclosed, even in the heart of the wilderness,
with pious care. There were many tall trees left
standing, and beneath them a few graves marked
only by a piece of wood at the head and feet. In
silence was the dust committed to its kindred dust,
in silence, if we except many a sob,and when
all was done, a venerable old man, in the name of
the family, thanked friends and neighbors for their
aid and sympathy, and with a bow of his silvery
head, dismissed the assembly.
CHAPTER XXII.
All the plain
Covered with thick embattled squadrons bright,
Chariots, and flaming arms, and fiery steeds,
Reflecting blaze on blaze.
Milton.
Half
a day's easy driving transported us from
this scene of primitive simplicity and rudeness to a
beautiful and populous town, whose hotel, spacious
and elegant, and exceedingly well managed, offered
some temptation to an extended stay, after our
homely lodging at the old carpenter's, and sundry
others not much more desirable. These contrasts
are very striking in a new country. The
settlement
has been sudden, and very unequal, and you
emerge from the untouched forest, through which
you have been threading your way long enough
almost to forget that there are such things as
dwellings
and enclosures, upon highly-cultivated farms
and busy villages. These contrasts we may find
in travelling in any country, but they are more
striking in these newly-settled regions because of
the wild freshness of the aspect of Nature in the
intervening tracts. Immense trees give an air of
solitary grandeur to the landscape, and the absence
of every thing like fence or dividing line of any
sort, inspires ideas of immensity,of solitude,
15*
which make the sudden apparition of man and the
traces of his busy hands produce a feeling akin to
surprise.
After we left the woods we came out upon what
had been, a few years since, a small prairie, now
covered with loads of nodding grain, swayed by
every passing breeze into the semblance of
golden-brown
billows. There are few more beautiful
sights than a wheat-field full half a mile square,
perfectly level, and unbroken by any thing save
perhaps here and there a fine old tree, promising a
noontide shelter to the reapers. One does not
wonder
that such views suggested to the poets of old
the images of laughter and singing.
The prairie-land passed, our road was
log-cause-way
;
a long straight track through a dead swamp,
and in this all horrors are expressed, all
mud-holes
,
all thumps, all impossibility of turning out.
This was a pretty place in which to meet a political
convention! a new kind of locomotive of
immeasurable
power, not very easily managed except by
adepts.
It was a formidable apparition certainly; and
we were fain to shrink into infinitesimal
nothingness
,
and to find a place for our outer wheels on
the sloping ends of the corduroy, even at the risk
of a souse into a sea of black mud; for there was a
deep ditch on either side. The chance that even
our sober steeds would endure the clatter of drums
and fifes, cymbals and triangles,noisy orators
and still noisier singers,was a small one; but
there was no retreat, and we remained perched on
our bad eminence, until the whole procession
had passed.
There were perhaps thirty vehicles, of which the
smallest were large wagons, with four horses each.
There were gayly painted bargescanoes, I
ought to say, in the spirit of the day,mounted
on wheels, and drawn by unnumbered if not
innumerable
steeds, and containing crowds of people;
every man and every horse bearing a banner,
inscribed
either with high-sounding patriotism on a
large scale, or with electioneering squibs on a very
small one. There were rectangular countenances,
drawn evidently with the aid of compass and
square, and haloed round with snow-white fleece
accredited representatives of the much-disfigured
father of our country; then again, faces wherein
a very long drooping nose was surmounted by a
pair of eyes that seemed running into oneawful
travesties of the popular candidate. There were
golden eagles spreading their gorgeous wings amid
the stars, on fields of silk blue as their own heaven,
and raccoons enough (in effigy) to have fed the
whole national eyry, if golden eagles could eat.
A huge ball was rolled along, with great
appearance
of effort, by several men, and these actors, by
their shouted watchwords and their various
significant
decorations, gave us to understand that the
said ball typified the interests of their favorite. A
miniature log-cabin, the very ditto of those by the
road side, mounted on a platform spacious enough
to carry much of the out-door arrangements of a
settler's primitive establishment, was drawn by a
long string of oxen, the tips of whose horns streamed
with flags and knots of gay ribbon. The emblems
which met the eye every moment embraced all
degrees of ingenuity and absurdity, and the costume
of those who exhibited them was almost equally
various.
There was an Indian, in blue and red paint and
a feather-petticoat, bearing a banner with the
inscription
,
Our best brave; here an impersonation
of Liberty, strait-laced and anxious, in pink ribbons
and black prunello boots. Now a car from which
an orator was setting forth in no inelegant terms
the pretensions of the idol; and anon another
bearing
his image, in the act of presenting a horse to a
minister. Under the influence of omnipotent
corduroy
,
the minister, first tottering like Mr. Stiggins,
abominably knocked down his benefactor, and the
horse sympathetically tumbled on them both and
completed the pyramid.
Such trifling disasters passed unfelt and almost
unnoticed in the enthusiasm of the hour. Beneath
all the little oddities which are almost inseparable
from the getting up of a popular show on so large
a scale with rather incongruous materials, there
was evidently an under current of warm feeling
and genuine interest which makes every thing
respectable
;
and however one might feel disposed to
laugh at some particulars of the exhibition, there
was an impressiveness about the whole which made
one sensible of the majesty of the people. For
my own part I confess that this immense moving
mass of life, with its alternations of warlike music,
animated declamation, and sweet chorus of female
voices, caused the blood to tingle in my veins and
my heart to overflow at my eyes. Sympathy has
wondrous power, and, after waiting till the whole
grotesque train had passed, we drove to the end of
the corduroy, and then turned about, and, with a
host of other gazers, followed the multitude.
The place of destination was a grove whose
sylvan beauty never could be surpassed, even in
Michigan, which is all groves. It was at no great
distance from the road, but it was in all the
wildness
of nature, and looked as if the axe had never
yet profaned its hallowed aisles. Here, in the
midst of primeval solitude and silence, a great stage
had been hastily erected, and, facing it, a wide
amphitheatre
of rough benches,the whole roofed
in by noble oaks and maples, with unpierced
shade.
Rapidly, and with a silence and regularity which
bespoke thorough drilling, did the immense
assemblage
dispose itself appropriately over the broad
area,the orators and officials taking their places
upon the platform, where the banners were planted
and arranged in very effective drapery,the
ladies
on the front seats next the music, and the
common world on the remaining benches.
The Marseillois was now performedwith
verses by a native poet of course,and the entire
company joined in the chorus with an enthusiasm
which imparted a stentorian energy to their most
sweet voices. A marshal now announced that a
clergyman present would make a prayer, and
the multitude stood, with heads uncovered, and in
a throbbing silence, till it was finished. Then the
band played and the ladies sang Hail, Columbia,
and again the leafy canopy quivered to the
excitement
of the hour. Then came the speeches,
blazing
with patriotism, and touching, in their wide
scope, on every disputed and disputable point in
politics. And here I was much amused with the
discreet timing of the cheers, which was performed
by a young gentleman furnished with a flag which
he waved most graciously, bowing at every shout,
as if to thank the good friends, kind friends,
sweet friends, who took his hints in such good
part.
The sentiments were drank at intervals, in
very innocent liquids; so that if there was truth in
the rapture of the hour, it was not wine that
brought it out. Every body
seemed
to feel, to
the heart's core, all the privileges, advantages,
rights, grievances, and hopes, on which the chosen
orators harangued so warmly, and I doubt not that
vows were made that day which told afterwards
for good or evil, in opinion and action.
All this time the sun had been trying his best to
look in upon the animated scene, and although
his vertical rays scarce succeeded in checkering
here and there a portion of the well-trodden green
sward, yet the atmosphere confessed his power so
unreservedly, that some of the ladies began to be
very restless, and some even threatened an
interlude
of fainting-fits. One who sat near the stage
with a child in her lap, insisted upon having the
glass of water which had been placed on a table for
the speaker handed down for the use of her baby,
returning the remnant very coolly,a mixed
crystal
,
to say the least.
So it was judged best to adjourn for refreshment;
and on the announcement, all was renewed
animation
in a moment. The band played, the
marshals
shouted, the banners waved, the ladies
fluttered
,and
the result of all was a very long
procession on foot, in which woman, as the
toasts have it, bore a conspicuous part;each fair
hand carrying a bough, which our imaginations
were bound to convert into palm or laurel, (I spare
thee Birnam wood, O reader!) and every
swanlike
throat trilling with most patriotic sentiments,
married to popular airs, and stirring every heart as
with the sound of a trumpet.
The long array passed over an open glade where
the sun's rays were of the strongest, but this served
only to enhance the delicious coolness of the shade
which soon enveloped usa shade, to form which,
even the dense woods had been aided by great
awnings, and bowers within bowers formed of
immense branches and thick-leaved vines.
These varied and far-reaching canopies, adorned
with wreaths of wild flowers and gay flags with
emblematic devices, formed a splendid dining-hall,
within whose circuit all the rural luxuries that the
most laborious search could procure had been
displayed
with a taste which, though it might not
shine in more cultivated regions, certainly did honor
to the Western wilderness. Huge venison pasties,
such as (if we may believe veracious chroniclers)
kings have ere now revelled in; wild turkeys
prodigious
as any tame ones to be found at the Sublime
Porte; roast pigs delicate and crisp as those which
run about the land of Cokaigne, crying, Who'll
eat me? chickens in all attitudes, and pork under
all disguises;these were among the more solid
and noticeable items of good cheer. But to give
even a passing glance at the feminine contributions
belonging to the department of the dessert, and in
the preparation of which all the female skill of the
county had been, as it were, brought to a focus,
this were a hopeless task, and especially to one who
could not even guess at the names of half the
recondite
compositions that adorned the lily lawn.
Here and there might be observed something in
contrast to the general good taste; such as an
unfortunate stag, roasted (or half roasted) whole,
and standing, antlers and all, as if alive; only, alas!
upon another footing now! propped in his erect
posture by flower-wreathed sticks, and, in this
position, sliced and eaten, after a fashion which
ought to have sickened any but Abyssinians.
The immortal johnny-cake figured under every
conceivable form,round and square, rhomboid and
parallelopipedonstuck with roses, or basted with
gravy,johnny-cake was every whereshe was
the universe. Hard cider there was none,an
inevitable omission; for either it had been all
consumed at previous conventions, or the
apple-trees
of the neighborhood belonged to the opposite
party, and there was none to be had. The song of
Drink to me only with thine eyes might have
been appropriate as suggesting some consolation in
this emergency, but I believe the devotees pledged
each other in the pure elementindeed I should
judge it must have been so, from the exceeding
order and good-humor of the day.
The zest with which the people, individually
and collectively, attacked the goodly array, would
have silenced the veriest croaker on the subject of
Western agues.
Talk of city feasts! Your true alderman never
earns an all-sanctifying appetite by rising three
hours before day, and walking ten or twenty miles
without tasting food beyond a crust of bread. He
VOL. I. 16
can never know the true gusto of roast pig, far less
of johnny-cake. When he sits down at six to his
turtle he may indeed have eaten nothing to
signify
,
since lunch; but that very lunch and its
unconsidered sequence have stolen away all the
piquancy from his dinner, and he might rationally,
in his character of
gourmet,
envy the hardy
backwoodsman
his simplest cheer, with the
accompaniment
of his ordinary and sometimes rather
importunate
appetite. On this especial occasion, there
was not only the well-earned relish, but the choicest
opportunity for its gratification, and the result must
be left to the imagination of the reader.
* * * * * *
What changes may be wrought in one little
hour! Where be now the shining roastthe
delicate
boiledthe
pats
the pyramidsthe
temples
the
universal johnny-cake?
The banquet hall deserted,the theatre with
its latest lamp expiring - the once trim deck after
a sharply contested action,these are sad images;
but such a table after all are satisfied save a few
voracious stragglers!
* * * * * *
We waited not to hear the concluding address.
It may have been a good one,I dare say it was,
but I fear it fell upon dull ears. We hastened
onward, passed the log-causeway again, and reached
the fine hotel at, two hours before the
procession
rentered the town. We retired early after
the fatigues of the day, forgetting that there might
be such a thing as a ball-room atHouse.
Fatal error! Those who had marched, and shouted,
and sung, and eaten, in honor of their far-distant
favorite, thought not the rites complete until they
had expended the remainder of their energies in
dancing. Violins squeaked without stint or mercy,
and till gray dawn did the house quiver in unison
with the superhuman efforts of patriotic heels and
elbows.
CHAPTER XXIII.
Round scenes like these doth warm remembrance glide,
Where emigration rolls its ceaseless tide.
Mrs. Sigourney
.
We
have all heard of a man who went through
the ceremony of combing only once a year, and who
always, when the dread moment came, pitied those
poor creatures who endured the operation every
day. Even so, after one day of dissipation, did we,
dwellers in the voiceless woods, where it is a task
to remember the days of the weekone being so
much like another,pity those unfortunates whose
lot it is to go a pleasuring all the time. The
fatigue of eye and ear,the heat, the dust, the
din of yesterday, and after all, the sleepless night,
made repose really necessary; and we lounged
away the morning, visiting several friends, and
surveying
,
under their guidance, what was best worth
notice in the village and its neighborhood. The
place stands on rising ground, and commands a
fine view of the surrounding country, then smiling
in soft summer loveliness, and diversified every
where with wood and water, though destitute of
any striking features, if we except the one deep
dell, whose full and rapid stream forms the wealth
of the village.
Hard times had made no impression on the
sweet face of Nature. Not a frown reproved the
ungrateful grumbler, man; who, if he cannot find
the superfluity which is required by an insatiable
thirst for distinction, overlooks and contemns the
kind care that richly provides for all his real wants.
All was peace, industry and abundance, and the
heart could not but dilate with pleasure at the sight
of a multitude of objects all typical of the
overflowing
goodness of God, and calling upon his
rational creatures for the honor due unto his
name.
We were most hospitably treatedfor the spirit
of hospitality is not confined to the cottages of the
Westand our kind entertainers proposed several
plans for a pleasant evening; but the one which
proved most attractive was a visit at the house of a
clergyman with whom we had some acquaintance,
and who was to receive all the world within five
miles of,in the form of that relic of primitive
Puritanism known among us as a donation party.
We had heard of this customa general visit to
the clergyman, each guest bringing something by
way of offering,and we were delighted with
the opportunity of assisting at oneassisting
la Francaise,
I mean. We presented ourselves, by
special request, at an early hour; but, early as it
was, dozens of good plain folks from the country
had preceded us. Some indeed, we were told, had
been on the ground since breakfast-time. We
always
16*
do things in earnest here. When we say,
Come and spend the day,we should stare to
see the invited guest come at two o'clock, just as we
had put away the dinner dishes, and taken out our
knitting-work or our patchwork for the afternoon.
Avis au lecteur,
in case he ventures to invite a
Western friend without specifying the hour.
But, as we were saying, some good ladies had
taken time by the forelock, and here they were,
beginning already to yawn, (covertly,) and to long
for their tea. Two great baskets in the hall were
already pretty well filled with bundles of yarn,
woollen stockings of all sizes, (sure to fit, in a
clergyman's
family,) rolls of home-made flannel,
mysterious
parcels enveloped in paper, and bags which
looked as if they might contain a great many
precious
things. Flocks of company were arriving,
and no one empty handed, so that the removal of
the deposits became a measure of necessity, and
the contents of the two baskets were transferred to
some reservoir above stairs. Before the baskets
had been restored to their places, there was some
embarrassment among the new comers as to the
proper bestowment of their contributions, etiquette
requiring that an air of mysterious reserve should
be observed. But the difficulty was obviated by
the arrival of a handsome tea-table, borne by
two young men as the representatives of a little
knot who had hit upon this pretty thought of a
present for the minister's lady. Upon this the
tasteful class of offerings were displayed to good
advantage, and I observed among the rest a
study-lamp
,
a richly-bound Shakspere, and a bronze
inkstand with proper appurtenances. Among the
more magnificent were a standing fire screen
elegantly
wrought, and a pair of foot-stools on which
the skill of the cabinet-maker had done its utmost
in displaying to advantage very delicate
embroidery
.
The variety as well as the beauty of the
gifts was very ingenious, and nobody could find
fault with a handsome purse, filled with gold,
bearing, in minute letters wrought into its
bead-work
,
the inscription, To the Reverend Mr.,
from the young men of his church.
Where so many people, young and old, were
collected with a kind purpose, and under
circumstances
which levelled, for a time, all distinctions,
conversation was not likely to flag. In truth, the
general complacency evinced itself in a ceaseless
stream of talk,with only a moderate infusion of
scandal, for every body was present. The old
ladies chatted soberly among themselves, and their
husbands talked politics in corners. The young
ladies fluttered about busily, as in duty bound; for
on them devolves, by inviolable usage, all the
ministering necessary on the occasionall the
reception of the company and bestowing of their
offeringsall care of tea affairs and distribution of
refreshments in order due. Such a dodging of
pretty headssuch dancing of ringlets,such
gleaming of white teeth as there was among them!
I scarcely wondered that the young men became a
little bewildered, and forgot where they ought to
stand, and had to be ordered about or turned out
into the hall to make room for the more dignified or
bulky part of the assembly, only to slip back again
upon the first opportunity. So much youthful
beauty is not collected every day, and especially
beauty endowed with such a pretty little coquettish
station of command. I cannot doubt that much
execution was done, and, in truth, there were some
very obvious symptomsbut I shall not betray.
The clergyman's lady occupies rather an
equivocal
station on these occasions. She is not exactly
in the position of hostess, for every article set before
the company is furnished by themselves; and all
the ordinary attentions are rendered by the young
stewardesses of the hour; so the domine's lady has
only to smile and look happy, and to show by her
manner that she is gratified by the interest evinced,
and if to this she superadd good talking powers,
and can entertain those of her guests who are not
particularly easy to entertain, she has accomplished
all that is expected of her. And all this the fair
and lady-like heroine of the present occasion did
very sweetly.
The tea hour drew on, and now the
mle
began
to assume a business-like air. The scampering
reminded me of Puss in the Corner, such was
the sudden chase for seats. The old ladies put
away their knitting, and their spouses began to
spread their handkerchiefs on their knees, at the
first rattle of the tea-spoons. Those who were not
so fortunate as to secure seats, insinuated themselves
as near as possible to tables and mantel-pieces,
which might serve to hold the anticipated good
cheer.
The younger gentlemen officiated as footmen,
and they had an arduous task. Over and above
the bearing of great trays of tea and coffee, and
bounteous salvers of cake, biscuits, sandwiches,
cheese, tongue, and all that belongs to the city
and country tea-table, they had, in addition, to
attend to the contradictory directions of a host of
capricious mistresses of the ceremonies, who
delighted
in perplexing them, and who gave orders and
counter-orders for the very purpose of seeing them
go on bootless errands and get laughed at for their
pains. But they bore all very good-humoredly, and
managed to render something like a return to their
fair tyrants by persuading the old ladies to drink as
much tea as possible, and commending and urging
the excellence of the coffee to the gentlemen in
such sort that an extra supply was required, and the
damsels' elbows were fain to sue for quarter. After
all were served, the attendants were at liberty to
provide for themselves, and, whatever may have
been left for them to eat and drink, I can testify
that they had abundance of talking and laughing.
I ought sooner to have mentioned that the pastor
in whose behalf such general interest was shown,
was a person accustomed to society, and an adept
in the best power of hospitalitythat of making
every one feel welcome and at ease. Mr.was
every where, and in every body's thoughts. Grave
with the old, gay with the young, and cheerful with
all, he was in every respect the life and soul of the
occasion, and each felt the time spent in
conversation
with him to have been the sweet of the
night. An enviable power! and one possessed in
its perfection only by those whose hearts are full
of kindly sympathies,who
are
what others only
try to appear.
After the bustle attendant upon serving the tea
had subsided, the conversation gradually, and as if
spontaneously, took a more serious turn, and, before
we were aware, the sweet and solemn notes of a
hymn, well supported in all its parts, stole upon
the ear, and hushed all lighter sounds. When
several stanzas had been sung, the clergyman, after
a short address, invited all present to unite in prayer
and thanksgiving to the bounteous Giver of all
good. And thus seriously closed a very cheerful
evening, without any violent transition or
unpleasant
contrast.
This custom of donation parties certainly seems
to belong to a very primitive and simple state of
society, yet its observance is by no means limited
to these newly-settled regions. Wherever New
Englanders have given a tone, these little gatherings
have been introduced, and though there are various
opinions as to the general question whether this is
the best or a good way of contributing to the
support
of a clergyman, people generally unite in them
very heartily, which affords at least a presumption
in their favor. This very union is something. As
far as I have been able to observe, they certainly
have the one good effect of creating a nearer
personal
interest in the pastor and his family; and
whatever tends to draw closer and nearer the ties
which bind minister and people, may not be lightly
discouraged; for in this calculating and utilitarian
age the dangers lie on the opposite sidethe side
of proud indifference and chilling neglect, the most
discouraging and impracticable of all atmospheres
for a minister of religion.
CHAPTER XXIV.
Impelled, with steps unceasing, to pursue
Some fleeting good that mocks me with the view;
That, like the circle bounding earth and skies,
Allures from far, yet, as I follow, flies!
Goldsmith.
Homeward
once more. Skies and bowers of
fairy-land, but most earthly corduroy; and some
few mud-holes that would have suited well with a
still grosser sphere. Endless wheat-fieldsIndian
corn glittering in the sunbeams as the morning
wind dashed the dew from its broad leaves; rich
pastures, where a few maples, kindly left alive,
formed shady lounges for the cattle; quiet streams,
in which the cows were very sensibly standing
half-leg deep, browsing occasionally upon the
overhanging
boughs;such were the commonplace
objects that served to give an interest to our journey
homewards. The road by which we were
returning
was a closely-settled one, crossed however here
and there by a tract of deep shade, in which the
solitude of creation seemed never to have been
disturbed
,
and in one part passing through a strip of
unbroken prairie, scarcely tenanted except by
wildfowl
and other pensioners of nature.
Jogging along slowly under a blistering sun
across this shelterless tract, we saw far in the prairie
a moving object, which we took at first for some
wild animal, whose outline the dazzling nature of
the light prevented our tracing distinctly. But
presently, when the strange figure moved toward us,
which it did rapidly enough when we came within
its range, it proved to be no prairie wolf, but a
human being, oddly accoutred and exhibiting
considerable
perplexity. He would walk a few steps
forward, and then, shading his eyes with his hand,
gaze earnestly around him. Then turning his eyes
to our side, he would seem resolved to reach the
road, yet after a few moments turn and gaze
wistfully
as before. At length we came within
speaking
distance, and our wild beast turned out an
English gentleman who seemed to have been
gunning
on the prairie. The capacious pockets of a
very curious-looking jacket were stuffed with
prairie-hens, and instead of a hat a silk
pocket-handkerchief
was tied about the dissolving head
of the sportsman.
We could do no less than stop and inquire the
cause of his evident perplexity.
PrayI beg your pardonbut can you
observe
any thing on the prairie? he said, pulling
the kerchief from his head, and wiping his brow
with a half-distracted air.
We tried faithfully, standing on tiptoe in the
wagon, but there was nothing visible but the tall,
waving grass, and the long straight road. Not an
VOL. I. 17
object broke the line of the horizon except some
far distant trees.
Well now, said our new acquaintance, d'ye
know, this is so very awkward! these prairies of
yoursone might as well be on the ocean in a
cock-boat. I have been shooting on this very
ground for four successive days, and bagged so
many birds every daygrouse toothat I couldn't
make up my mind to quit. But this morning I had
determined should be the last, you know; and I
was enticed further and further; and after I was so
loaded that I could scarcely walk, I still saw so
much sport that I made a pile of game on a
convenient
spot, and put my cap upon the heap by
way of landmark, so that I should be quite sure,
you know, to find it again. But upon my word,
I had not brought down three birds after this,
before
I came to the end of my powder, and then I
set out to find my cap and my game. And here I
am, wandering about these two hours, you know,
and can see nothing but grass every where. It is
really excessively awkwardand again he wiped
his forehead, as well he might.
He was a gentleman by no means well fitted for
searching the prairies under the fervors of a summer
noon, for he was short and very fat, and his head
was pink and shining as if it had never known the
excrescence of a moist brain. But he tried to
laugh off his vexation like a wise man, saying that
he supposed a wolf he had shot at early in the
morning had devoured cap and game too, by way
of revenge for his evil intentions.
We were so fortunate as to have a spare straw
hatno unusual provision for a summer journey
hereabouts,and this the stranger gladly adopted,
his crimsoned countenance looming out from
beneath
its wide brim like the rising harvest moon
encountering a stray bank of clouds. He accepted
also a seat in our rough vehicle as far as the next
village, and before we had reached the place o
destination, we had set him down as a very
pleasant
Englishman indeed. He was full of animation,
interested in every thing connected with this new
world, and much more desirous of gaining
information
than of impressing the Yenkees with an
overwhelming idea of his own born and bred
superiority
.
Such an Englishman being almost a
wonder in America, we cultivated Mr. Sibthorpe
accordingly, and an acquaintance of some duration,
since that chance encounter on the prairie, has
given us no reason to regret having yielded to first
impressions.
We reached Mr. Sibthorpe's lodging-placethe
little village of Temperancea knot of log-houses
clustering about a blacksmith's shop, and a
Variety-Store
,
(I quote the sign,)just as the world
was going to dinner; and Mr. Sibthorpe had so
many good things to say of his landlady that we
were induced to apply to her for our dinner, instead
of making a pic-nic meal in the woods, as we had
intended.
The good woman was the picture of neatness,
and she was most appropriately framed, for a
trimmer
cottage sun never shone upon. Every thing
shone with cleanliness, and the gown and shawl of
the poor soul herself had been washed and starched
until they were of a gauzy thinness. Poverty was
every where, but it was cheerful, industrious, and
most tidy poverty, and the manners of the hostess
and her children were such as would have appeared
well in far better circumstances. Her husband was
at his work, she said, and had taken his noon-meal
with him, but she had prepared dinner for Mr.
Sibthorpe
,
and could soon add to it for our
accommodation
.
There were not plates and knives enough to
allow the children to eat at the same time with us,
so that it took a good while to despatch the dinner.
Meanwhile our newly-found acquaintance was
getting
his traps together, (an expression picked up
on this side the water, I
guess,
) and by the time
the little folks were repacked and ready, he too
had mounted his shaggy pony, and with
well-stuffed
saddle-bags, and blanket and boot-hose,
stood prepared to ride on with us.
The road grew bad enough as we plunged into
the timbered land, so bad that fast driving was
out of the question. The late heavy rains, falling
upon land that was never shone upon except at
noonday, had soaked the clayey soil so completely
that in many places we made our way with
difficulty
;
and in this drawling way we travelled
several miles. And here our prairie-hunter's
cheerful
and intelligent conversation served as a most
agreeable relief to the tedious dulness naturally
attendant
upon ruts and mud-holes. Mr. Sibthorpe
had travelled a good deal, and always with his eyes
open, and he had beside a fund of enthusiasm, and
a genuine love for fresh, free and unpolished
nature
,
which was absolutely romantic. His
information
was extensive, and his manner of
communicating
it natural and easy, excluding every idea of
ostentation or arrogance.
After all, the charm of his conversation (to me
at least) was the tinge of romance which pervaded
his views, and which unconsciously to himself,
probably, gave a poetical cast to every sentiment
and opinion. It is the fashion of the day to laugh
at romance, yet who is not fascinated by it when
it is evidently genuine? People who dare to be
romantic are becoming every day more rare. The
spirit of the age, analytical and disenchanting as it
is, is fast eradicating the few romantic notions that
have survived till this time; and if any country
bids fair to be preminent in the tearing away of
all illusion from the dull realities of lifein the
17*
systematic exaltation of the material above the
ideal, I fear it is our own.
We sometimes encounter a foreigner who has
brought with him the fruit of the seed sown by the
lore of his infancy, and who will charm us, in spite
of ourselves, into something like sympathy with
his passionate estimate of the light which
imagination
can shed on the trials and vexations of the
world; but where is the American who would not
blush to be suspected of such childish, such
unfashionable
views?
M. De Tocqueville, who has of all others written
of us in the kindliest as well as most profound and
discriminating spirit, has not failed to perceive and
to warn us of this tendency to materialism. He
should perfect the good work by pointing out some
great practical remedysome counteracting power
or principle by the aid of which we may apply
ourselves
to the cultivation of the poetical rather than
the prosaic estimate of things; learn to crave the
intellectual before the physical,the beautiful
with
the true,and, above all, the believing
spirit,lately so eloquently commended by a
countryman of our own,in preference to the
skeptical, into which so many of our thinkers seem
to be relapsing.
But what has all this digression to do with Mr.
Sibthorpe? More than appears, perhaps; for the
reminiscence of that pleasant afternoon in the
muddy
timbered land brought with it a floating idea
of some of the many themes upon which our
discursive
talk touched; lightly enough, but so
amusingly
,
that we could scarce believe the sun had set,
when the woody way became suddenly embrowned,
and the cold dew began to fall perceptibly, while
we were still at some distance from our purposed
resting-place.
CHAPTER XXV.
But show me one that has it in his power
To act consistent with himself an hour.
Pope.
We
hastened onward at the expense of some
terrible thumps, and half an hour or so brought us
within hearing, at least, if not within sight, of the
village where we had agreed to pass the night.
We were made aware of our approach to the abodes
of men, by a clatter and howling, a clash of tin
pans and a beating of drums, which made together
a din sufficiently startling after the long dark drive
through the forest, where nothing was heard
beyond
the screech of the owl or the occasional bark
of a fox. So loud and so angry were these warlike
sounds, that Mr. Sibthorpe concluded at once that
they must be occasioned by some great popular
commotion.
What do you suppose it can be? he inquired;
d'ye know I've the greatest curiosity to see an
American mob! Do you think it can be any thing
of that sort?
Our replies damped his hopes. We thought any
thing else more likely. And very soon we reached
the inn, where all was quiet as one could wish,
although the crowd from which the noise proceeded
was visible by the light of its own restless lanterns,
at the further end of the street.
It's only a parcel of fellers gone to serenade an
old widower that's been a marrying of a young girl,
and didn't ask the neighbors to the wedding
that's all! said the landlord. If he'd come out
and treat'em, they'd go off peaceable; but he's so
spunky he won't do that, and I'll warrant ye they'll
keep up that hullabaloo all night.
A
charivari
in the woods! exclaimed our
companion
;
an old French custom transplanted into
these Western wilds! You certainly have borrowed
something from all nations. You observe the
New-year
with the Dutch, and `Thanksgiving' with
the Yankees; and I have noticed that you fail not
to eat mince-pies religiously with the English at
Christmas, and cod-fish and potatoes with Paddy
on his saint's day.
We responded by a wish that the naturalization
of holidays had been carried still further, as we have
so few of our own; and we might have been
inclined
to enlarge a little upon this point, (it being
a favorite one,) but our host had no idea of
awaiting
the conclusion of an untimely discussion.
Well! said he, somewhat testily, if you're a
comin' in, come along! if not, it a'n't of no use for
me to be a standin' here. I've got sacks of things
to do.
Mr. Sibthorpe laughed, as an Englishman well
might, and very good-humoredly responded to this
crusty speech of our landlord by asking whether he
did not consider it a part of his business to wait
upon his customers?
Why, if a man wants a meal's victuals for
himself
,
or his folks, or his dumb critters, responded
Mr. Hotchkins, I am willing to furnish it; but I
don't calc'late to wait upon nobody. D'ye want
your horses put up? Here, Zack! take these men's
horses and put 'em in the stable. Then to the
guestsYou can tell him how many eats you
want 'em to have.
And with this the innkeeper went into the
house, to consult the women-folks, I suppose.
Zack was kind enough to take off our luggage,
which he placed in the entry; and we seated
ourselves
in a forlorn parlor, with a funereal row of
chairs, and one table, on which stood a sepulchral
lamp that looked as if it had been intended to burn
on for ages, making darkness visible, so minute
was the quantity of flame that glimmered on its
little wick.
The evening was very chilly, as is often the case
after a day of intense heat, and we felt the need of
fire to dry our dewy garments, as well as to cheer
the dark dismal parlor. The landlord, who was
forthcoming upon a call, said there was a fire in
the bar-room, and that the men-folks could go
there, and the woman and the children could sit in
the kitchen.
But couldn't we have a fire here?
Whythe fact isno, not very well. You
see my woman has slicked up her stove, and got
her posy-pot in't and alland she wouldn't like
to have it nastied up jist for one night. I guess
you'd better fix it t'other fashion.
And to the kitchen we went, and a very nice
kitchen it was, with a somewhat prim but kindly
dame at the head of affairs, who made the
rosy-cheeked
damsels under her sway fly about so
nimbly
that our tea was soon ready. How they
managed
to do any thing was marvellous, for the kitchen
was full of newly-ironed sheets, spread on
clothes-frames
and the backs of chairs, and steaming in the
hot air.
The eating-room felt like a cellar, but there was
a fire just kindled in a close stove, which, by the
time we had finished, began to make it quite
tolerably warma not unusual arrangement in
taverns. Whether the incipient stages of freezing
are induced with a view of benumbing the appetite
with the other powers, or whether the air is kept
cool for the convenience of the waiters, who might
find much exercise uncomfortable in a well-warmed
atmosphere, I never was able to guess.
When the children were prepared for bed, one
must have been very good-natured indeed not to
observe that the sheets were not of the number of
those which had just passed beneath the
smoothing-iron
.
How is this! I exclaimed to the maiden in
attendance; these sheets have been used?
Oh, yes, ma'am, simpered the girl. We
ha'n't no new sheets.
But I must have
clean
sheets, I said, in plain
English,sheets that have not been slept in
since they were washed.
Oh! exclaimed the young lady, as if light had
suddenly broken in upon her understanding;
yesI dare say!but, you see, ma'am, we've
had sich lots of companythere was the
Dimocratic
Wig conventionthey slept here two nights
and then there was this here Log-Cabin
celebration
and
so all of our sheets but these is a drying
in the kitchennot aired enough yet to put upon
the beds,and we thought you'd like these better,
'cause they're so much healthier! you know damp
sheets is dreadful unwholesomeand there ha'n't
nobody slept in these but some
very
nice
gentlemen
!
But all this eloquence was wasted upon my
prejudices, and the chamber-maid, with a toss of
her head, went to hasten the airing of the sheets,
while we returned to wait by the dining-room
stove.
Here we found our gentlemen in conversation
with the landlord, who was, with all his odd
roughness
,
a very civil sort of man, and very fond of
hearing himself talk, although he had shown so
little patience with our prolixity.
He seemed to be warmly engaged in arguing
with Mr. Sibthorpe some point connected with the
vexed question of distinctions in society.
Respect! he exclaimed; why should I
show more respect to any man than he does to me?
Because he wears a finer coat? His coat don't do
me any good. Does he pay his taxes any better
than I do? Is he any kinder to his family? Does
he act more honestly by his neighbors? Will he
have a higher place in heaven than I shall? Show
me the man that's a
better
man than I am, and
you'll see if I don't treat him with respect! But to
fawn and cringe before a fellow-critter because he's
got more money than I have, is again my principles.
I sha'n't help to blow up nobody's pride.
But, persisted Mr. Sibthorpe, waiving,
however
,
the main question,
as one must always do in
similar cases,
are you sure that it is not your own
pride that makes the difficulty? otherwise, what
could be easier than to recognize those different
grades in society which have always been marked
since the beginning of time, and in all probability
will continue to be so as long as earth endures, in
spite of the resistance of those who are unwilling
to foster any body's pride but their own?
Ah! stop a little! rejoined the landlord;
there's where you go too far! You think these
ranks and distinctions will go on always, because
you wish they should go on.
I
believe they are
VOL. I. 18
coming to an end as fast as the earth rolls round.
In my opinion this etarnal Yankee nation has set
the example to all the rest of the world, and before
many years is gone by, there won't be a man in
England that'll take off his hat to the queen
unless
she makes her manners first. All menand
women toowas born not only free but equal;
and equal they've got to be, on earth as well as in
heaven.
Well! said Mr. Sibthorpe, with his usual good
humor, I am glad to have met at last with
one
consistent American. You believe in the equal
rights of all human beings. You are not for
exalting
one class of men at the expense of another, or
depressing any class that another may live in pride
and luxury at their expense
No indeed! said our host, with a virtuous
severity depicted on his countenance. Give every
man a fair chance, that's what I say; and then we
can see what stuff he's made of. Outside a'n't
nothing.
You are not one of those, continued Mr.
Sibthorpe
,
who would shut a man out from all the
privileges of society because God has given him a
black skin. You would look only at his worth,
his abilities, or his piety; you would be willing to
associate with him, and assist him in maintaining
his just natural rights in spite of a cruel prejudice.
You would
What upon airth
are
you talking about?
exclaimed our host, quite aghast at this sweeping
conclusion. I should ra'ally be glad to know if
you mean to insult me! Are you a talking of
niggers
?
Do you suppose I look upon a nigger as I
do upon a white man? Do you think I am sich a
fool as not to know who the Africans is? Should
I put myself upon an equality with the seed of Cain,
that was done over black to show that they was to
be sarvants and the sarvants of sarvants? I'm no
abolitionist, thank God! and if you're one, the
sooner you get back to your own country the
better.
I have not been long enough in your
land of
liberty,
said Mr. Sibthorpe, with a quiet smile, to
have enrolled myself under any of your party
banners
;
I only wished to ascertain how far you
carried
your creed of equality; and I find you draw
the line, like most of your countrymen, just where
your interest or your inclination indicates. I can
now see very plainly why you think there ought
to be no distinction of ranks in the world. And
without waiting for the angry reply which seemed
laboring in the mind of the landlord, Mr. Sibthorpe
bade good night, and desired to be shown to his
room.
What prejudiced critters these English is!
said our host as he left the room.
We thought the observation true enough in the
main, but not particularly applicable to our friend of
the prairie, who had evidently seen the world with
too philosophic an eye to be a
mere
Englishman.
To those who have been so happy as to meet with
an English gentleman of this character, one for
whom nature, education and travel have all done
much, I need hardly say how very delightful is
such companionship. Agreeable Englishmen are
much more like each other than agreeable
Americans
.
Whether their nationality of feeling is so
strong as to give always a predominating tone to
the character, whatever be its distinctive points, or
whether they derive a more obvious national
resemblance
from the possession of fixed standards
of taste, education and manners, I have not had an
opportunity of judging. The fact has struck me
frequently.
Mr. Sibthorpe continued to be our companion
for the rest of our homeward journey, and we were
much pleased to learn from him that he had
actually
purchased a farm about twenty miles from
our cottage, and intended proving to his own
satisfaction
the delights of American forest life.
Why do you smile? said he.
Did
I smile? was the reply,
faute de mieux
.
Yes indeed, but you have not seen Mrs.
Sibthorpe
.
She is more romantic, if so you call it,
more indifferent to outward appliances, even than I.
To rove in the summer woods and read or gather
wild flowers makes a paradise for her.
But we have longvery long winters
More charming still, if possible! fine bracing
air for exercise during the day, and long quiet
evenings
for your favorite pursuitsno wheels
thundering
on the pavement to break in upon the
dreams of fancyno well-dressed bore coming in
to rob you of your time and patience.
There was nothing in this view of country
pleasures to be disputed, and it was not necessary
to draw a
counter
picture. This was better left
for a
photogenic
impression. So we parted with
Mr. Sibthorpe with the willing promise of an early
visit, twenty miles being but dining distance when
the roads are good.
18*
CHAPTER XXVI.
In what Arcadian, what Utopian ground,
Are warmer hearts and manlier feelings found,
More hospitable welcome or more zeal
To make the curious tarrying stranger feel
That, next to home, here best he may abide,
To rest and cheer him by the chimney side?
Brainard.
The
encounter with Mr. Sibthorpe seems to
have been the last incident worthy of record in
this our summer tour; at least I find nothing
further
in my note-book or my memory. Showers
and sunshine there were, I dare say, but we cannot
chronicle all the smiles and tears of this
changeful
life.
The impression left by the journey was, on the
whole, a pleasant one, and I returned, as I always
have returned from similar travels in the West,
with an increased liking for the people. There is
after all so much kindness, simplicity and
trustfulness
one
catches so many glimpses of the lovelier
aspect of our common naturethat much that is
uncouth is forgotten, and much that is offensive is
pardoned. One sees the rougher sort of people in
their best light, and learns to own the tie of
brotherhood
.
The perception of faults and
deficiencies
,
narrow prejudices and vulgar pride, in those
who have had but little opportunity for mental
improvement, awakens, under the circumstances,
something that
approaches
at least the right tone of
feelinga desire for the improvement of these
coheirs
of life and its trials and its hopes. They are
a most interesting people, and although they were
originally composed of very incongruous gleanings
from the older states and from foreign lands, they
are fast acquiring, under the pressure of
circumstances
and by their own native energy, a distinct
and commanding character.
The backwoodsman, though much has been said
and written about him, is perhaps, after all, but
imperfectly
understood. His character, his habits, his
faults, his virtues, his points of peculiarity, of
superiority
,
of inferiority, are very striking, but it is not
easy to describe them concisely. He is a being at
once calculating and impetuouspenurious and
prodigalindolent and laboriousrough and
kindlypassionate and forgiving; vowing revenge
to-day, and to-morrow doing a kindness to his
declared enemy. He will make his wife a drudge
without compunction; but his old mother must
have a warm corner, and the privilege of knitting
or doing nothing, as she chooses. He will, likely
enough, give his father a short answer if he
attempts
to interfere with the ordering of business,
but the old man will never lack any of his
accustomed
comforts while his son is able to earn them.
His temper is hasty, and his sentiments are not
very refined, but his sense of duty is strong, his
sympathies awake unbidden, and his intuitive
knowledge of the humanities is above all
college
learning.
He left his birthplace discouraged by untoward
fortune, disgusted by the treachery of a friend, or
perhaps smit with the rage canine of dying rich.
He came to the West with a dream of boundless
liberty and universal good faith; a vision of
affluence
to be acquired with rapidity by the sole aid of
his strong arm and the axe which seems like a part
of it. He did not stop to investigate each step of
the process. The glorious result filled the mind's
eye, and cast into the shades such dull, old-fashioned
drawbacks as computation, reason, experience.
We are all apt to forget at times that though the
laws which govern the course of human events may
seem occasionally to relax or to be eluded, they are
in fact immutable and impartial. The same
conditions
that have ever stood obstinately in the path
of the aspirant, are now attached to the acquisition
of wealth. To rub a lampto turn a ring on
one's fingeror to follow the course of the setting
sunthese are all easy; but they can win only
such riches as serve to gild the turrets of air-built
castles.
Our backwoodsman is disappointed in many
things. He discovers that whoever will not shut
himself out from all intercourse with human kind,
must endure much restraint and practise much
forbearance
.
He finds that wherever man is associated
in any degree with his fellow-man, there is
selfishness
,
but he fails to recognize this fault in himself.
A short trial convinces him that wealth must here,
as elsewhere, be purchased by patient toil, and that
long-protracted illness will empty the purse even in
the golden West.
At first these things depress him excessively, and
he is apt to conclude that all is naught. He forgets
the disagreeables which drove him from his old
abode at the East, and magnifying the evils around
him, his disordered imagination figures the wide
West as a mere trap. He is ready to give up all
and flee, choosing rather to encounter those ills of
which habit has softened the asperity, than those
whose sharpness is rendered more acute by contrast
with the soft flatteries of fancy.
After a while the horizon begins to clear. It is
not easy to get away, and necessity is often a kind
friend. Our emigrant is becoming better
acquainted
with his neighbors, and, in his turn, acquiring
their confidence and their good-will. He gets rid
of the ague, or at least learns how he may avoid it.
His wife has found a little circle within whose
round the social cup of tea may be enjoyed, with
the aid of its best sweetener
commrage
. He has
a good crop, and it brings him a good price. He
is elected constable, or path-master, or perhaps even
town-clerk if he be fortunately of the scribes.
Now he begins to acknowledge the advantages
of an unworn soil, and of the universal freshness
and newness of the world around him. He finds
it pleasant to be among the magnates, even of a
township of twenty families. He feels a degree of
pride in the reflection that he is at least an atom of
the great rolling mass which is destined to spread
the benefits of civilization and Christianity over
this immense expanse of bountiful soil. He forgets
after a time his ancient prejudices, and almost his
attachments homeward, and imbibes that Western
feeling so striking to the new comer.
He now feels disposed to look around him and
inquire what is the best mode of supplying some
of the deficiencies of his new condition, and the
first requisite that presents itself is union, concert
with his neighbors, whose interests are in this
matter identical with his own. When this becomes
an object, a phantom starts up which is but too apt
to thwart all efforts for the general goodPolitics.
I may be almost alone in my view of this subject.
The habit of taking a personal share in the
government
has so many charms as well as so many
advantages
,
that it is difficult to make our
countrymen
believe it may encroach upon the attention
due to other and perhaps more imperious duties.
Yet this is the conclusion to which I have come
after some opportunity for observation.
If it be trueas who can doubt!that
Two
elements seem to be comprised in the great fact
which we call civilizationtwo circumstances
necessary to its existencethe progress of society
and the progress of individuals,the amelioration
of the social system and the expansion of the mind
and faculties of man
5
5.
Guizot.
it appears to me that we
are as yet occupied only on the incipient steps
toward
civilization. We are busying ourselves
exclusively
on one of the paths to national greatness
and happiness, and neglecting another which claims
our best efforts. To borrow an appropriate figure
from the soil, we are laying out work upon a
road which needs but little mending, while we
have not even opened another which is equally
necessary and far more pleasant. The entire
attention
of the public mindbeyond that desire for
acquisition which is at least excusable in people
who began with very little of this world's goods
is occupied with petty politics; a struggle of
partisanship
a
scramble for small offices which the
frequency of elections is continually throwing open
for competition, thus engrossing the attention which
ought to be occupied with nobler objects, as the
paras scattered among the crowd in Constantinople
serve to withdraw all interest from the sultan
himself
,
the grand centre of wealth and honor.
The part which every one feels it alike his duty
and his privilege to take in public affairs has
undeniably
a very favorable influence in awakening
the intelligence and enlarging the perceptions of
our people, as to matters of practical and immediate
utility. This has been often observed, and must
indeed be obvious, as the natural effect of constant
practice. But the good effect ends here. To place
a particular candidate in office is the single aim,
not to ascertain his real fitness for the place. If
the man of our choice will vote as we wish, and
act as we think he ought, upon certain points of
local interest, we inquire no further. He can write
his name, and what more do we need? With us
knowledge is not power, but the contrary. There
is even a strong prejudice against educated people,
perhaps because they are comparatively so few that
they cannot exert collective influence, but rather
stand in the position of exclusives. They incur
the suspicion of not being willing to yield to the
impulse of the crowd. Education will not make a
man honest, say we; it is more likely to make him
proud. It will make him none the better
road-commissioner
,
or supervisor, or even school-inspector;
for, as said our friend Mr.,touching the
question
of a candidate for this latter office, We don't
want great scholars; we want plain farmers, like
ourselves. It is on this plan that most of our
teachers are examined and pronounced fit for the
business, as witness our district schools, in many
of which the teacher is not even required to spell
tolerably. This gear must be amended, but the
time does not seem yet to have arrived.
Some efforts are undoubtedly making towards
intellectual advancement, but they are few and
feeble. They have as yet taken no hold on the
affections of the people. They shine however like
faint lights in a dark place, showing the gloom
which surrounds them, yet affording encouragement
to those who are anxiously watching their increase,
and hoping to see their puny rays grow brighter and
brighter till the coming of the perfect day. Among
the young there are many who have caught glimpses
of the pure light, and who long for more. We may
at least hope that manhood will not find them
ingulfed like their sires in the vortex of petty
politics.
It is difficult to obtain any hearing for this view
of things. To set up our own puny acquisitions
as the universal standard,to decide that nothing
beyond what we ourselves know can be worth
learning,to acknowledge nothing as good which
we do not ourselves possess,is but too natural
to us all, and most of all natural to those who have
almost every thing to learn. The forming stages
of every infant society are found to be peculiarly
prone to fanaticism of some kind, and ours just now
is a utilitarian fanaticism of the narrowest and
most short-sighted description. Whatever cannot
evidently be turned to account
to-day,
is rejected
as worthless and unprofitable. We leave the future
to take care of itself. We certainly are fanatics in
politics; perhaps I shall be told that I am equally
so in the importance which I attach to the pursuit
of literature.
VOL. I. 19
I cannot but think that our apathy on this subject
arises in part from the idea which seems to float in
the moral atmosphere of life in this region, and to
be imbibed instinctively by all, that if our political
condition be but right, nothing else can be wrong;
if we have only
liberty
enough, nothing can be
lacking in the essentials of happiness. Another
cause may perhaps be sought in the migratory
habits alluded to in another part of this work.
Intellectual
pleasures are the solace of the quiet
fireside
the
deep shade at noonof the twilight
hour. Repose is their element. They belong to
a love of
home,
and this is yet a feeling almost
unknown to the mass of Western settlers. They
are in unison with a quiet and rational, not an
exciting
and feverish pursuit of happiness, and those
who have cultivated them most successfully, have
ever borne testimony to their power of alleviating
the ills of life, as well as of adding grace and
refinement
to its pleasures.
CHAPTER XXVII.
There studious let me sit
And hold high converse with the mighty dead;
Sages of ancient time, as gods revered,
As gods beneficent, who blessed mankind
With arts, with arms, and humanized a world.
Thomson
.
When any one can prove to me that it is puerile to make ourselves
happy from sources always within our own control, then I will admit
that ideal pleasures are unworthy of a reasonable being.
Flint
.
It
has been said that characters and professions
rise or fall in public estimation according to the
exigency of the times.
6
6.
See Essay on Literary Character.
At the present day, be the
cause what it may, authors, writers by profession,
the unproductive classoccupy no
inconsiderable
space on the wide arena. They have
even been used as heroes of romantic story. They
are no longer stigmatized and held up to the
ridicule
of the unlearned, as pedants in threadbare
black coats, who wipe their pens on their fingers
and forget to shave. Arrayed in the finest, and
essenced with the best, they fill an honored place
in the drawing-room, and are held indispensable at
the Feasts of Lions now so much in vogue in the
rare upper air. A certain class of these
communicative
sages has ever received the honorable
designation
of the silver-fork school, from their
exquisite proficiency in the arcana of fashionable
life, and their just appreciation of its inestimable
privileges, from one of which is derived the
distinctive
honorary title just mentioned. I pretend not
to draw inferences, but only to state facts, and
whatever deep observers may assign as the reason,
the fact must be admitted that ours is the Age of
Ink. But this applies only to the
wide
arena.
Let not these fortunate personsthese heroes
of the penplume themselves too highly. Let
them not fancy their soft empire universal. Let
them rather trace out the bright regions
distinguished
on certain philosophical maps as
enlightened
wide
spaces done in cerulean blue, or
glowing rose,and mark well the boundaries of
their influence. Beyond that dotted line shining
nonsense has no charms, fashionable inanity no
readers. Nay, more,beyond that line no poet,
saving perhaps Isaac Watts, no writer of fiction,
but it may be the ingenious compilers of those
miniature novels which we are in the habit of
teaching to our Sunday scholarsfinds any favor,
scarcely indeed any toleration, be his pretensions
what they may. If a story cannot be sworn to as
true, it is condemned as a pack of lies.
O Shakspere! O Cervantes! O Walter Scott!
beneficent manufacturers of tranquil enjoyment!
Nay, still more,O Milton! O John Bunyan!
awful and awe-stricken painters of heavenly
imaginings
!
interpreters of things sacred and celestial!
and you, ye hosts of kind softeners of this world's
ruggednessgentle consolers of time's trials
inspiring companions of deepest solitude! ye whose
fancy-woven veils can throw a charm over realities
which to see in their naked truth would drive us
to despair! is it for this ye have toiled? for this
wrung your blessed brains?for this wasted the
midnight oil?to have those who of all others need
your benign office, repel you with disdain? Was
Shakspere in very deed a king of France that
killed two children and then ate 'em? Shall the
Waverley Novels be known as Waverley's
Novels?
Are
the adventures of the knight of
La Mancha flat stuff? Is it a shame to write
any thing that a'n't true?
But to be serious, John Bunyan
is
an exception
to the general rule, for we all read Pilgrim. You
will find a well-thumbed copy in perhaps every
fifth house in the woods. But the mass of our
society, intelligent as they are in matters of
everyday
business, have as yet no consciousness of the
lack of literary advantagesno conception of what
they are losing by their neglect of this source of
amusement and occupation. I say the
mass,
for
the exceptions to this remark which I could myself
adduce, serve only to prove the general rule. Books
and the power of enjoying them, scarcely find a
19*
place in our plans of happiness. If we are to place
any confidence in the reputation of Scotland in
this particular, the taste of our population must form
a strong contrast to that of the Scotch, who are
somewhat similarly situated. Our loneliness is
uncheered by the shadowy companions whose
presence we might always command. Our
pastures
will never produce a Robert Burns or an
Ettrick Shepherd. And this, not through any lack
of natural gifts, or any deficiency of materials, but
simply and solely because the direction in which
not only the public mind but the attention of
individuals
is habitually turned, is utterly adverse to
every thing that requires imagination for its
production
or its enjoyment.
We are told that art is unnecessary where there
is nature and feelingand also there is a
strong sensation of delight felt by unpolished and
simple minds at the first encounter of the true and
the beautiful.
7
7.
Sismondi.
This must not be applied
without
much limitation in the case of literary
productions
.
There is a time when we are not only unable to
originate works of taste and fancy, but unable to
enjoy them. But we began our chapter with the
saying of D'Israeli, that each character or profession
rises or falls in public estimation according to the
exigency of the times; and we were going to draw
the inference that every body in these Western
wilds has, on that ground, a strong inducement to
turn author, since a love of letters is our great need.
This may be disputed, but the very attempt will
prove the truth of the observation, since those who
have experienced the consoling and humanizing
effects of a rational pursuit of literature will never
think its importance can be overrated.
One who ought to know has told us lately that
he finds himself in a country where the reputation
of having written a book is equivalent to that of
having picked a pocket, or something to that
effect. Now, as this writer dates from Brussels, we
hardly know what he can mean, unless it be that
the people by whom he is surrounded are so
absorbed
in money-making or some other form of
sordid self-indulgence, that they have no respect
for books or their makers. This cannot quite be
said of us, for if a writer will only tell very long
stories about the Revolution war, or very tough
ones about the Indians, and if the said stories be
very bloody and very marvellous, we will believe
every word, and, believing, enjoy. But this
enjoyment
will be entirely independent of any literary
merit in the works themselves.
Many complain very piteously of the long
speechless days which they are obliged to pass,
living in the woods, and perhaps far from any
neighbor. Women especially find this a sore trial,
as it needs must be. But if you suggest a book as
the best sweetener of solitudethe reply will
perhaps
be, Oh, we have hardly any books, and I
never was no great reader! And the resource
adopted instead, is to wander off to some accessible
neighbor, and there spend the long afternoon, or
perhaps the entire summer day, in unimproving talk,
or, still worse, in discussing the characters and
conduct of friends and acquaintance. Yet these
very people will pass a sweeping condemnation on
reading for amusement, and especially works of
fiction. They could not spend time so! Yet
the time which is squandered in eternal visiting
would give a good course of reading, both useful
and cheering, to those who had a taste for it. I
verily believe that the establishment of a library in
every town would prevent nine tenths of all the
bitter animosities which often divide whole
neighborhoods
,
and which usually spring from no other
source than the vapid or malicious tattle of loungers
and gossips. And, I must insist, if it were only to
keep people out of mischief, a taste for reading
would be invaluable.
But it cannot be doubted that every accession of
intellectual light carries with it an increase of
happiness
happiness
which depends not in any great
degree
upon the course of public events, and not, beyond
a certain limited extent, upon the smiles of fortune.
Those debasing and imbittering prejudices which
must ever wait upon ignorance, melt away in the
rays of mental illumination, and every departed
prejudice leaves open a new inlet for happiness. I
may be considered an enthusiast, but it is my
deliberate
conviction that next to Religionheartfelt
operative Religiona true love of reading is the
best softener of the asperities of lifethe best
consoler under its inevitable ills.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
Scorn not this lowly race, ye sons of pride,
Their joys disparage, nor their hopes deride;
From germs like these have mighty statesmen sprung,
Of prudent counsel and persuasive tongue.
Mrs. Sigourney.
Who
are the characters most highly esteemed by
the Western settler? Politicians certainly. And
why? Because improvements in social condition
alone occupy the attention of the people.
Individual
improvement has not yet assumed its real
importance
in our eyes. We entertain a deep
reverence
for the sacred office, but we are apt to be
somewhat critical on the individual who fills it.
Critical, not after the manner of city congregations,
for we care little for modes of speech, or graces
of action, or the opinions of a
clique,
but on the
severer points of zeal, spirituality, sincerity, and
above all, freedom from pride, and from a desire
for exclusiveness. On these points we are strict
and merciless judges, and such is our dread of
priest-craft
,
that we do not always remember that
Christian
charity, humility and diffidence are graces
which become equally priest and people. We are
fond of lawyers, but we have ever a lurking fear
that they know too much. We are incessantly
seeking their assistance, but we always congratulate
ourselves on having come off unharmed, in our
dealings with them, which shows a certain degree
of distrust. The merchant is a necessary and often
a powerful member of the community; and he
would be a popular one if it were not for the
occasional
compulsory collection of debts, which casts
at least a temporary shadow upon his good name.
As to the physician, it is natural enough that a man
who works all day for half a dollar should think
hard of paying as much or more for a ten minutes'
visit, and where land can be bought for ten
shillings
the acre, it is not to be wondered at that the
farmer should grudge to give twice as much for
being cupped, since he has not the remotest idea
of the expense incurred in acquiring the skill which
looks to him like mere intuition. But let any of
these superadd to his professional claims the
character
of a warm, unflinching politician, or let him
acquire this last without an attempt at any thing
further, and all distrust vanishes at once, and he
passes as a fellow with a whole soul, who has
discovered the true end of man, and the direct path
to honor and usefulness.
If I were called on to state the quality which
more than any other formed the especial
characteristic
of the Western settler, I should name
Self-dependence
a
direct manifestation of that which
has been given as a national biasIndividualism.
The very effort required to break away from the
ties of kindred, and from all cherished memories,
implies no inconsiderable share of that self-reliance
which prefers equality, among the poor, to any of
the advantages to be gained by living among the
rich in an inferior position. The man who has
done this feels that he can do more, and the thought
that in the wilderness he starts fair at least, is a
potent encouragement. If the lower classes of
mechanics in our great cities could be induced to
look fate in the face, and, borrowing a little of this
same self-reliance from the emigrant, venture to
follow where he has boldly led the way, instances
of discouragement, temptation, evil courses,
despair
and crime would be less numerous, in the
byways
of those great Babels; while our smiling
villages, supplied by this means with what they
most need, would afford, in return, both business
and bread, enough and to spare. With us it is
emphatically true that a man's a manand if
he wear hodden gray, he is none the worse, but
the better.
Nothing contributes more to increase this spirit of
self-dependence than the electioneering contests,
and the share which all, directly or indirectly, take
in the management of public affairs. This even I
must acknowledge, although I deprecate the evils
which grow out of the frequency of elections and
the blind pursuit of one form of good to the neglect
of all others. The good is a great good, without
doubt, and it is shared by all without exclusion.
In a town containing one hundred voters, about one
half are annually candidates for office, and of course
about one fourth are elected. The principle of
rotation in office is carried out, and there are few
of the citizens who in the course of three or four
years do not have a share in this species of
sovereignty
.
Small is the remuneration attached to these
town offices, smaller still, in the world's view, the
honor belonging to them; yet their exercise
performs
a most important part in the training of our
people, and exerts a powerful influence over their
characters. This is in fact the real education of
the community. The portion derived from our
common schools is by comparison a mere nullity.
Every office has some portion of responsibility
attached to it, requires some acquaintance with the
laws of the land and the exercise of some degree of
discretion; and, moreover, invests the possessor for
the time being with a little consequence in the eyes
of others, and not a little in his own. Each town
is of itself a little republic, and the town affairs,
taken collectively, are vastly more important in
their bearing on the welfare of the people than
the action of our general and state governments.
This subject does not always attract the attention
it deserves. We speak of our people governing
themselves, meaning thereby that through their
representatives they do ultimately and remotely
control the action of the bodies to which those
representatives
belong. This is truly an important
part of the sovereignty of the people, but it is not
VOL. I. 20
the most important part. The power which they
exercise in the primary assemblies has a far greater
influence on the character and welfare of the nation.
In these assemblies is determined the amount to be
raised for town purposes, the sums to be expended
on highways, and many other items directly
connected
with the general prosperity. To the school
districts is left in great measure the regulation of
their own schools, and no one can resist a tax
levied for the building or repairing of one of these
important edifices. Much the greater portion of
taxes is expended within the town, and over this
the citizens exercise absolute control.
It is in these various gatherings of the people for
the transaction of public business, that the
democracy
of the country really exhibits itself, and where
it is seen entirely paramount. In the greater
assemblies
,
a thousand other influences are brought
to bear, besides the mere will and wishes, or what
may be termed the choice, of the people. Not so
in town-meeting. Every man there speaks for
himself
,
acts for himself, votes for himself; and, in so
doing, is a more correct image of the republics of
antiquity, than the grand representative assemblies
of our country. We must not therefore expect in
them touches of Demosthenian eloquence, though
as to
fire
we may be allowed to doubt whether
even the great Athenian excelled the
backwoods-man
.
Fortunately neither life nor liberty, nor the
glory nor the existence of the nation is at stake,
but nowhere is a keener interest excited nor a
warmer debate heard than in these halls of true
democratic simplicity. He who should omit
reckoning
these influences in his estimation of national
and especially Western character, would resemble
the botanist, who, in his description of a plant,
should forget to mention its root or its blossom.
The very organization of a school-district, and the
various steps that are required to be taken by the
parents with regard to it, have probably more
influence
on them in enlarging their comprehension, and
giving them an item of practical knowledge in the
transaction of public business, than the school itself
will exercise in improving the minds of the children.
So it is with regard to roads. The consultation
about them, the choice of commissioner and of
path-masters, the determination of sites, the
appraisal
of damages consequent on encroachments
upon farms, the ordering of methods of
improvements
,
with the directing of the labor to be
bestowed
,
certainly tend to improve the faculties of
those concerned, whether it benefits the roads or
not. That is another consideration.
Whoever supposes that this system is one which
necessarily leads to good roads, good schools, a
good and cheap provision for the poor, and the best
administration of the laws,is greatly mistaken.
The ever-recurring change of officers prevents any
important gain from experience, and is an absolute
bar to any regularly-pursued system. The
responsibility
lasts but for one year, and temporary
expedients are of course resorted to, having little or
no prospective bearing. It is a little too much to
suppose every man born with such a capacity for
public business as to enable him to dispense with
all preparatory training, and the slovenly mode in
which affairs are conducted shows the necessity for
the lessons of experience.
Are we then to abandon our system of town
government
,
and look to state officers to regulate our
town affairs? By no means. These duties form
too valuable a part of the education of our citizens,
and although we pay dearly enough for it, it must
be considered worth all it costs. In some
countries
they educate the children; in our new
countries
this point is poorly enough attended to, but
the deficiency is in part supplied by the education
of the men. But it is folly to suppose we get the
benefit without cost. Perhaps it is all the better
that we are not sensible what it does cost. A
direct
tax to the same amount would be intolerable.
CHAPTER XXIX.
Light, whether it be material or moral, is the best reformer; for it
prevents those disorders which other remedies sometimes cure, but
sometimes confirm.
Lacon.
The
subject of our common schools is one of
too much interest to be passed in silence, though
there is little that is pleasant to be said about them.
Munificent provision has been made for the public
instruction of our state. The general features of
the plan have been conceived in the noblest spirit;
the people have had all reasonable encouragement
to stimulate their own exertions; yet the real,
practical
result has been, thus fat, lamentably small.
Several causes may perhaps be suggested in
attempting
to account for this failure, and these
causes, acting and reacting upon themselves,
becoming
alternately cause and effect, make research
difficult, even if it were certain that discovery
would be productive of good.
To maintain any sort of school for a part only
of the year is sufficient to secure a share of the
public money, and the benefit which might be
derived from even this, is diminished by an absurd
custom of charging the parent only for the time
which the scholar actually passes in the school,
20*
deducting every day, or even half day, of absence.
This operates as a premium upon irregular
attendance
,
and the effect is to keep the classes
continually
fluctuating, and to nullify any effort which
the teacher might be disposed to make for the
improvement of the school. To get as much work
out of the child as possible, and at the same time
to comfort ourselves with the idea that we are
sending him to school, is very pleasant, and the
case of the boy who was
kepatomtogoatatering
,
is no uncommon one. We keep them at
home with less apology sometimes.
The purchase of books, where there is nothing to
control the whim of the teacher, and where every
three months' teacher is sure to have a new fancy,
becomes quite an inconvenience among people of
very small means; and the effect of this is an
utter impossibility of classifying the scholars and
enabling the instructor to make the most of his
time. Some parents insist on having the school
books which served former teachers used as long
as they last, and as we all do as we like, this makes
fine confusion, and helps along the master's temper
by thwarting his plans at every turn.
As is the master, so is the schoolso says
that wisest and kindest of despotic parents, the
Prussian government. This is true, beyond
question
,
and some of our common schools confirm it
lamentably. If the master cannot speak good
English, how can he be expected to mend the
cacophony of the scholars? If he be ignorant of
the first rules of good manners, can we complain of
the grossness of his pupils? If the teacher's
handwriting
be but a vulgar scrawl, shall he set copies?
Can one inculcate neatness and good order who is
himself the most odious of slovens?
And on the other hand, what man in his senses
who is capable of earning a decent livelihood
who has arms to pare and burn a mosswill
undertake a most vexatious and thankless task, for
wages inferior to those of a common laborer? Who
but the lame or the lazy can afford to work every
day and all day, and board round besides, all
for eight or nine dollars a month?
And what inducement can there be for study or
any effort at improvement on the part of such young
persons as may wish to become teachers, when
they know that it will probably be their fate to be
examined by persons totally incompetent, and
that these posts are usually let out, like railway
contracts, to the lowest bidder?
But, say some parents, why should we feel much
solicitude or be at extra costs in engaging a
competent
teacher; since he will probably remain with
us only for a single term, while we shall be
expected
afterwards to pay at the same rate for the
poorest kind of services?
I must not allow myself to dwell on these points,
since it can do but little service to point out faults
unless we are prepared to suggest improvements.
I would not have said even thus much if it had not
been a subject very near my heart, and one on
which I cannot but think our Western public are
but too apathetic. I may at least claim the merit
of speaking the truth in love.
Perhaps if the public money were bestowed in
sums
proportioned to the time
that a school has
been maintained in the year; the instruction of the
children of the very poorthose who are willing
to acknowledge themselves unable to support even
the small expense requiredpaid for by the state;
and payment claimed of all others, according to
the number of their children within certain ages, thus
cutting off all question as to deductions in case of
absence; and, withal, a list of books
prescribed
by
the superintendent of public instruction to all the
schools which are benefited by the public funds,
some of the minor difficulties might be obviated.
But our schools will never be materially improved
until parents learn to set some value on education
for its own sake; to recognize it as the most
efficacious
means of extracting the greatest possible
amount of comfort out of narrow circumstances and
an isolated position. And since this enlargement
of views is only to be looked for as the gradual
result of contact with the enlightened, it must
evidently be of slow growth. No desire for
improvement
will arise spontaneously until some
degree
of knowledge has been acquired. The very
wish implies that the first steps have been taken.
When we have had only a taste of the sweetness of
book-learning, we shall no longer content
ourselves
with the three Rs, readin', ritin' and
'rethmetic
,
but view them as only the stepping-stones
to things far more delightful.
I believe I ought to make some apology to the
reader for this heavy patch upon a flimsy web. I
know it does not belong here, and that it will form
one of those skipping-places which teach young
people bad reading-habits. If I can cheat some
of my Western friends into a moment's attention
to a subject so important to us, I shall rejoice, as
did Paddy when he succeeded in passing his light
guinea by hiding it between two coppers.
But I have bespoken thee, O reader! and thou
hast promised me unlimited indulgence; and now,
as I have had my turn, I shall, in acknowledgment
of thy patient attention, treat thee to a story; which,
if not furiously to the present purpose, may yet
serve to give thee a new glimpse of the simple and
homely life which we of the woods lead every day.
It is a peep at the condition of an old settler;a
peep with living eyes too, but no offence, Hal!
no offence!
CHAPTER XXX.
The friendly shade
Shuts out the world's bright glare.
Our
friend Mr. Hay has a noble farm. His
cleared and cultivated acres may be counted by
hundreds, and his stock of all kinds will far
outnumber
them. A wide tract of forest land hems
in his clearing, and this too calls him master. He
is wont to boast that he has more land enclosed
within a ring-fence than any man in the county,
and he boasts still louder that it is all the fruit of
his own industry, and loudest of all, that it has
never made him proud.
He maintains and insists upon his family's
maintaining
the simplicity of habits and manners that
is usual in the neighborhood, and watches with
jealous eye every tendency towards an imitation of
those who attempt fashion and style among us.
He goes daily into the field with his men, and his
wife and daughters spin and wear wool and flax
of home production. No imported luxury graces
their daily table. Mrs. Hay, to be sure, has her
tea, but she has it in the afternoon, before the
family supper; and the sugar (for the few who
like sweetnin' in their tea) comes from no further
off than the farm sugar-bush. Notwithstanding
these strict sumptuary laws however, no family
lives in greater comfort and abundance.
Mr. Hay's house is large enough to make a
figure
any where, though it lacks as yet the
beautifying
aid of the paint-brush. His barn would make
a hotel of tolerable dimensions, and the various
out-houses
,
and sheds, and coops, and pens, that cluster
around it, make passing travellers fancy they are
coming upon a rising village in the deep woods.
A fine young orchard adorns the sloping bank
behind the house; whole rows of peach and
cherry-trees
border the ample door-yard; hedges of currant
and gooseberry bushes intersect the garden; thick
screens of wild grape and honeysuckle overshadow
the porch and drapery the square-room windows.
When you enter, you find bare but well-scrubbed
floors; the only exception being found in the
aforesaid
square-room, which is decorated with a
home-made carpet of resplendent colors, large
enough to reach almost the border of chairs, and
shaken every morning on the grass to avoid the
ravages of the wasteful broom. A great eight-day
clock with a moon on its face is the most
conspicuous
ornament of the common or keepin'-room;
but there is, besides this, in a favored corner near
the window, a small mirror, round which hang
black profiles of all the family, including aunts and
uncles; pin-cushions of every size and hue; strings
of little birds' eggs; vials of camphor, peppermint
and essence of lemon, and perhaps a dozen other
small articles much prized by different members of
the family; while over the glass wave a few
peacocks'
feathers, and a whole plume of asparagus.
Pass into the kitchen and you will find Mrs.
Hay kneading bread or rolling pie-crust to give her
stout handmaid time for some less delicate service;
her daughter Marthy-Ann preparing dinner; her
daughter Sophia-Jane shelling peas; her daughter
Harriet-'Lizzy rocking the cradle in which lies
yet another daughter, whose name is Apollonia,
not quite Apollyon, but so like it that I almost
wonder that people who read John Bunyan should
be fond of the appellation. The truth is, we do
love high-sounding names, and the more syllables
or adjuncts the better.
The kitchen has a great fireplace, with a crane
stout enough to swing a five pail kettle of soap,
and a great oven too, that will hold at least a
dozen
country loaves. About the walls are disposed
all the conveniences necessary for the full use of
fireplace and oven, on the same plenteous scale.
A rifle and a shot-gun hang on wooden hooks
driven into the rafters overhead; two or three
gleaming butcher-knives ornament a leather strap
fixed against the chimney. A meal-room near at
hand contains several varieties of flour, and a
buttery
and milk-house supply other rustic dainties in
profusion. Is it not to be supposed that Mr. and
Mrs. Hay and their five daughters, and their help
and their hired men, live well?
One daughter we have not introduced into the
kitchen, because she was seldom found there.
Caroline
Hay was delicate from her infancy, so much
so that even her father was willing to see her
excused
from the more arduous part of domestic duty,
and sent to school more constantly than were her
sisters. But it was not without many misgivings
that Mr. Hay observed the distinction which this
circumstance occasioned between his daughters.
He dreaded, and with reason, that Caroline should
become that useless and uncomfortable being, a
pretty girl, with just enough of education to fill her
with conceit and pretension, while her exemption
from the household cares that occupied her mother
and sisters would be likely to create in time an
impression that she was of right entitled to superior
respect and a higher destiny. And, in truth, the
young lady herself had already begun to verify in
part her father's sagacity, by showing off, on proper
occasions, a very sufficient share of those airs which
young ladies sometimes mistake for graces. In an
especial degree did she scorn the beaux of the
neighborhood, who, being accustomed to find
themselves
very favorably received elsewhere, and who
could not perceive why Car'line Hay should stick
up, disliked her in proportion. We forgive any
thing but sticking up.
VOL. I. 21
The three hired men are curiosities in their way,
and as I wish to present a sketch of a Western
settler's
home of some dozen years' standing, I will
say a few words about them, although two of them
have no very direct interest in my story.
The elder, John Kendall, is a huge Titan, who
looks able to play at quoits with almost any of our
Michigan hills; a man of might, whose very voice
as he shouts Haw, Star! or Gee, Brin'! is
enough to make the earth quake, and so supersede
the necessity for using the immense plough which
he guides with one hand. This is of course the
head man where hard work is to be done.
Then comesI take them as they sit at table
a rosy-cheeked, handsome, quizzical Tim Rice, one
of those resolutely agreeable persons, who are
always
diving desperately after jokes, undeterred by
the frequent mortification of coming up
empty-handed
.
This youth is better dressed than great
John Kendall, and he is Mr. Hay's right hand man
in all matters requiring rather address than strength.
He refreshes the memory of distant debtors; he buys
and sells horses, (he is a born horse-jockey,) and
superintends the training of the colts; he feels the
pulse of the county as elections come round, and
even addresses his fellow-citizens occasionally when
the town requires to be redeemed, regenerated,
disinthralled, from the sway of some unpopular
assessor or recreant constable. Mr. Hay is a
politician
of course, or he never would have stood where
he does in the estimation of his neighbors. He is
now somewhat tired of justiceships, and
commissionerships
,
and memberships for himself, but he
has always a favorite candidate, in whose behalf he
and Tim Rice ride, and run, and talk, and scold, till
the grand end is accomplished; and in all such
matters the handsome-faced Timothy is Mercury.
The young gentleman in the blue jeans, who sits
next Mr. Rice, being particularly interested in my
story, must have a paragraph to himself.
Seymour Bullitt was, at the time when I first saw
him, one of the most awkward and clumsy boys I
remember to have met; thick-set, red-faced, and
withal much given to that kind of desperate and
unreasonable yawning which threatens permanent
dislocation of the maxillary processes. This habit
had but one advantage,it disclosed, the times a
day, a double row of the most regular and beautiful
teeth that ever wasted their energies upon salt pork.
These and a pair of dark eyes were all that poor
Seymour had to recommend him, and his extreme
rusticity was the continual whetstone of Tim Rice's
would-be wit, especially at table, when the ladies
of the family were present. On these occasions
Seymour's face became redder than ever, and Tim
declared that he looked every where but at
Caroline
,
whose languid blue eyes seemed scarcely to
note his presence.
This young man was the son of a
fore-handed
farmer who had half a dozen such, and
who, being a prudent man, and a widower, had
sent Seymour (by the by, a favorite name with us,
and usually pronounced Simmer) to learn Mr.
Hay's way of managing a farm; and the regular
mode of doing this was to hire out as an ordinary
hand to perform Mr. Hay's bidding. And
Seymour
would have liked his place passing well if it
had not been for Tim Rice's wit. This was sair
to abide, surely; but then Mr. Hay was such a nice
man, and Mrs. Hay was such a nice woman, and
the girls were such nice girls, and Caroline
here was always a misty place in his mind, so we
will leave a blank.
We are not to suppose that Seymour ever spoke
to any one within doors when he could help it.
He came in with the men from the field,he
washed in the kitchen, and then went out of doors
to comb his shaggy head, just as the rest did. But
when all were seated at the table, and John
Kendall
gave grave opinions or put forth sage truisms as
to the crops and things in general, and Tim Rice
practised the profitable art of word-catching, at the
risk of biting his tongue with his dinner, Seymour
sat in an unbroken silence which seemed stupid
enough. He was always bashful in the extreme,
and under present circumstances, the fear that Tim
Rice might find in his most trifling observation
something that would bear twisting, kept him
absolutely mute. Of course the young ladies did
not like him.
That Tim Rice was a torment, to be sure! and
to see the ease with which he laughed and talked
with Caroline Hay, and the smiles that she gave
him! Seymour tried to think what it could be that
gave Tim such advantages, but he could not make
it out.
21*
CHAPTER XXXI.
What dismal cries are those?
Nothing; a trifling sum of misery,
New added to the foot of thy account.
Dryden.
It
so happened that on a far distant part of the
farm, where the process of clearing had but just
commenced, John Kendall and Seymour, who went
thither as choppers on a fine day in autumn, found
each a prize. Kendall's was a huge snapping-turtle
that was sunning himself on the borders of a small
lake which lay near the scene of the day's
operations
,
when John's unerring aim put an end to his
musings and his life together, with the aid of no
weapon but a stone such as few arms could have
hurled so far. Seymour's treasure was a load of
purple wild-grapes, which he had espied at no great
distance in the wood, and which he determined to
carry home as an offering to Caroline Hay. His
thoughts were occupied during the remainder of
the day in deciding in what manner best to
approach
the shrine which had so many terrors for
his bashful soul; in planning speeches of six words
each; and in wondering how Miss Hay would
reply to such unwonted familiarity.
The declining sun saw our two heroes, loaded
each with his prize, making the best of their way
homeward; but their pace had been so much
moderated
by the weight of their acquisitions,the
old difficulty
embarras des richesses,
that they
did not reach the farm-house until the supper-bell
had rung and the family were assembled.
Seymour
hurried to bestow his load of grapes in a
hollow tree which stood near the well, and
Kendall
laid his hideous turtle by the kitchen-door, its
head drawn far out, its eyes protruding, and the
stick by which the captor had carried it, still fast
in its mouth.
Hilloa! shouted Tim Rice, as he jumped
over the back fence in his haste to meet the
well-known
punctuality of the supper-bell; are you
late too?
Oh!
we
work, said Seymour; we can't afford
to peel the hills and jump fences as you do, Tim.
Work! replied Tim, with a knowing laugh,
as he plunged his glowing face in the wash-basin,
I do head-work, my boy!
Precious light work that must be, said
Seymour
.
Never mind, my son! don't be cross, said Mr.
Rice with a mock-patronizing air; it'll be your
turn by and by, if you're a good boy. Then
turning to go into the house for a towel, he fairly
jumped at sight of the turtle. What black dl
is this! said he; oh! a snappin'-turkle, eh!
famous good soup Mrs. Hay'll make of that,
I
know! Who caught it?
I did, said John, but Simmer's got
something
too; and he indicated the grapes in the
hollow tree, and added a conjecture as to their
destination. And then he and Seymour went in
to supper, tired of waiting for Tim.
The very moment Seymour beheld Caroline
seated at table, looking more animated and of
course more beautiful than usual, his courage failed
him, and he felt sure that he should never be able
to make the contemplated offer of the grapes with
his own lips. So, as soon as supper was ended, he
called one of the little girls aside, and gave her
an awkward message to her sister, telling her she
would find something in the hollow tree by the
well. His purpose was then to be off as soon as
possible, but the little sister hurried Caroline to the
spot so quickly that he could not avoid witnessing,
himself unseen, their approach to the tree, the hole
in which was on the side furthest from the house.
What was his horror when Caroline, scarcely
casting her eyes towards the place, uttered a loud
shriek, and, bursting into a passion of tears, ran
away as fast as she was able! The whole family
crowded round her with wondering questions, but
the petted beauty would only exclaim, 'Tis that
hateful Seymour Bullitt! nobody else
could
do so!
Poor Seymour waited in his hiding-place until
all had retreated into the house, and then ran to
discover the cause of such terrible anger. What
was his vexation to find the vile snapping-turtle
so placed within the hollow of the tree as to show
to the greatest advantage all its hideousness, while
the grapes had entirely disappeared! It was now
his turn to exclaim, in the inmost recesses of his
boiling soul, That's Tim Rice!
And to make matters worse, he saw Caroline at
the window, and felt that she must suppose he was
exulting over the success of his trick.
Tim Rice took care to be invisible, and the only
person who met Seymour's eye was Mr. Hay
himself
,
who came out, apparently in musing mood,
thinking, beyond a doubt, of the trick that had
been played upon his daughter.
Seymour approached Mr. Hay, and said, in his
most awkward manner, It wa'n't me, indeed,
sir!
What is it, Seymour? said Mr. Hay, so
mildly
that one might know his mind was not upon
snapping-turtles.
WhyI didn't know but you might think it
was me that
Oh! that frightened the girls, eh! no,I dare
say it was some of Tim Rice's nonsense; and
Mr. Hay passed on in wonderful unconcern. This
was the extent of Seymour's explanation, and Mr.
Hay never thought of it again, so that the truth
did not reach Miss Hay's ears, as the unfortunate
Cymon hoped it might.
The faithful and impartial historian regrets to
acknowledge that Seymour's thoughts, as he tossed
on his sleepless pillow that night, ran almost
exclusively
on the subject of pounding Tim Rice
thoroughly, as soon as he could catch him in the
morning. Nay, so entirely had this idea taken
possession of him, that when, after several restless
hours, he had at length fallen asleep, he knocked
the skin completely off his knuckles in an encounter
with the bed-post, which senseless piece of
furniture
received a blow intended for the handsome
nose of the unfortunate joker.
There are some people who habitually consume in
planning the time which would be most suitable
for the execution of their intentions. We shall not
allow that was a common fault of our friend
Seymour
,
but it is certain that when he awoke in the
morning, two hours later than usual, and found that
the object of last night's denunciations had set off
at peep of dawn on a long tour of business for Mr.
Hay, he wished he had not indulged his angry
feelings quite so vehemently, when he ought to
have been asleep.
This incident, trifling as it was, produced upon
the yet unopened mind of this young man no
unimportant
effects. We are all conscious, at times,
of sudden light breaking in upon us from sources
which are apparently so trivial that we are at a loss
to account for the magnitude of their influence.
Now, Seymour had felt at intervals and transiently
a dim and vague sense of power to be something
more than he had yet been. He had so nearly
discovered the truth, that the merest trifle was
sufficient
to give the rousing touch he needed. So
from the chaos of that one wakeful night's thoughts,
a jumble of hard work, and John Kendall, and
snapping-turtles, and bunches of grapes, and Tim
Rice's
head-
work, and easy life, and enviable
impudence
,
and his own violent but unavailing anger,
and the pretty damsel's scornful looksfrom a
jumble of all these things and many more beside, an
idea dawned upon him,darkly and blunderingly
at first, but gradually clearer and more inspiring,
of the advantages of mental power over mere
strengthof education over mere labor; and so
absorbing and so laborious was the process of
thinking
out for himself what he might have found clearly
laid down in dozens of volumes, had he known of
their existence, that he forgot his vexation and its
saucy cause, and almost the fair enemy herself, while
he argued himself into a resolution to change at once
his plans for the future, and to arm himself for the
battle of life with other weapons than the plough
and scythe.
The short remainder of his stay at Mr. Hay's
saw him eat his meals like a Trappist.
END OF VOL. I.